THE KING'S TALISMAN.
CHAPTER I.
Mt. Hor, Petra. The dervise and his pupil. The lesson. The old man's story. The sweetest flowers that can bloom in the memory of the past. The mountain of life.
IN the midst of ancient Idumea, like a giant sentinel, pointing its granite finger heavenward, towers aloft the barren, rugged peak of Mount Hor.
The hot sun was pouring down its scorching rays upon the rocks and sands, and as the shadows of the craggy cliffs fell upon the smoother surfaces they told to the practiced eye that the day-king had reached the meridian of his noontide power.
Two thirds of the way up the mountain the rock ran back to a wide, shelving plain, upon one side of which, from a small crevice in the otherwise solid granite, trickled a spring of clear water, while still farther back a deep cavern opened its jaws, revealing nothing beyond but chaotic darkness—a darkness within the deepest secrets of which only one living being had ever penetrated. Stretching away, as far as the eye could reach, lay spread out an almost endless waste of gently undulated sand, with here and there a black rock or oasis to relieve the desert plain; but nearer in towards the mountain, the eye might rest upon a scene that not only relieved the whole barren, desert waste, but which seemed to spread over the whole a sort of stately grandeur.
At the foot of Mount Hor stood the mighty city of Petra, enclosed within its vast amphitheatre of towering rocks, and looking like a flashing diamond in its rough but impenetrable setting. Nature had built her walls and fashioned her single gateway, and even the mighty Babylon might not outvie her in her stronghold. Here it was that Trajan, with his Roman hosts, after the conquest of Petraea, was obliged to turn from his ambitious purpose. The powerful Roman marshalled his hosts in vain around its mighty walls, and ore long he found himself obliged to leave it unharmed, still rolling in its wealth and power, and still reposing beneath the sway of its own king.
Upon a rude bench, which had been carved out from the solid rock, near the mouth of the cavern to which we have alluded, sat two persons, just within the shade of an overhanging cliff. One was an old man, whose years had ran into the dead winter of life, and whose white
 beard and still whiter locks gave him great claims upon the reverence of all whom he met. His head was uncovered; and his only dress consisted of loose drawers, or trowsers, of white linen stuff, and a brown mantle which was girded about the loins by a leathern thong. The mantle was thrown back from his shoulders, leaving his arms and bosom entirely bare, while in his right hand he held a stout staff of cedar. The old man's brow was cast in that intellectual mould which unites with a powerful mind the most keen and subtle observation and wit, and his countenance, taken as a whole, was one which any honest man would at once have trusted as the index to a kind and pure heart. Such was Abdah Nazor, the Nabathean dervise and soothsayer, a man than whom none else in his day was more respected by the thousands who hung upon his garments when he entered the city.
Abdar Nazor's companion was a fair-haired youth. Though but eighteen years had passed since his birth, yet the graceful-rounding of his limbs, and the muscular undulations of his chest and shoulders gave token of a more advanced age. As he now reclined upon the rough stone bench, his appearance presented a subject worthy of much study, not only from the physical proportions, but also from those higher and nobler developments of the inner man. There was none of the lumbering, massive iron in his structure—a massiveness which betokens the physical elephant, and which awakens awe by its 
external
 alone; but rather like the fine, subtle steel of Toledo and Milan was the youth before us. There was an ease, an elasticity and grace even in his very sitting that bespoke the pliant muscle and enduring frame. The eye, as it swept the distant waste, and anon rested upon the granite bound city, was in very truth as the needle upon the face of the dial;—through its lustrous, sparkling depths the whole man could be seen, and its language was of a kind that might have won the heart of earth's fairest maiden, or have sent a thrill of fear to the bosom of the most powerful enemy.
The youth's dress was plain, but yet not so scanty as was that of his aged companion. It consisted of loose yellow trowsers, bound by small cords around the ankles, a sort of doublet made from camel's hide, which laced up in front just to the top of the breast, over which was worn a shirt of blue stuff, secured at the waist by a sword belt, while his head was covered by an embroidered cap from which dangled a small golden tassel. From his belt was suspended a somewhat heavy Damascus sword, and from a convenient socket in the left breast of the camel's hide doublet projected the handle of a small dagger, while upon the bench at his side lay a light javelin. It would not have taken a very close observer to have seen that these weapons belonged to one who, should occasion offer, might use them to advantage. In this picture we have drawn Noureddin, the son of Ali Kinah, the corn merchant of Petra, but the youth, from the time spent with the old dervise upon the mountain, and from the prowess which he had displayed on several occasions, had become generally known throughout the city as "
The Young Lion of Mount Hor
."
"Master," said the youth, as he moved in from the end of the bench to escape the hot rays of the sun which had been gradually gaining over the cliff, "you say my education is finished."
"Nay, I said no such thing, my child."
"But you said I could receive no more instruction from you."
"Ay, that I 
did
 say; but there is one teacher whom yet you have to study, and to whom I am but as a single sand upon yonder desert."
"There you are wrong, master."
"Wrong?"
"Yes, wrong. Such a simile is not good. You might have said that, compared with the teacher of whom you speak, you were but as a single oasis by the verge of Nature's richest gardens. When earth affords such store-houses of similitudes, let us seek those which may best accord with our meaning."
"In truth, I am corrected," replied Abdah Nazor, as he gazed with admiration upon the features of his pupil. "No, I will never again
 draw a similitude, of my Maker from the desert waste."
"Nor of yourself, from one of its burning sands."
"Perhaps not, though I am still but a mote in the great eye of Truth, for even but now I have learned of my pupil a lesson."
"Ay, and I would learn more of thee," the young man said, as he laid his hand upon the shoulder of the old dervise, "for your mind is yet stored with treasures of which I have as yet but seen a single glimmer."
"Noureddin, I have indeed wisdom which it is not given thee yet to know, but you must obtain it as I did, and you will then retain it. I might labor in vain to communicate it to thee now."
"And how didst thou obtain it?"
"By 
experience
. The general path of duty I have taught thee, and I have opened thy mind to a knowledge of those mysteries which are as chaotic darkness to the ignorant; but I may never point out to thee the exact works and deeds which may become you. You alone can see them. Every day will open to your understanding some new duty—some new sphere of operation. Along your pathway of life new thorns will be constantly rearing their sharp points, of which no man can tell thee, and you will be fortunate indeed if you avoid and overcome them. Then there will be new flowers, too, ever rearing their fragrant sweets in your path, and more fortunate still will you be if you pluck them. Ah, my child, too few of God's children read the book of life aright. He who only seeks to avoid danger—whose every thought is of overcoming his enemies—lives not at all; but the real life is given to him who, with open heart and humble soul, seeks to gather to himself the genial flowers that God has strewed with such bountiful hand over the great field of humanity; and then, should danger come, he may meet it as becometh a noble soul."
"Surely," returned Noureddin, gazing up into his teacher's face, "every man will pluck the flowers of pleasure when he sees them in his way."
"Ay, my child, and the flowers which the fool plucketh may tear and lacerate his flesh with their hidden thorns."
The youth gazed in silence upon the old man, but he spoke not. Abdah Nazor continued his story:
"My child, let me relate to thee a tale. Once there was a man who had two sons. The eve of a great festival was nigh at hand, and calling his sons to his side he addressed them as follows: 'My children, here are forty pious of gold which I divide equally between you. Tomorrow is the festival, and I give you the day in which to spend the money as you see fit. Now he who, with his gold, shall plant the sweetest flower in the memories which shall cling to that day shall have money wherewith to follow up his pleasure.' On the next morning the two youths went forth. The eldest soon separated from his younger brother, and alone each followed his inclinations. At night the elder brother returned first. His countenance was flushed with excitement, and as he threw himself into a chair he gave vent to a joyful exclamation in memory of the pleasures of the day.
"'Well, my son,' said the father, 'what have you done with your money?"
"'O, father,' returned the son, 'I have enjoyed myself most exceedingly. The first thing I did, was to place one piece of gold in the poor-box at the market-place,—then I sought my companions, and together we have passed the day at Sfombal's khan in feasting and conversation. Wit sparkled over the surface of our humor, but we forgot not ourselves in merriment, for each imparted to the other all he had gained of wise experience, and subjects of import were brought forward and discussed. Indeed, father. I am sure I shall not soon forget the joys of this day.'
"A smile irradiated the parent's features as his eldest son finished, and just then the younger son entered the apartment. There was no flush upon his cheek, there was no joy sparkling in his eyes, but a serene quiet pervaded his features, and a peaceful smile of inward satisfaction
 tion rested like a ray of golden sunlight upon his face. He would have passed on to his chamber, but his father called him back and asked him how he had spent the day and his twenty pieces of gold.
"'I will tell you,' replied the youth, 'but perhaps you will say that I have been foolish. When I went forth this morning I knew not how I should pass the day. I felt that it was to be a day of pleasure, but, alas, I could think of no new pleasure within my reach. Every day beneath the roof of my father brings with it all that can make life pleasant. While I stood upon the corner of the market-place, my attention was arrested by the appearance of an old woman, who stood gazing with an almost tearful eye upon a piece of coarse meat which a butcher's dog was devouring. The whole expression of her countenance seemed to be concentrated into the one desire for that piece of meat. Curiosity led me to approach her, and laying my hand upon her arm, I asked her what she desired. For a moment, she gazed into my face with a kind of vacant stare, and then, more to herself than to me, she murmured,—"Food, food,—food for my sick husband and my little ones!"
"'I asked her no more questions, but immediately changing one of my pieces of gold, I bought meat, and bread, and a jar of milk, a bottle of wine, and a rush basket in which to carry them. It was some time ere I could make the woman comprehend that these articles were for her, but when she did understand it, she poured forth her thanks, and lifted the basket to depart, but it proved too heavy for her, and I offered to carry it home for her. She joyfully accepted my offer, and as I placed the basket upon my arm, she led the way to the outskirts of the city where she entered a small house which, though humble in the extreme, was still neat and clean, and the interior, though giving place to the most meagre furniture, was in a tidy and cleanly condition. In a single room were three small children and her sick husband. I soon heard the story of their sufferings, and I knew that I heard the truth. My heart waxed warm with joy as I saw the husband and father rise up in his bed, and grasp the food and drink which had thus been sent him; and when those little children gathered around with their grateful looks, I could not repress the tear of gladness that started to my eye. Ere I left I forced upon them my remaining nineteen pieces of gold. I dared not stop to receive their flood of thanksgiving, but bidding them turn their thanks to God, I hurried away. When it grew dark I felt a curiosity to go once more to that part of the city and see if I could hear aught of their situation which I might further help. I arrived at their door, and at that moment the sound of all their voices in unison fell upon my ear. Through a crack in the panelling I could see all that passed. The father had arisen from his bed and had fallen upon his knees,—his wife knelt beside him, while the three little ones were also upon their knees with their hands clasped toward heaven. Together they poured forth their prayer, in earnest, heartfelt sincerity, and O, how my heart leaped when I knew that that humble, honest prayer 
was going up to Heaven for me!
 I—I, was the object of their prayer. That old man and woman, and those three children, were calling down blessings from God upon my head. I turned away towards my home, a wiser and a better youth, and in the sweet memory of that moment, when I stood by that humble door and heard the prayer of that relieved family going up to Heaven for me, dwells a fount of joyful recollection which earth may never take from me.'
"As the younger son closed his story, the father brushed the tears from his aged eyes and clasped the youth to his bosom—then turning to his first-born, he said:
"'My son, tell me, which of you has planted the sweetest flower in the memories that shall cling to this day?'
"The eldest son bowed his head for a moment, and then looking up with a frank expression, he murmured,—'My brother, my brother.'"
Noureddin listened eagerly to his teacher's simple tale, for in such manner it was that
 Abdah Nazor was wont to convey his choicest instruction, and at the end of a few moments' silence, he said:
"Now I see, good Abdah, what you mean by plucking the flowers of life, and I see, too, how men must learn their duties from the casual events of existence. But now I would have thee tell me, why it is that thou hast ever shown such solicitude for me, who am but a poor corn-seller's son?"
"The cause is simply this, my child," returned the old dervise: "At your birth the stars combined to fix the destiny of the newborn infant, and to me it was revealed that Heaven's favors were intended for you. How I gained that revelation I cannot now tell thee, but can only inform you that it became my imperative duty to bestow upon you the best of instruction. As far as my lessons can avail, I believe I have done all that is required of me, but yet you shall receive such further wisdom as I may from time to time find opportunity to bestow; as for your education in the more manly exercises—in the use of the steed, the sword and the spear, I have procured the best tutors that I could find, and I believe that few men can excel you. Your destiny is yet to be written out in history. The mountain of life is before you, and to you it belongs to carve out the foot-holds that shall support you to the top. But come, the sun is already past the meridian, and you have a toilsome journey before you to reach the city. I shall see thee again ere long."
Noureddin stooped over and buckled his light sandals upon his feet, and then arose from his seat. He would have liked to ask his tutor further questions, but he knew that the old man never spoke save when he chose. What Abdah Nazor once pronounced a secret was sure to remain so.
The youth took a cooling drink from the dripping spring, received the parting embrace of his kind preceptor, and then drawing his sword-belt more tightly around his loins, he started to descend the mountain.
CHAPTER II.
Noureddin, and his history. The descent of the mountain. The frightened eunuchs. The king's message. The entrance to Petra.
WHEN Noureddin had attained the age of eight years, Ali Kinah consented to relinquish all claims upon his time, and gave him in charge to Abdah Nazor, and under the tutorship of the wise old dervise the boy had grown to a man. At the time of which we write, the master had continued his mental guardianship for the space of ten years, and now the youth had reached the boundary of his fixed studies. During this time he had mostly resided with his father, save a few months in each year which he had spent among the mountain fastnesses; but his master's lessons had been ever with him, and he had devoured them with avidity. Still Noureddin knew not why such care was bestowed upon him. His father was not really poor, but yet he could ill afford to lose the assistance of his son, much less to give that son the means to pursue his studies further; but for all this the corn-seller labored hard for his child, and the slightest wish on the part of the youth was sure to be answered by the father. Ali Kinah loved his son, and he felt a peculiar pride in beholding his mental and physical developments; and the son loved his father, too, with a pure affection, and he promised himself that he should yet see the day when he might be able to repay his parent for all that he had done.
Slowly did Noureddin pursue his course down the mountain, sometimes overleaping wide chasms, and sometimes letting himself down from crag to crag by his hands. Few were there, even among the goat-herds at the foot of the Seir and Hor, that could navigate the rugged passes that led up the sides of the mountain, and even to those who knew the way the inducement must be very strong ere they would venture upon the perilous ascent. But to this very exercise did the youth owe much of his strength and elasticity of limb, and the labor had become almost a pastime.
The sun had already dipped upon the desert-bound horizon, when Noureddin reached the foot of the mountain, and for some twenty rods his path lay through a narrow defile, the sides of which were festooned by the oleander and tamarisk which grew out from the crevices in the
 granite walls. The high rocks cast a deep shadow over the ravine, and as the youth entered it the extremity seemed almost lost in gloom. His mind was busy with a thousand thoughts and emotions, and he hardly realized that he had entered the Eblian pass till he came near losing his footing in the dusky gloom. The past ten years were laid open like a scroll to his mind, and with a sort of inward satisfaction he dwelt upon the scenes therein contained; but through the whole he could see no event that was fraught with bitter recollections. Once more he dwelt upon the kindness of his father, and once again he digested the lessons of his aged tutor. There was a feeling of melancholy gradually creeping over his soul, as he thought that he should no more be the companion of Abdah Nazor; but then the assurance that he should yet receive occasional lessons somewhat lightened the burden of his mind, and again the image of the kind old dervise brought nought but pleasing recollections to his mind.
Noureddin had advanced two-thirds of the way through the pass, when he thought he heard a rustling among the shrubbery to his right, and partly from curiosity, and partly from the novelty of the circumstance, he stopped to ascertain its cause. The place where the youth had stopped was not more than three feet wide, save one small cove which made into the rock, and which was flanked by a few wild fig trees and running vines. Here it was that Noureddin had heard the noise, and drawing his sword from its scabbard he moved the branches one side and looked in among the shrubbery. Hardly had he done this, and before he could penetrate the gloom, when a voice from the darkness cried out:
"Ah, good Eblis—good Eblis!
The name for his Satanic majesty. Hence the pass was called Eblian, because the people believed that when the devil escaped from Moses he had cut his way through this rock in his flight to Mount Hor, and a popular tradition said that even now he often passed whole nights in the pass, to protect his imps and 
jackwins
 who revelled among the mountains.
 let us go, and we will depart in peace!"
"Then out you come," shouted Noureddin, who saw at once the character of the lodgers, at the same time feeling a desire to see who could have taken such a place for repose. "Come out on the instant, or it shall be the worse for you."
In a few moments, the head and shoulders of a powerfully built man emerged from the shrubbery, and as he stepped forth from the cove he was followed by two more individuals equally as stout.
"This way, this way," cried Noureddin, as he saw that the nest had been cleared, and with his sword still drawn in his hand be led the way to the outer entrance of the pass.
He could not repress a light laugh when the frightened men stood revealed before him, for most mortals would have taken either one of them to have been the very individual of whom they had been in fear. As the light fell upon their burly forms, they proved to be three of the king's black eunuchs.
"Now, what seek ye here?" asked the youth, who at first thought that the follows might be trying to escape from their master.
"We seek a youth who went up the mountain early this morning."
"Ah, and what might have been his name?"
"He is the son of Ali Kinah, the poor corn-seller, and is called Noureddin," returned the chief of the eunuchs.
"So, so," Noureddin said, somewhat surprised by the strangeness of the incident; "and who has sent you for him?"
The eunuchs looked at each other for a moment, and then turning to the youth, the leader replied:
"Our business is with the son of Ali Kinah."
"And did you think to find him in yonder dark hole?" returned Noureddin, with a sneer; and then drawing his light javelin from its becket at his back, and balancing it in his left hand, he continued:
"Now tell me who wants Noureddin?"
The eunuch instinctively drew his yataghan from its sheath, but in a moment it was flying
 from his grasp by a well-aimed blow of the youth's sword, and starting back a step, he cried:
"The king—the king! Does the 
king
 want him?"
"Yes."
"And has the king sent you for him?'
"He has."
For several moments Noureddin revolved this circumstance over in his mind. Why the king should send for him he could not determine, but of two things he felt confident: First, that the king 
had
 sent for him, for the presence of the chief of the eunuchs was proof enough of that; and secondly, that no harm could be directly meditated upon him, for in no way had he ever come in contact with aught that could tend to implicate him unfavorably. So without further hesitation he said to the eunuchs:
"Your silly fright of Eblis came nigh rendering your journey fruitless, but as it is, the man whom you seek stands before you. Now tell me what the king desires of me?"
"Do you speak the truth, sir?" asked the eunuch, gazing with a sort of wonder upon the young man.
"I am Noureddin, the son of Ali Kinah, the corn-seller. Now answer my question."
"That we cannot do, master, for the king has not given to us further instructions than merely to call you to his presence."
"Then lead on, and I will follow you," replied Noureddin, as he placed his javelin back into its becket, and returned his sword to its scabbard.
Modad had been upon the throne of Petra for thirteen years, and during that time he had established a character for tyranny and a revengeful disposition, which led the people to be very careful how they crossed him. Merolboth, the former king, left his people no heir to his throne, and upon his death, his only brother, Modad, succeeded him, but in his reign he had shown none of those kingly virtues which characterized the sway of Merolboth. Noureddin knew the king's disposition too well to disobey his summons, and consequently he resolved to accompany his guides to the royal palace, wondering what could be wanting of one like himself, who had never been within the palace walls, and who, moreover, had never come under the eye of the monarch.
It was nearly dark when the youth and his guides reached the entrance of the narrow, rugged pass that led into the city, but a word from the eunuch procured a passage by the soldiers who guarded the way, and without further molestation they passed on. Perhaps the earth does not afford another such awe and wonder inspiring spectacle, taken with all its associations and connections, as did this entrance to the famed city of Petra. Its width was not more than sufficient for the passage of two horsemen abreast, while on the sides arose the perpendicular walls of rock, from four to seven hundred feet high, which, in many places actually met at the top, thus forming a gigantic cavern which forever excluded the rays of the sun, and which, at the same time, served as a vast continuation of temples, tombs and dwellings, cut and hewn out of the solid rock. For two miles this path descended towards the city, while the rock on either hand proportionately increased in height; but when, at length, the pass was cleared, the scene that burst upon the eye almost beggars description. Golden towers and silver domes flashed in the light, temples, monuments and obelisks arose in towering grandeur on every hand, while seated in the midst of the vast city, like a crystal amidst the sparkling sands, stood the royal palace. Splendid indeed was this vast emporium of Eastern wealth and grandeur, and mighty was the monarch who ruled over her destinies, however much he might have abused the power that had fallen upon his shoulders.
CHAPTER III.
The Petran king and Noureddin's interview. The Egyptian eunuch's strange conduct. A startling development of regal plotting.
DARKNESS had succeeded to day, when Noureddin and his guides entered the palace, and after waiting a short time the youth was conducted into the king's presence. Modad sat upon an easy lounge of crimson and gold, raised upon a platform of ivory and porphyry, with no attendants save two mutes who stood one on each side of him. The atmosphere of the apartment was laden with the richest perfumes, and the monarch himself gave evident signs of the perfect abandon to which he resigned himself. At a sign from the king, the eunuchs who had conducted Noureddin to the palace withdrew, and the youth was motioned forward. For several moments the king gazed upon the noble form of the young man before him, as though he sought to read his character from his looks, and once or twice a sort of shudder passed through Modad's frame as he met the keen, bold glance of his subject. Noureddin noticed his monarch's manner, and a vague idea of some sinister designs insinuated itself upon his mind; but fear was a stranger to his bosom, and banishing all needless surmises, he fastened his gaze steadily upon the king.
"You are the son of Ali Kinah," said the king, at length, after he had sufficiently scrutinized the youth.
"I am, my king," replied Noureddin, in a firm and manly tone.
[SEE ENGRAVING.]
The monarch started from his lounge, and the mutes instinctively laid their hands upon the hilts of their yataghans. Noureddin dropped his hand upon his sword-haft, but he moved not. Modad settled back into his former position, the mutes dropped their hands by their sides, and the youth awaited his monarch's pleasure, but not, however, without a feeling of astonishment and wonder at what had happened.
"Your father is not wealthy," said the king, as he once more regained his composure.
"He is poor, sire—quite poor, and honest."
"Then, methinks his son should assist him," remarked Modad, struggling hard to keep down the strange emotion that started up in his bosom.
"My father, sire, has governed me as he
 thought proper. In all things have I obeyed his wishes."
"That is well," returned the king, who seemed to have thrown off the perturbation that had at first affected him; "but I have an office for thee, which may afford thee opportunity to repay thy father somewhat for the trouble of your education, for I have learned that your mind is well stored with early wisdom, and that your limbs are well tuned to the use of the sword and javelin."
"Sire," modestly returned the youth, "I shall deem it an honor to perform any 
honorable
 service for your majesty. You may command me."
The king may have hesitated a moment ere he answered, but the hesitation was hardly perceptible.
"Young man," he said, "the duty which I shall require of thee will be honorable, and thousands there be of my subjects who would eagerly accept the office."
"Then why not give it into the hands of some one who has more experience than I have?"
"The business I have to entrust to thy care," replied the king, "is one that requires tact and knowledge of a peculiar kind, united to courage and individual skill, and from what I have learned of thee, I am confident that you will be just the person. You can retire for the night, for I shall send for thee early in the morning."
"Then your majesty knows where my father lives?"
"No."
"Then how will you send for me?"
"Ah, it is not my pleasure that you should leave the palace. Rooms are prepared for you near at hand, and you shall have a sufficient equipment."
Noureddin knew not what to make of this, but as he often spent weeks together in the mountains with his preceptor, he had no fear that his father would be uneasy at his absence, and, moreover, feeling a kind of love of adventure creeping over him, he readily assented to what was required of him, determined, however, that in case he found the business such as accorded not with his honor, he would drop it.
At a simple motion from the king, one of the mutes left his side and soon returned with three black eunuchs, who conducted the youth from the imperial presence. Noureddin was led through long corridors and sumptuous suits of apartments, displaying a scene of magnificence and grandeur such as he had never before seen or even conceived of, until at length he arrived at the place where he was informed he was to take up his quarters for the night. After conducting him into the apartment where a richly covered bed was spread for his use, the eunuchs left him to himself. One of them, however, seemed to hang behind his companions, and betrayed an evident desire to stop, but as the eyes of the others were upon him, he hesitatingly followed them out.
As soon as Noureddin was left alone, he began to reflect upon the strange circumstance that was now on the tapis; but his was a mind not given to fruitless conjecture, and after a little thought he dismissed the subject from his mind, save that of course, the subject matter formed the principal object of his thoughts; but he saw only the past and present—the future he left to the care of his God.
Ten minutes might have passed since the door had closed upon the youth, when a light grating was heard, like the unbolting of a door beyond, and in a moment more the eunuch, who had betrayed such evident desire to remain behind his companions, re-entered the apartment. As he closed the door behind him, he gazed cautiously around, and then laying his finger upon his lips he approached the bed and sat down upon it, motioning for Noureddin to do the same.
"Be quiet," said the eunuch, in a low, trembling tone, as the young man seated himself upon the edge of the bed, "for if I were to be found here, my head would be food for the eagles ere another sun. Be assured that I am thy friend."
"My 
friend!
" repeated Noureddin, in surprise. "And have I enemies?"
"I know not that you have 
enemies
," returned the eunuch, with a peculiar emphasis. "The lamb that we offer at the sacrifice has no enemies, and yet you well know its fate."
A shudder ran through the young man's frame, but wherefore he knew not. The eunuch continued:
"I know not that the—the— You will be secret?"
"Go on," answered Noureddin, somewhat surprised at the hesitation and strange manner of the visiter. "If you are my friend, you need never fear that I shall betray you, and if you are aught else than a friend you had better leave me."
"You have more friends in Petra than you may imagine," returned the eunuch, without seeming to notice the manner of his companion. "I, among others, have promised to Abdah Nazor, that I would watch over your interests. Why he asked the duty of me I know not, but I gave him my promise, and I will fulfil it."
"Go on, then, and trust me as you would your own soul," returned the youth, as he heard the name of his beloved tutor. "He who comes from Abdah Nazor needs no other passport to my confidence."
"Then," resumed the eunuch, in a more confident manner, but still cautiously keeping his eyes and ears open for the detection of approaching danger, "I will inform you of all that has come to my knowledge. I know not that the king meditates evil against you, but still, circumstances have conspired to make me think so."
"But surely," interrupted Noureddin, "such cannot be the case, for until an hour since Modad never saw me, face to face, nor have I ever been—"
"Hold, a moment, young sir,—I will soon explain the matter to your understanding, and then you can judge for yourself. The king of Khaibar has threatened to march against our city, and even now he has an army prepared for that purpose, his only object being to possess himself of a portion of our wealth, of which he stands greatly in need. Modad dares not engage him."
"Dares not engage him!" exclaimed Noureddin, starting from his seat upon the bed, while a flush of indignation mounted to his brow. "Do you mean to say that our monarch 
dares not
 engage the dastard Khaibarite king—that Modad shrinks from the defence of his city?"
"That is the truth, my young master; but I pray you speak not so loudly, or we shall be overheard."
"But there must be some strange cause for this," said the young man, in a lower tone; "or is the base tyrant a still baser coward?"
"Modad is most assuredly a coward," returned the eunuch; "but still there is a deeper cause than that for his fear of fighting the king of Khaibar, though he thinks that none save himself, and Al-Bassa his chief counsellor and adviser, know of the fact. For two thousand years there has been in the possession of our monarchs a 
talisman
, by the virtue of which they have ever been enabled to conquer their enemies; and it is generally believed that no one can successfully lead our armies who does not possess it. When the good king Merolboth died, the talisman was nowhere to be found, though Modad gave out that he had it safely within his possession, and the people believe that he speaks the truth. The absence of this talisman has struck a dread to our king's soul, and without it he dares not fight his enemies."
"And what is this wonderful talisman?"
"It is a massive diamond, of such purity and brilliancy that even at night it gleams like a star. It is set just above the vizor of a golden helmet, and such is its power in the sunlight, that he who would strike the king who wears it upon his brow is so completely blinded by its brilliancy, as to lose the aim of his stroke. Now neither the diamond nor the golden helmet has Modad ever possessed, and he dares not stand forth in defence of his city, and consequently he has made the most base and degrading overtures to his enemy in purchase of peace."
"And does the king think to see me carry his designs into execution?" exclaimed Noureddin. "Does he think to make me a tool of his baseness?"
"He certainly does," replied the eunuch; "but he has tempered his designs upon you with a little kindness, nevertheless."
"Ah," uttered the young man, gazing into the dark face of his companion with a good degree of curiosity.
"Yes," calmly responded the black messenger—"he means not that you shall live to bear the disgrace of the deed."
Noureddin started from the bedside, and his hand rested significantly upon his sword-hilt. There was a fire in his eye, and a proud flush upon his noble brow.
"Do you know the nature of this message?" he at length asked.
"Yes. Modad has agreed to send to the Khaibarite king two camels' loads of gold, and one of amethysts, pearls, rubies and diamonds; but the most villanous part of the compact is, that our monarch gives to his eastern enemy one of our fairest virgins as a slave. Selina, the daughter of Al-Bassa, the counsellor, is to be the victim, and the poor old man dares not oppose Modad's will. The king of Khaibar has asked this latter sacrifice only to humble the pride of our people by holding one of their noblest born maidens at his pleasure. But to carry out this plan, without exposing to the people the contempt that was being cast upon them, was no easy matter. Modad dared not entrust the business to any of the officers of the city, for in such case his villany would become known; so he has been for the last five days seeking for a youth whose parentage was obscure, and whose loss would create no noise or excitement, and who, at the same time, was well educated, brave, and of good address. Such an one, you must be aware, was hard to find; but at length his emissaries brought him intelligence of you, and he at once set about finding you. To you, then, he intends to intrust the business, and a party of some twenty eunuchs, besides a number of his trusty slaves, are also to accompany you."
"
Whose loss would create no noise!
" thoughtfully murmured Noureddin, to himself, as his companion ceased speaking. "Then he does indeed meditate my speedy exit from earth?"
"Your fears are well-grounded, my young master."
"My 
fears
, say you? The God of my fathers alone I fear—not man."
The eunuch gazed with a sort of wondering admiration upon the noble features of the young man, and at length he said:
"Perhaps there is no occasion for fear, for you may easily escape the danger which threatens you. Of one thing I am certain: you will be safe with your retinue until after the message is delivered at Khaibar; but there is reason to believe that on the way home some of the slaves are instructed to murder you. You now know all, and you can govern yourself as seems best to you, but I advise you to accept the trust from the king without hesitation."
"Do you accompany the embassy?" asked Noureddin.
"Yes," replied the eunuch.
"And what is your name?"
"I am called Molech. I am an Egyptian by birth, and was brought hither by Merolboth four years before his death. I have since served Modad."
"How learned you this of which you have told me, and why do you betray your master?" asked the youth, as he cast a searching glance into the face of his companion.
"There is no need that you should know 
how
 I obtained my information," answered the Egyptian, without hesitation; "but I will tell you why I betray the king. Abdah Nazor has often befriended me, and once he saved my life. He asked of me that I would protect thee as far as lay in my power, but why, as I have already told thee, I know not; neither do I know how the old dervise ever supposed that you would be in danger from the king."
Noureddin retired to his bed, but it was a long time ere he slept. He pondered upon what he had heard, and his heart beat quicker as he thought of the indignity that was about to be cast upon the city, but he could frame no plan of procedure—circumstances alone, as they might occur, could guide him.
CHAPTER IV.
The youth receives his instructions. The fair Selina and her father. The maiden's sorrow. The wish. The sacrifice.
THE sun had not yet peeped over the rocky environs of Petra when Noureddin was aroused from a deep reverie into which he had fallen, by the unceremonious entrance of two eunuchs, who informed him that the king awaited his presence. The youth had already performed his morning's ablutions, and he immediately followed the messengers from the apartment. The king received him in the same room as before, and as the youth entered, there was a troubled look upon the monarch's brow.
"You are up betimes," remarked Modad, as the young man made his obeisance.
"Little sleep suffices for me, your majesty," replied Noureddin.
The king drew his hand nervously across his brow as the youth's voice fell upon his ear, and with an anxious look he gazed into the young man's features. Noureddin noticed his monarch's manner, and though he was surprised at it, yet he betrayed not his feelings, but with a firm, steady gaze he awaited his instructions.
The eunuchs were dismissed, and with the exception of the two mutes, the king and his subject were left alone.
"Do you know the intricacies of the mountain-path to the eastward?" asked the king.
"Yes," returned Noureddin.
"Then your services will be invaluable in the business I have in hand."
Modad then went on and explained to the young man the duty that was required of him. The account was the same in its aspect as that of the Egyptian eunuch, but from the king's lips the affair bore an entirely different coloring of detail, it being made to appear that the gold and jewels were for the payment of a debt of long standing, and that the maiden, who was to go under his protection, was the affianced bride of the Khaibarite king.
"Yet," said Noureddin, as the king closed, "I see not why some of your experienced officers might not perform this mission much better than myself."
"I have no officer whom I can trust, that 's at all acquainted with the mountain passes, and I dare not send the equipment over the desert. I have heard of your dexterity and address, and if you perform this mission satisfactorily, you
 shall receive a high station as your reward, for I desire to gather around me all the most deserving of my subjects."
The king half averted his face from the steady gaze of his young auditor during the latter part of his remark, and Noureddin instantly saw the cowardly disposition with which he had to deal.
He was more than ever confirmed in the belief of the eunuch's statement, and he knew, also, that there was no use in questioning Modad further, for the monarch could give no clear reason for his extraordinary choice of an ambassador, and our hero had no desire to excite his suspicions as to his own designs and feelings.
The king placed in Noureddin's hand the letters that were to be delivered to the neighboring monarch, and as the young man placed them within the folds of his shirt, Modad said:
"I believe you have now your full instructions. I desire that you will keep along the western pass of the Hedjaz, and follow the foot of the mountains as far as possible, which I suppose may be kept until within a few leagues of Khaibar. The maiden whom you are to protect, is of a timid nature, and she desires that she may see no one but her attendants, so of course, you will not intrude upon her privacy. She will be under the immediate attendance of ten of my most trusty eunuchs, and you will not interfere with their guardianship. Your retinue is already drawn up outside of the city, and two of my slaves who are to accompany you will direct you to the spot."
A slight curl of disdain rested upon the lips of the youth as the king ceased speaking, for the whole plan was so glaringly inconsistent with the nature of the professed embassy, that Noureddin could not help seeing it. Frequently did the king have occasion to send off a retinue of his slaves on various errands, of the nature of which, the people were ignorant; but it was something unheard of for such a business as the present to be left in the hands of menials. A curious equipment, thought Noureddin, for the negociation of peace between two kingdoms! He kept his counsel to himself, however, and readily followed the two attendants who had been summoned to conduct him away, but before he went, he failed not to notice the fiend-like exultation that dwelt upon the king's countenance.
While Noureddin follows his conductors out of the city, let us look into the dwelling of Al-Bassa, the king's counsellor. In a sumptuous apartment, hung with crimson drapery, and ornamented by elaborately polished mirrors, reclined the form of a fair and beautiful maiden, while by her side stood an old man, down whose furrowed cheeks the traces of recent tears were still visible. About the countenance of Al-Bassa there was nothing that could indicate the harsh or unfeeling man, but there was a sort of timidity—a kind of womanish fear, that ill accorded with his reputed wisdom. People often wondered that so timid a man should be retained as the king's counsellor, but they knew not how his very timidity made him the more acceptable tool in the hands of Modad.
Selina raised her eyes to her father's face, and cast upon him such an agonizing, imploring look, that he turned away to hide his emotions. She was beautiful, transcendently beautiful—her eyes were large, soft and lustrous, her features almost heavenly in their expression, and her form like the airy gazelle in its graceful turnings; but alas! her beauty had been the cause of the first sorrow that dimmed the bright sunshine of her joyous youth. Boljaz, king of Khaibar, had seen her, and in his heart he had determined to possess her. Already had he cause of offence against Modad, and as soon as he became aware of that king's character he had threatened a war against Petra, and the reader is aware how Modad had arranged to compromise.
"O, would that the sun had blighted me at my birth, ere I should have come to this," murmured the fair girl, as she pressed her hands against her throbbing temples.
"Be calm, my daughter," urged the old man, while he struggled hard to keep down the feelings of the parent. "Boljaz will surely love you, and treat you with all kindness."
"And I to be his 
slave!
" bitterly cried Selina, gazing up into her father's face—"his boughten slave—his mere bauble, to pander to his appetite for the time, and then be cast off like a beast! O, God! what misery has fate kept in store for me!"
Al-Bassa laid his trembling hand upon his daughter's head, and brushing away the tears that started forth from his aged eyes, he said:
"Remember, my child, you save your father's life."
"But why, why—tell me 
why
 this is required," exclaimed Selina, forgetting for the moment her deep anguish, in the eagerness to learn the cause of such strange procedure. "I freely give myself to save my father, but how can the king have your life in his hands?"
"Ah, my child, you know little of Modad's power and disposition. At the present moment he feels that his very kingdom is at stake, and you alone can save it. To me he looks for the gift of propitiation, and he holds my life as the forfeit."
For a moment, the crimson tide rushed up into the face of the fair girl, and rising from her seat, she said, while a look of utter contempt flashed from her eyes:
"Would that God had made 
me
 king of Petra, no dastard neighboring monarch should have 
dared
 to cast such contempt upon me and my people."
Al-Bassa gazed upon his daughter with a sort of wondering admiration. His soul was in agony at the sacrifice he was about to make, and he would readily have given the last mite of his earthly possessions to have averted the blow, but he dared not give his 
life
, nor did he dare to rebel against the cowardly wickedness of his king.
"Come, my child," at length said the old man, while he trembled at every joint, "time flies swiftly away, and the hour is already at hand when you must depart."
Again Selina sank upon the couch and buried her face in her hands; but it was now in vain that she tried to weep. The deep, burning grief that scorched and seared over her soul burned up the fountain of her tears, and from her almost broken heart nothing came forth but rending sobs. The remorseless gates of a worse than Tartarian prison had been thrown open before her, and to its soul-scaring flames had she been consigned. She could have looked upon the cold and flinty prison-house as a paradise, when compared with the fate that now awaited her; but she knew that her father's life was at stake, and with all her power she tried to command her native fortitude to her support. But, alas! her woman's heart shrank from the fearful sacrifice as the timid child would quail before the gloomy, ghost-peopled forest, and with her brow, her face, her neck and her bosom, all changed to marble, she arose from her couch and bade her father lead the way!
The old man trembled fearfully, and started back in agony as he beheld the change that had come over his daughter's features. His father's heart bade him be a man, but fear made him turn away his head; and bowing beneath the blow he dared not resent, he led the gentle being who had been the joy and blessing of his home, the bright sunlight of his joys and sorrows, forth like an unresisting lamb to the sacrifice!
CHAPTER V.
Al-Bassa and the king. The monarch discloses his plot. The unexpected intruder. His remarkable knowledge, and Modad's emotions therefrom. The fatal signal, and the strange interposition.
MODAD had seen his messenger depart for the court of Khaibar, and in view of his success thus far he tried to quell the turbulent feelings of his bosom, but there was a certain misgiving that he could not banish from him. He had not moved from the couch upon which he reclined when Noureddin received his instructions, and a kind of moody reverie seemed to engross his senses. The two mutes stood like statues by his either side, save that occasionally they would cast a sidelong, furtive glance at their master, as if to see what was moving in his mind, for so long had these speechless attendants been watchful of the least beck of the monarch that they seldom failed to read his inmost thoughts. They were powerful fellows, and Modad seldom felt fear of immediate personal danger while they were near him.
Darker grew the cloud upon the king's brow, and more evident became the workings of his internal doubts and fears. At length he arose from his couch and began to pace to and fro across the mosaic pavement of his apartment. The mutes drew back to the heavy drapery of the wall, and tremblingly they watched the every motion of their sovereign, for they feared to miss the first nod that he might make for their services.
A dozen times had the king crossed the apartment, when the deep festoons at the entrance were thrown aside, and an eunuch bowed low before him.
"How now, slave?" cried Modad, as he recovered from the first shock which the sound of footsteps had struck upon his guilt-strung nerves.
"Al-Bassa asks to be admitted to your majesty's presence."
"Then let him approach," replied the king, while a slight curl of the lip told in what esteem he held his counsellor.
'I give thee a fair day," uttered Al-Bassa, as he entered his sovereign's presence; but the deep misery that dwelt upon his countenance plainly towed that mere habit begat the expression.
"You look sorrowful, my trusty friend," said Modad, as he once more reclined upon his
 couch, and cast an inquisitive glance upon his counsellor.
"I have suffered enough to make any man sorrowful," replied Al-Bassa, vainly endeavoring to hide his emotions. "This day have I plucked out the apple of my eye and thrown it to the four winds—the bright star that for years has lighted my feet in the path of peace and joy has left its orbit forever, and my house is no longer my home. My feet tread upon sharp pointed rocks, and the sting of remorse has pierced my soul. The deep dwellings of the dead, high up in the mighty caverns of the rock, should be now my abode, and the scorching sands of the driving simoon should be my only food."
For a moment the king seemed to feel for the deep sufferings of his counsellor, but the emotion soon passed away, and a frown settled upon his brow. Al-Bassa saw that frown, and throwing off the melancholy that sought for utterance, he continued:
"But let my suffering pass. My sacrifice has saved my king and—"
"
Yourself
," added Modad, at the same time casting a meaning glance upon the old man.
Al-Bassa started as the simple word of the king grated upon his ear, but quickly regaining himself, he continued:
"Perhaps you speak the truth; but at all events, the sacrifice has been made—I have delivered up my beloved child, and you—you have paid out from the city's treasury money and jewels enough to have reared an imperial throne in the midst of the desert. But we are not yet safe. If the people should know that their monarch had feared to meet his enemy—"
"
Feared!
" interrupted Modad, while the frown upon his brow grew darker.
"I know that your majesty had cause for that fear," timidly explained Al-Bassa, as he quailed before the look of Modad; "but surely you would not dare to explain that cause to the people?"
"And what need will there be of that? I surely would not have my subjects know that the King's Talisman is lost to the city, nor do I intend that they shall. You and myself are the only two who know of the fact."
A quick shadow flitted across the face of Al-Bassa as the king spoke, but the emotion that called it forth was quickly quelled, and in a slightly tremulous tone he said:
"There may be tattlers among those whom you have sent to Khaibar."
"None that I am ignorant of," rather dryly returned the king.
"And this youth to whom you have given the business—how know you that he may not tell of the nature of his embassy?"
"He cannot."
"
Cannot?
"
"No."
"I do not comprehend," said Al-Bassa, who had not yet conceived of the fell purposes of the monarch.
"Do you suppose I have done all this without understanding the nature of the ground upon which I stand?" returned Modad, while a demoniac look of exultation overspread his features.
An inkling of the truth began to penetrate the old man's mind, and he looked inquiringly at the king for an explanation. Modad seemed to comprehend the meaning of that look, for he soon continued:
"You need have no fear of the fidelity of those whom I have sent to Khaibar, for but few of them will ever live to return. Ten of my Nubian eunuchs, upon whom I would trust my own life, will bear me tidings of the success of the mission. The rest will never live to re-cross the desert! The Nubians have steel and poison, and they well know their use!"
A cold shudder ran through the frame of Al-Bassa, as he comprehended the bloody scheme of the king, nor could he hide his disgust and disapprobation.
"'Tis bloody business," he murmured, half unconsciously.
"But not half so bloody as might be the business it prevents," returned Modad. "But come," he continued, half rising from his seat, "you may rest assured that not one word of
 what has happened will ever be known to the people, and now I would have thee go to my treasury and fix the new account of our gold and jewels. Your ingenuity will suggest the statements that are necessary."
Al-Bassa bowed low in token of acquiescence, and soon withdrew from the monarch's presence; and Modad, when he saw his counsellor depart, knew that the bands were already loosened which had bound the old man to his interests, but his principal aim had been accomplished, and he tried to persuade himself that he could now get along without his counsellor's assistance.
Modad still reclined upon his couch after Al-Bassa had left. It wanted a good hour yet of the time at which he gave audience to the citizens, and he was upon the point of seeking his gardens, when the purple arras was once more drawn aside, but instead of the eunuch who guarded the entrance to the apartment, the aged form of Abdah Nazor, alone, unattended and unannounced, stood revealed in the king's presence. Modad sprang half up from his couch, but an instant's reflection told him that he had nothing to fear from a decrepit old man, and his first emotions of sudden alarm gave place to a kind of haughty anger.
"How now, thou prating babbler?" cried the king, as he looked fiercely upon the intruder. "Who conducted thee hither?"
"A spirit to whom you are a stranger," calmly replied the old dervise, looking the angry monarch steadily in the eye.
"Ha, and do you beard me? Do you come hither with your mystic prating?"
"No, false monarch, I come to warn thee of the sure vengeance of the true God," said Abdah Nazor, not at all moved by the wrath of the king.
Modad was almost speechless by the manner of his visitor, and for a moment he remained like one in a spasm, but he soon regained his power of utterance, and in a hissing, maddened tone, but still tinctured with fear, he exclaimed:
"Soothsayer, beware how you tempt me, for by the word of the living God, I swear that I'll brook not thy loose tongue. Now what brought thee hither?"
"I seek a youth, named Noureddin, the son of Ali Kinah."
A livid spot started forth upon the monarch's either cheek as he heard that name, and a slight tremor shook his frame, but quickly throwing off his outward fear, he replied:
"What know I of the youth? If you would learn of his whereabouts seek the depths of that mystic lore from which you profess to derive such wonderful information for the ear-tickling of an ignorant, superstitious people."
"Modad," uttered the dervise, in a calm, meaning tone, while he fixed his piercing eyes full upon the monarch, "
I have sought the mystic lore!
"
"And what learnt ye?" asked the king, with a vain attempt to appear unconcerned, but while, in reality, a deadly pallor overspread his features, for the fame of the old dervise of Mount Hor was too extensive, and his general character and popularity too well and widely established, to render his sayings light or unmeaning.
"Shall I tell thee what I learned?" asked Abdah Nazor.
"Speak—but beware how you speak," returned the monarch, fairly shrinking from the two sharp eyes that were bent upon him.
"Then listen, Modad! I learned that thou didst not dare to fight the dastard king of Khaibar—that thou didst rob an old man of his daughter, and moreover that thou didst even lay hands upon the jewels of Pharaoh's sacred crown, to appease the avaricious Boljaz. Nay, speak not, but hear me out," continued Abdah Nazor, as the frightened monarch started and gasped for breath. "The poor youth whom I have educated thou hast consigned to death—to an ignominious, cruel death. Thus much I have learned from my mystic lore. Have I learned rightly?"
During the first part of the old man's saying the king had writhed like a criminal beneath the rack, but ere it was closed his face assumed a fearful expression, and starting up from his couch he exclaimed:
"Old man, your knowledge is so correct that thou hadst better by far have been ignorant of its purport, for with it you go not hence alive!"
As the monarch spoke, he stepped back to the wall and made a sign to the two powerful mutes. That sign they had obeyed before, though not often, but they knew its fatal import, and quickly drawing their sharp yataghans they started forward.
Abdah Nazor saw that sign, but he quailed not before the advancing mutes; and they, even, who had never before hesitated to obey the nod of their imperative master, stopped short as they met the glance of that old man. But again they caught the sign of command from the king, and with a sort of hissing noise they sprang forward. The old dervise raised one hand high above his head, while with the other he drew from his bosom a bright-skinned serpent which he cast upon the pavement before him. The venomous reptile reared aloft its broad, flattened head, and like two sparks of intense flame gleamed its eyes upon those who advanced.
A quick cry, like the screaming of some frightened bird, escaped from the lips of the mutes, and shaking like storm-riven reeds at every joint, they shrank back by the side of their king. In vain was it that the enraged monarch gesticulated and commanded, but he could not persuade the terrified menials to stir from their retreat. In the gleaming coils of that folded serpent their untutored souls recognized the fell spirit of evil, and they would have bared their breasts to the deadly steel ere they would have advanced one step upon the precincts of the old man's guardian.
Modad had depended upon the mute slaves, and dreamed not that they could fail him, but in his own heart he had not the courage to face that weak old man, and he, too, cowered away from the strange scene before him. Abdah Nazor stretched forth his hand. The serpent laid his neck over his wrist, and with a sudden bound he wound himself around the old man's arm.
"King," said the dervise, as he turned to depart, "for the present your secret is safe with me, but beware how you trifle further with the trust that your subjects have reposed in you."
Modad started half madly and half wildly from his place, but the dervise had gone. He would have followed him, but he dared not. He would have called upon his attendant eunuchs, but he would not trust them with a knowledge of his then present state of mind, for his ten Nubians—his most trustworthy slaves—had gone. Only the two poor mutes had been witnesses of the scene, and their tongues were tied in eternal silence. Modad gazed for a moment vacantly upon the arras where the old man had disappeared, and then sinking back upon his couch, he sought to gather his half scattered senses, while the terrified slaves stood trembling by his side.
CHAPTER VI.
Noureddin's retinue. The pavilion. The attack and the battle. The Nubians, and their behaviour. The fearful punishment and its effects.
WHEN Noureddin left the presence of the king, the two eunuchs led him by a short, but unfrequented route, out of the city. At the outer extremity of the pass a servant was in waiting with three horses, one of which was most richly caparisoned, and which was presented to the youth, while the eunuchs mounted the others and rode on, to the southward and eastward, a distance of two miles, where our hero found most of his retinue drawn up. He was not long in espying Molech among the black eunuchs, and a feeling of comparative relief possessed him as he felt that he had one companion, at least, upon whom he could depend; but at a sign from the Egyptian the youth approached him not, nor did he betray any token of having particularly recognized him.
Most of the attendants were mounted upon horses, only those who had charge of the camels being without them, and they now only awaited the arrival of the ten Nubians with the maiden. At length the equipment of the fair Selina hove in sight, and instinctively the eunuchs prepared for the start. Such as were upon the ground leaped into their saddles, and those who had charge of the camels mounted to their seats. The maiden's conveyance was a close pavilion, formed of the valley cedar, and so completely covered with crimson tapestry that no eye could penetrate beneath it. This pavilion was supported between four trained camels, by means of stout leathern bands which passed over the animals' backs, and from thence underneath the pavilion. It was sufficiently capacious for comfort, and was, in fact, a gaudy affair. The Nubians were powerful fellows, mounted upon coal-black steeds, and five of them rode on each side of the maiden's conveyance. As Noureddin saw these ten slaves, and marked their countenances, he could not help feeling a sort of instinctive dread creeping over him. It was not fear, for he felt assured of his own superiority, but it was the same feeling as that experienced by the brave man in beholding the slimy form of the subtle asp. Openly he spurns it, but he cannot repress a shudder when he thinks of the deadly poison it may impart unawares.
Upon the countenances of the Nubians,
 Noureddin could easily read the instinctive ferocity of their natures, and in their moody, sullen manner, he could easily recognize the ready tools of a pampering master. When, at length, the cortege started on its way, the youth knew that if the danger which the Egyptian had predicted was to be apprehended he might look for it from the Nubians, for in the very side-long glances which they furtively cast upon him, and in the mysterious signs and tokens which passed between them, he could read their covert designs.
Noureddin rode in front of the train, and at a moderate trot he wound along through the mountain passes. The sun gradually increased its heat, and as the rocks began to reflect the burning rays, the miniature caravan moved farther out from the mountains into a wild track in which the low shrubbery had not for a long time been disturbed. Along towards noon the young leader turned back in his saddle, and observing that the Egyptian rode near him, he beckoned him forward.
"Be careful, sir," said Molech, in a low tone, as he came up. "The Nubians are watching every motion of the train."
"Never fear for them," replied Noureddin. "If they dare to interfere, they may find themselves mistaken in the nature of the opposition they will have to encounter. But I wish to ask you the nature of my other attendants. I am well aware of the character of the Nubians, and I think I can read their mission; but I wish to know if they are alone—if, in case of trouble, they would receive assistance from the other attendants."
"There are only twenty of us, besides the Nubians," returned Molech, "and we all have directions to obey you in every particular, and besides, I assure you that those ten men have no love from the rest of us. They are Modad's particular favorites, and towards the other slaves they exercise a haughty superiority. But," continued the Egyptian, as he cast a furtive glance back of him, "you must not think of escape or violence till we arrive at Khaibar, for though the Nubians might receive no assistance from the rest, yet none would dare to oppose them."
A peculiar look rested upon the young man's countenance as the Egyptian delivered this caution, but he made no answer. He seemed to have gained the intelligence which he sought, and with a slight inclination of the head he motioned Molech back into the train.
The sun had been two hours past the meridian, and the train had just emerged from a somewhat narrow pass between two high cliffs, when Noureddin's eye fell upon a party of horsemen about a mile ahead of him. As near as he could judge there were nearly twenty of them, part of whom were mounted, while the remainder were on foot holding their horses by the bridle. They had no luggage of any description, and as he brought them nearer to view, he had no hesitation in setting them down as a detachment of Bedouins who roamed the desert and mountain tracks in quest of plunder, and as he came nearer still his belief was confirmed, for the dismounted Bedouins immediately sprang into their saddles, and he could easily see that they were holding a hurried consultation.
The young leader halted his train, and he found that the eunuchs were all aware of the character of the strangers, for they had loosened their spears and javelins and cast off their shields from their backs. The horses themselves understood the movements, for they braced themselves proudly up and curved their graceful necks for the onset. The maiden's pavilion was placed in the rear, with the Nubians still by its side, while the remaining followers were drawn up in order of defence. Noureddin chose not to move further forward, for his present position afforded him the best means of safe combat. On one side arose a towering rock which jutted out some rods behind them in a craggy kind of wall, thus affording a good depository for the camels and pavilion, but beyond this the way was open on all sides. The Bedouins understood the nature of this movement, and with their spears at rest they dashed madly on towards our hero and his band.
The eunuchs sat firmly in their saddles, and
 they received the shock without flinching. The king had been wise in selecting the men who were to protect the wealth he sent, and Noureddin found that his followers were as brave as he could desire. At first the Petrans only acted on the defensive, but as this could not be long carried on with safety, Noureddin cried out to his followers to charge their enemies, and settling his long spear back into its socket, he drew his heavy sword and led on the attack. Two of the Bedouins fell beneath his strokes, and he had just cleft in twain the spear of a third, when the Egyptian cried sharply in his ear:
"See! the Nubians do not fight!"
Noureddin drew back his steed, and an exclamation of indignation burst from his lips as he saw the ten stalwart Nubians stationed inactively by the side of the pavilion. Casting a hasty glance at the enemy to see that they were gaining no vantage, he galloped up to the spot where the powerful blacks sat upon their horses, and hastily exclaimed:
"Set forward, dastards, to the rescue."
"We protect the king's maiden," coolly replied the Nubian leader, seeming not at all inclined to notice the young man's order.
"I will answer with my life for the maiden," replied Noureddin, while his eyes flashed fire.—"Now on to the charge, and our enemies will be overcome ere you strike a dozen strokes."
"We are at our post, sir," calmly and half insultingly answered the black.
"Will you charge the Bedouins?" cried the youth, reining his steed closer up to his hand, while his cheek paled with the indignation that raged within him.
"No. We are under the 
king's
 orders."
"Once more I say, charge! or, by the holy powers of heaven I will cleave you to the earth!"
The Nubian leader moved not, save that he inclined his horse a step back, but a look of impudent defiance rested upon his features as he said:
"You dare not."
The Young Lion of Mount Hor cast one flashing glance around upon the blacks, and then raising himself in his stirrups he swung his sword high in the air. Its bright blade gleamed an instant in the sunlight, and as it descended the Nubian's head fell in halves upon either shoulder—the heavy carcase swayed to and fro for an instant in the saddle, and then rolled off upon the sand.
"On! on!" shouted the aroused lion, as he dashed his steed forward, and again raising his sword. "On, or you shall fall here!"
Had Noureddin quailed, or even hesitated, it might have proved fatal to him, but there was something in his determined manner—a sort of power in his flashing eye, that the startled blacks were not used to meeting, and then, as their eyes fell upon their leader's clefted skull, they instinctively shrank back from the lifted sword, and in a moment more they were engaged with the common foe.
The Bedouins had already begun to give out beneath the onset of the first charge, but when the Nubians came on to the attack, and Noureddin returned to his post, they fell back, wavered for a moment, and then turned their horses' heads and gallopped off across the desert.
Once more the Petran train was in order of travel; only four had fallen in the conflict, and one of those had sunk beneath the blade of their commander, while ten of the Bedouins had paid for their avarice with their lives. The nine remaining Nubians resumed their stations by the side of the pavilion, but they wore not the haughty bearing that had characterized them before. As their eyes rested upon the young lion who had so utterly overcome them, they seemed to sink into a sort of trembling fear, and ever and anon a hurried whisper of consultation would pass among them. Noureddin noticed their movements, and he was not slow in comprehending the subject of their eager whispers.
The young man, had he been without a clue to the mystery of the final destination marked out for him by the king, might never have suspected that of which he was now confident; but being sure that some of his train were under instructions to put him to death as soon as convenient
 venient after the mission had been performed, he had not the least doubt that the Nubians were the appointed murderers, and he also felt convinced that their present movements were in some way connected with that event; but from their every appearance he easily saw that the fearful lesson he had given them had not been without a salutary effect, and the other eunuchs, too, were much influenced by the occurrence. They looked upon the young man with wondering expressions of countenance, plainly evincing by their manner that the summary removal of one who was obnoxious to them had given them intense satisfaction.
CHAPTER VII.
Selina and her attendant. Miriam's strange source of consolation. The power of a king not always in the ascendant.
THE sun sank behind the mountains and left behind it a perfectly cloudless sky. A light, breezy vapor arose from the mountain base, where the rippling springs gushed forth from the rock, and the gentle zephyr wafted it away over the spreading desert, leaving, as it swept by, a cooler and more grateful temperature in the atmosphere. It did not grow dark, for as the luminous nebula that lingered over the sands began to lose its soft brilliancy, the lesser lights of heaven set themselves upon their night-watch, and like distant tapers they twinkled and gleamed in the overarching vault.
The fair Selina, with a single female attendant, reclined upon a small couch in her travelling pavilion, from whence she had looked out but once during the day, and that was during the battle with the Bedouins. She felt the change in the atmosphere, and she knew that the sun, with its burning heat, had gone.
"Miriam," she said, in soft, melancholy accents, "do you not find it cooler now than it was?"
"Much cooler," replied the attendant. "Night has fallen around us."
"Then the stars must be shining. O, would that I might look upon them."
"And can you not?" asked Miriam, gazing up with surprise into her mistress's face. "Surely they would not refuse you such a boon."
"Ah, Miriam, they will refuse me everything. To-day, when I would have looked forth to take a last view of the high walls that shut in my native city, I was rudely bidden by the eunuch who has chief guard of my person to look not forth again."
"And is that the manner in which the intended wife of a king is treated by slaves?" uttered the attendant.
"
Wife!
" quickly repeated Selina, while a fearful shudder ran through her frame; but she caught the wondering expression of her companion, and quickly added:
"Even a 
king's wife
 may not be at full liberty among slaves."
Miriam gazed long and earnestly into the face of her mistress, and a new idea tried to struggle through her mind, but it was so repulsive that she could not entertain it. She knew that Selina went not willingly as the wife of the Khaibarite king—but she could not, she dared not, believe that her fate was worse than that; yet she could not comprehend the fair maiden's manner without some such grounds, and laying her hand affectionately upon her lady's arm, and raising her eyes in a supplicating manner, she said:
"Selina, you have some griefs that you have told me not of. O, why will you not trust me with all?"
"I dare not," murmured the unhappy girl, as she bowed her head forward and rested it upon the shoulder of her sympathizing attendant.
She saw that she had given her secret wings, and as she raised her head and met the almost horrified look of her faithful servant, she determined to unload her heart, and with a bursting, thrilling soul, she poured out the tale of her griefs. Miriam listened with a blank expression, for the sensations she experienced during Selina's recital were so deep, so intense, so weighty upon her heart, that her feelings arose not to her features. But when her mistress closed—when the lips that had uttered that horrible tale were still, she threw her arms around the neck of the doomed being and burst into a passionate flood of tears. This was the first outpouring of her feelings, but on the next moment she dashed the tears from her eyes and started back to consciousness.
"Selina," she said, in a calm, but yet powerful tone, while the brilliancy of her dark eyes told of the intensity of her feelings, "surely you do not mean that this shall be?"
"Alas! my Miriam, I cannot help it."
"You 
can
 help it," exclaimed the noble-hearted girl. "How know you that he who leads us on our way may not be possessed of a heart?"
"Whoever he may be," returned Selina, "he has no immediate control over me. The king's own Nubian guard—those ten eunuchs that do his slightest bidding—have the sole guidance of our motions."
For a moment, Miriam was silent, but at length, while her cheek turned a shade paler, and her nether lip trembled with a slight convulsion, she said:
"God has left you one way of redemption. In your own hands He has placed the key of your virtue and purity."
Selina gazed inquiringly into her companion's face. Miriam read her unspoken question, and her answer, though equally as silent, was startlingly significant.
She placed her hand within her bosom, and from the folds of her jacket she drew forth a short dagger, and as its blade gleamed in the struggling star-beams that peeped through the top of the pavilion, Selina instinctively grasped it. A moment she held it in her hand, and then dropping it upon the floor, she murmured, hesitatingly:
"No, no, that cannot be. A thousand times would I prefer it to the fate that awaits me, but my father might fall a sacrifice upon the altar of my own salvation."
"No—the king 
dare
 not do it. Modad is a villain, but God knows he is a greater coward. I tell thee, the base monarch will never dare to take your father's life. No, no, my mistress—let us wait till the last, but if the worst comes, we will die together."
"Hark, hark, Miriam," quickly exclaimed Selina.
At this moment a confusion arose just by the side of the pavilion, and bending eagerly forward the two girls listened to ascertain, if possible, its cause.
When the sun had first set, and the stars had begun to twinkle in the sky, Noureddin rode at the head of the train, but as the cool air swept over the sands and played around the rocks, and the filmy curtain of night dropped its folds upon the earth, the young man drew in the reins of his steed and turned to take a view of his cortege. As he rode past them the eunuchs bowed in token of the respect with which he had inspired them, and our hero plainly saw that in his immediate attendants, at least, he possessed hearts that were all his own; but when he came to the rear of the train and wheeled his horse about, he was not slow in perceiving that the Nubians were anything but pleased at his presence. They were not insolent, however, in their bearing, nor were they inclined to watch too narrowly the motions of their young guide, for though they loved him not, yet they feared him.
Just as Noureddin came up opposite to the pavilion, after he had turned his horse back towards the head of the train, his quick ear caught the sound of deep and heavy sobs within the
 tapestried conveyance. A flash of quick determination passed over his countenance as he heard that weeping, and his heart beat quicker in his bosom.
"The lady needs this fresh, invigorating air," observed Noureddin, in a calm tone, which utterly hid the feelings that moved him.
The remark was addressed to one of the Nubians who seemed to have been chosen as their leader, but he returned no answer, save a sort of sullen glance of resistance.
The horses of those who had fallen in the combat with the Bedouins followed close upon the rear of the train, and calling one of them to him, Noureddin led him forward to the side of the pavilion; but as he approached, the Nubians gathered around the entrance, seeming determined to resist any effort of his for the comfort of the fair inmate.
"Perhaps the lady would like to take a short ride on horseback, for in good truth she must be much fatigued by such close confinement," said the youth, in the same calm tone.
For a moment the Nubians gazed upon each other with quick, meaning glances, and then he who had been acknowledged as the new leader, answered:
"I know not what authority the king gave you over the Egyptian eunuchs, or over the course of the train, but our orders with regard to the two ladies were positive."
"
Two
 ladies?" iterated Noureddin.
"The lady and her servant, sir."
"Then they may 
both
 have horses."
"It cannot be."
"I said that both of the girls might take an airing in this cool breeze if they desired it. I will ask them."
The youth spoke in a firm, decided tone, and as he closed, he advanced towards the pavilion. The Nubians gathered closer around the entrance, and they seemed determined that no such project should be carried into execution.
"The king's power sustains me, and his orders must be obeyed," uttered the Nubian leader, as he drew his lance and settled back in his saddle.
"The 
king!
" cried Noureddin, with a bitter sneer, as his heavy sword flew from its scabbard. He was now fairly aroused, and turning his flashing eyes around, he continued:
"Back! back! I say. I tell thee, slaves, that my power upon the mountain track is mightier than the king's, and my vengeance is as sure. You have seen the fate of him who dared this day to oppose me, and you had better beware how you tempt the same fate!"
The Nubians were powerful men, and they were by nature brave—but they were 
slaves!
 For years they had moved at the will of an imperative master, and they had learned to bow instinctively before superior authority. Their governing motive was fear—they met danger in a thousand shapes through fear of greater danger from the wrath of a master, and he who could gain the control of their slavish fears might conquer them. Thus it was with Noureddin. His bold usurpation of authority, and his open avowal of a power greater than the king's, and above all, the determined, dreadful punishment he had already dealt out to one of their number, touched the chord that reached their governing principle, and as he once more turned his flashing eyes upon them they cowered beneath the look, and backed their horses from the pavilion.
Noureddin drew aside the heavy tapestry, and gazing in upon the inmates, he said:
"Fair ladies, the night is cool and pleasant. The stars light our path, and the gentle zephyr plays around our way. We have horses to spare, and if a short ride would please you, the privilege is yours."
Selina and her attendant had been listening to the conversation without, and they had heard the bold language of their youthful conductor. A grateful, hopeful emotion had sprung up in the bosom of the fair girl, and when Noureddin addressed her, and his mild, kind tone went thrilling through her nerves, she could not suppress the cry of delightful relief that arose to her lips. In an instant, the saying of Miriam came back to her mind, and she felt that her conductor had not only a 
heart,
 but that he also
 had a power which even the Nubians dared not gainsay.
"O, kind sir," she uttered, as soon as she could command her speech, "if I could but receive one short respite from this narrow confinement, I should be ever grateful."
Noureddin turned to one of the Nubians and bade him bring forward another of the horses that were following them. The black may have hesitated a moment, but no more, for he quickly turned his horse's head and soon returned with the steed.
The drivers stopped the camels, and leaping from his saddle, Noureddin handed Selina and her attendant from the pavilion, and assisted them to their saddles. Then mounting his own horse, he bade the train move on.
"Come, lady," he said, as he turned his gaze upon the fair maiden, "let us ride on to the front of the train. Your Nubian guard will protect the pavilion, while I, for the time, take charge of its jewel."
Beneath the dim starlight, Noureddin could see the rich blood mounting to the cheeks of the fair being, and as he gazed upon her beauty, made doubly thrilling by the grateful look that beamed from her eyes, emotions which had never before moved him entered into his soul. His nerves waxed stronger than ever—his heart beat more quickly, and yet more firmly, and in his bosom the lion had slumbered but to gain a tenfold strength when again aroused by those who would crush the gentle flower that was blooming by his side.
Upon the Nubians he hardly bestowed another thought, but leading the way on past the Egyptian eunuchs, he soon resumed his station at the head of the train, while the Lady Selina and her attendant rode by his side. The young man gazed with a new-found rapture upon the fair girl, and she, as her eyes rested upon the noble features of her new protector and friend, could not but feel that they belonged to one who would assist her if he had the power, and she even allowed a gleam of hope to light up her soul for an instant, as the half drawn picture flitted before her mind. But, alas! that gleam of hope found no surface upon which to reflect its light, and as she looked forward to the horrible future that awaited her she turned away her head and wept.
Noureddin saw those tears, and he saw the heaving of that fair bosom, but he could frame no words of comfort for immediate utterance, though he knew full well whence came that grief. At the end of an hour, the party reached a small oasis, where a gentle spring bubbled up at the foot of a huge rock, and while Selina sought her pavilion, the young man disposed his party for the night.
Long after the fatigued eunuchs had fallen asleep, save those who kept watch over the camels, did Noureddin pace to and fro upon the edge of the oasis. Half uttered sentences fell from his lips, and ever and anon he would stop, as though some startling thought had entered his mind. The sentinels watched his strange movements, but they dreamed not of the purpose that was growing up to life beneath his meditations.
Selina had sought the repose of her couch, but sleep came not to her eyelids. Her mind was busy with the events of the past, while the gaunt spectre of the future sat like an incubus upon her soul.
CHAPTER VIII.
The second interview between the youth and the lady, and its results. The spy. The king's plans are known. A timely warning.
BEFORE the sun had rolled up from its mountain bed, the Petran train was once more in motion, and during the forenoon it kept on its way unmolested. At noon, Noureddin halted for a short rest, and then put forward again. Another sun had rolled its scorching, burning way over the earth, and another evening had followed with its cooling breath. Twice during the day had the youth looked in upon the fair Selina, and now that he had seen her beauty by the broad light of day, he was more than ever enraptured by its entrancing power.
Few, indeed, there are, who can gaze upon the transcendent loveliness of the virtuous female without a feeling of admiration; but when that loveliness and virtue are being crushed beneath the despot's heel—when that beauty is softened by tears, and the soft eye grows softer still in its melancholy light, then it is that the noble, bounding heart of youth swells with sympathy and kindness, and the soul of humanity grows strong for the defence. Then it is that that subtle power may take possession of the soul, and mould and fashion its destinies forever afterwards.
Once more Noureddin sought the side of the pavilion, and ordered one of the Nubians to lead forward the two horses. The blacks offered no resistance now, but as though they had been brought up beneath the sway of the youth did they move at his will. Yet there was a look in their quickly moving eyes—a sort of snake-like expression, that betokened a feeling they did not choose to express. They were like whipped curs—they obeyed, but they did it upon compulsion, and the lurking demon in their eyes only slumbered for the time being.
As the fair girl now rode by Noureddin's side, they both felt more free and unconstrained than they had on the preceding evening. The one felt happy in affording a momentary pleasure to his companion, and the other felt grateful for a noble kindness. A kind of mutual confidence had sprung up within the genial warmth of their hearts, and as they now gazed upon each other, both seemed for the moment to forget the past, with its varied scenes.
"Lady," said Noureddin, as he drew his horse nearer to the side of his companion, "would you dare to trust me with the full secret of your present position?"
Selina started in her saddle, and the reins trembled in her hand as she met the strange look that beamed from the young man's eyes. The stars alone twinkled above them, but they gave light enough to reveal the youth's meaning expression. The maiden spoke not, and Noureddin continued:
"Fear not to trust me."
"O, sir, I do not fear to trust one like you, you have been too kind already;" cried the grateful girl, as she turned her tearful eyes towards her companion.
"I have a reason for asking you," Noureddin said, marking with pleasure the peculiar tone of his companion's answer.
There was something in the young man's manner, in his tone and bearing, that inspired the maiden with a vague idea of some approaching aid, and while her hand grew steadier in its rein-hold, she replied:
"You must already be aware, kind sir, that my present destination is a source of the deepest misery to myself, and of course much against my desires."
"Then why have you come?"
"Alas! I could not help it. The safety of my father is to be the price of my sacrifice."
"'Tis hard for me to comprehend the nature of the man who could thus consign his child to the utter—"
Noureddin did not finish his sentence, for at that moment he caught the glance of his companion fixed upon him with such an imploring look, that he would not pain her by the remark he was about to make; but without appearing to notice the effect his language had had, he immediately said:
"But tell me, fair lady, how is it that your present position affects your father's safety?"
"The king," she said, after a moment's hesitation, "has demanded me of my father."
"And has the king threatened him in case of refusal?"
The fiery flash that shot forth from Noureddin's eyes as he asked this question, made Selina start.
"He 
has
 threatened," she at length replied, "and even with death."
"Unless you married the Khaibarite king," added the young man.
"
Married!
" cried the fair girl, starting as though some hidden serpent had darted its head in her way. "
Married!
 O, God! would that it were so."
"But still," continued Noureddin, striving hard to sustain a calmness he did not feel, "you would not 
desire
 even to 
marry
 Boljaz?"
Not a shade in the countenance of the young man betrayed the emotions of his soul, but when he met the look which Selina cast upon him—a look made up of the most intense anxiety and prayerful inquiry, he melted from his assumed mood, and stretching forth his hand until it rested upon his fair companion's arm, he said, in a firm, meaning tone:
"Fair Selina, I know full well the fate which is designed for you. I received the information through a private source ere I received my charge from the king, but until the present moment I could hardly realize its truth. Now I tell thee, as sure as the one true God reigns in heaven, you 
shall not
 go to your destruction!"
The lightning may leap through its track in the heavens, but it leaps not more quickly than did the thrill that bounded through the frame of Selina as these words fell upon her ear. She met the calm look of her companion, and she saw, as the starlight revealed its lineaments, that no idle, meaningless thoughts were imaged there. Beneath that calmness she could see a will which could only die in the grave of him who conceived it; and while she yet gazed upon his face, she murmured, half unconscious of what she said:
"Shall not go! O, who, who can help me?"
"He whom the king has hired to carry thee thither," replied Noureddin, as he turned his head to see that he was not overheard from behind
 hind. "Modad little knew his ambassador, when he engaged me. No, lady, you shall not go to Khaibar."
For some time Selina dwelt in silence upon the strange words of her companion. She was almost afraid to comprehend their full meaning, lest the hope which they pointed out should be dashed down again; but still she could not fail to understand that the young man intended her release, and as soon as the idea became clearly defined in her mind, she said:
"O, sir, if you could save me from this dreadful fate, and not doom my father to his death, I know your own kind heart would reward you; but I would not sacrifice my parent to the king's wrath, even to save myself."
"Fear not for your father," returned Noureddin; "for the king dares not put his threat into execution. Modad has not the courage to do the deed. He may threaten, but that is all."
"Ah, kind sir," replied Selina, with a mournful tone, "you know not what a coward can do in secret. His mutes never tell tales."
"That may be true," Noureddin said; "mutes may not tell tales, but the saying that 'dead men tell no tales' is false, for they do sometimes tell most fearful tales. But let me assure you that harm shall not come to your father—my own life shall be the forfeit ere he dies."
"Yet there is another obstacle, and, I fear, insurmountable," returned Selina, seeming by her manner to accept her companion's assurance.
"What is that?"
"The Nubian eunuchs."
"I have studied my plans," said the young man, in a confident manner, "and I can judge pretty nearly upon what to depend. I have watched the Nubians, and I think I know all of their mission. But we must let the matter rest now," continued Noureddin, "for here is our resting-place for the night. Let me hope that you will rest to-night with the assurance of a happier time to come, for I can warrant you a brighter sun yet to rise."
Selina raised her eyes to her companion's face. They were filled with tears, but through the flood the heart poured forth a load of thankfulness that could not be mistaken. Shortly afterwards she called Miriam to her side and sought the shelter of her pavilion, while the retinue halted at the oasis and disposed themselves for the night.
Though the Nubians laid themselves down to rest, yet for a long time they kept up a low, but earnest conversation, and calling Molech quietly to his side, Noureddin bade him crouch as near as practicable to the pavilion guard and ascertain, if possible, the subject of their consultation. The young man felt no hesitation in trusting the Egyptian, for he knew him to be true to his interest, and as soon as the friendly eunuch had gone, he sat down by the side of his horse to await his messenger's return.
For full half an hour had Noureddin sat thus, when he was aroused from a half dreamy slumber into which he had fallen, by the weight of a hand upon his shoulder, and springing suddenly to his feet he beheld the Egyptian.
"—
st!
" uttered the eunuch, as he cast his eyes fearfully around. "Make no movement. Lay down by the side of your horse while I kneel by the side of my own."
Noureddin obeyed without a question, for he saw by the manner of Molech that something startling had occurred. His own horse lay so as to hide him from the view of the Nubians, while that of the Egyptian was next to him.
"Now," said the young man, in a low, cautious tone, as soon as he had arranged himself as requested, "what have you heard?"
"I have heard the whole plan with regard to yourself and us. The king has laid his plans deeply. He intends that only his Nubians shall ever return to Petra alive."
"Did you hear this from the lips of the Nubians?"
"Yes, sir—within the last half hour. I obtained a most fortunate location for overhearing, nor had they suspicions that an eaves-dropper was so near. They have instructions from the king to murder us all as soon as we get fairly on our way from Khaibar."
"So I have thought," returned Noureddin, not at all startled by the information he had received; "and now that I have proof of it, my course is clear."
"But the Nubians have now laid out a plan for themselves," said Molech, as he bent over as near to his leader as possible; and then dropping his voice still lower, he continued:
"They intend to poison 
you
 ere we reach Khaibar.
"
Me!
" uttered Noureddin, almost thrown from his guard by the suddenness of his feelings.
"Yes," answered the Egyptian. "They have overheard a conversation between the lady and her attendant, from which they apprehend that you meditate her release, and as they feel assured that their own lives must be the forfeit in such case, they have come to the determination to poison you before you can carry your plans into execution, and then perform the king's mission themselves."
"And this you overheard to-night?"
"Yes."
"Then," said Noureddin, "my plans must be hastened. Sleep you by my side to-night, Molech, and on the morrow, ere the sun shall rise, be you up among our own eunuchs. You know their dispositions, and can handle them. Tell them of all that is meditated against you and themselves, but not a word of this last plan. The Nubians will naturally think that you are making preparations for the start, if you are careful. Meanwhile I will arrange matters for action."
Molech nodded assent, and stretched himself upon his blanket, while Noureddin sank his head back upon his horse's neck, and gazed thoughtfully upon the stars that sparkled above him.
CHAPTER IX.
A mysterious visitant, and his diabolical work. The leader's deadly experiment. The interruption, and the chastisement. The villains dare not face their intended victims.
IT was after midnight ere Noureddin fell asleep, but even then his senses were not entirely locked up in slumber, for not a long time had elapsed before he was aware of the movement of some one about him. He had been careful to lay himself in such a position, as to be able to command a view of his whole train without moving, and as soon as he was assured that his first waking suspicions were correct, he slightly loosed his eyelids and peeped cautiously out. A stealthy, cat-like tread fell upon his ear, and he could plainly distinguish a dusky form just bending over from the other side of his horse. Not a movement betrayed his knowledge, but keeping his eyes fixed upon his mysterious visitor he narrowly watched his motions.
As soon as Noureddin's sight became more inured to the darkness, he had no difficulty in making out his neighbor to be one of the Nubians, and of course he failed not to comprehend the purpose of the black's visit. Gradually the fellow raised himself further over Noureddin's horse, and eagerly listened, but the young man's breathing was deep and steady, and in a moment more the Nubian reached his hand over and began to fumble about the saddle. Once or twice he drew his hand back and listened more anxiously, but at length, seeming to feel assured that the youth slept soundly, he drew forth the water-pouch, into which he placed some kind of powder from a small box which he carried, and having placed the pouch carefully back into its place he lowered his head behind the horse, and stealthily crept away.
Noureddin now saw the full scope of his present danger, but he had the game entirely in his own hands, and he calmly resigned himself once more to a kind of watchful slumber, which was not again disturbed until the eunuchs began to move about him.
Molech took it upon himself to fill the water-pouches of the Egyptian eunuchs, and as Noureddin watched his motions he could plainly perceive that he was performing his mission. The blacks received Molech's intelligence with startled expressions of countenance, but not a single glance towards the Nubians betrayed the knowledge they had gained. Each one's hand dropped
 ped significantly upon his sword-hilt, and the muscles of the wrist told, in their silent language, how much meaning there was in the motion.
"Molech," said Noureddin, shortly after the train was in motion, as he beckoned his faithful follower to his side; "how received your friends the intelligence of the Nubians' plot?"
"Just as I supposed, sir; they are prepared to resist to the last."
"But will they stand by me, and obey my orders?"
"Yes, every man of them."
"Good," ejaculated the youth, as he noticed Molech's confident tone. "Now, ere another sun shall set, our train shall be on its way back to Petra."
"To Petra!" exclaimed Molech, in utter astonishment.
"Yes—to Petra."
"But you will not surely throw yourself into the very jaws of the king. You will not expose yourself to certain death."
"No." returned the young man, while a look of confident power rested upon his features, "I shall expose myself to no more danger by returning than I shall by proceeding. In either case my presence on earth will be dangerous to the king, and he will not fail to seek my own life as well as yours."
"But how will you proceed when you arrive at the city?" asked the Egyptian. "The king will then have you within his very clutches."
"Not so easily as you imagine," returned Noureddin. "This business upon which the king has entered has placed himself in a very critical position, and you may rest assured that he will be slow in making a noise about it. My plan of operations is not yet wholly marked out, but I tell thee that no harm shall come upon your heads. Outside of the city there are plenty of secret caves, and among these you can abide in safety until you can with equal safety enter the city."
For some time the Egyptian remained in a silent, thoughtful mood, but at length he said:
"You can lead the way—the Egyptians will follow."
"I thank thee," exclaimed the youth, as he received this assurance; "and now fall back among your companions, but be you in readiness to obey my least bidding."
Shortly after Molech had wheeled back to his station, Noureddin turned his horse towards the rear of the train. The Nubians cast nervous glances upon him as he rode past them, nor did the youth fail to understand their inquisitive meaning. The riderless horses still followed, and taking one of them by the bridle, the young man led him forward to the head of the train, in full view of his followers, when he turned in his saddle and ordered a halt. All looked with wondering eyes upon the strange movements of their leader, but without seeming to notice the inquiring looks that were cast towards him, he proceeded to carry out the design he had conceived.
Taking from one of his attendants a leathern bucket, which was used for watering the horses, he poured into it the contents of his own water-flask, which had been filled at the spring where they had stopped for the night, and then held it out for the horse which he had just brought up from the rear. The animal drank off the water almost at a draught, and in a moment more Noureddin vaulted into his saddle and motioned for the train to start on, still leading the riderless horse by the bridle.
"What means that?" asked Molech, as he rode up to his leader's side after the train was once more in motion.
"You will see ere long," replied Noureddin, still keeping his eyes fastened upon the motions of the animal he led. If I am not mistaken the time for action is near at hand."
"Ah!" ejaculated the Egyptian, while a ray of intelligence flashed athwart his features; "and have they begun so soon?"
"We shall see."
Hardly had Noureddin spoken when the steed stopped and turned his large eyes around upon the man who led him. A quick shudder passed through his heavy frame, but he soon became quiet, and at a gentle pull of the bridle he started on again.
Molech saw in an instant what had transpired, and he was just upon the point of speaking when his attention was arrested by the approach of one of the Nubians, who had loosened his spear from its socket and brought it nearly down to its rest.
"Look out!" uttered the Egyptian, in a quick, startling tone. "Look behind you!"
Noureddin cast his eyes behind him, and saw, within twenty yards, the advancing Nubian, with his clutched spear.
"How now, slave!" cried the youth. "Back on the instant!"
The Nubian took no notice of the order, but still he advanced. His eye was not fixed upon the young leader, but upon the horse which he led. Noureddin saw this, and he at once suspected the fellow's design to be to kill the horse ere it should fully exhibit the effects of the draught he had taken, and drawing his left hand rein quickly in, he brought his own steed between the black and the intended victim.
"Back to your station, I say!" again exclaimed Noureddin, while he took the reins of both horses in his left hand, and laid his right upon the hilt of his heavy sword.
The Nubian, however, seemed determined to follow up his plan, for a fiercer fire flashed from his dark eye, and he grasped his spear with a firmer grip, as he turned his horse's head in so as to pass the youth.
"Do you mean to obey me?" asked Noureddin, in that quiet whispering tone which goes before the thunder's burst.
As Noureddin spoke the Nubian drew back his spear, and drawing his horse by a dexterous movement out from the reach of his leader's sword, he prepared to strike the fatal blow at the poisoned stud; but he had to deal with one as quick as himself. The youth made no movement to overtake him, but dropping his sword-hilt into his left hand, he whipped the light javelin from its rest at his back, and quick as the travel of light he let it fly from his hand. The Nubian's lance fell forward with a slight inclination of the hand that held it, and as its head struck the sand, the powerful black grasped the javelin that still quivered in his heart, as if to draw it forth, but the muscles relaxed—the hand fell powerless—the dark eyes rolled wildly in their sockets, and on the next instant the Nubian rolled off upon the sand. Noureddin bent over and drew forth the javelin from its fatal home, and then turned his attention to the poor steed that had been the unwitting cause of what had just passed.
A second spasm, more fearful than the first, now shook the horse at every joint, and with a most imploring, beseeching look, he turned his head towards Noureddin. In that poor brute's look there was something that thrilled the youth to the very soul, and he felt sorry that he had thus consigned him to his death. The suffering animal moaned most piteously, while from its mouth and distended nostrils a kind of yellowish foam was issuing in small drops, and with heaving, spasmodic throes he endeavored to swell his lungs with life-giving air.
Nearer and nearer drew the wondering Egyptians around the dying horse and the dead man. At first they had marvelled at their youthful leader's conduct, but conviction now sat like a written scroll upon each of their countenances, and they trembled as they saw the death-agonies of that noble steed, for in the present fate of the brute they saw what had been provided for them. But they trembled only for a moment—on the next they grew stern and cold—their swarthy features would have looked almost like iron had not the fiery sparkle of their eyes lit them up with a sort of premonitory fire.
The Nubians came not near the spot, but at a distance they gazed upon the scene. Eight only were left, and they seemed to feel the weight of the hand that had been laid upon them for over and anon, as their eyes would rest upon the young Lion of Mt. Hor, a quick, nervous shudder might be easily seen in their muscles.
The horse began to fail fast. The bri of the eye was waning, and already he began to sway to and fro. Once more he reared, his head aloft—one violent convulsion shook his ful frame—he started forward with a bound, then falling back upon his ha
 with his fore feet still firmly braced, he trembled in his hold—his feet gradually loosened in the sand, his head drooped for an instant, and with a sharp, wild neigh he rolled upon the hot sand.
For a full minute all gazed in silence upon the dead horse, then Noureddin drew back a few paces and threw a quick glance around upon those who were gathered about him. Instinctively the Egyptians shrank from that flashing eye and knit brow, but they had nothing to fear, and drawing their reins more tightly in their hands they awaited their leader's pleasure.
Noureddin still held his sword in his hand, and laying its blade across his saddle-bow he exclaimed:
"You have all seen from whence came that animal's death. The poison was in my own water-pouch—placed there for 
me!
 What shall be the doom of those who have done it?"
At first the Egyptians gazed one upon the other in silence, but soon Molech gave utterance to a simple word. The rest caught it up, and with one voice they shouted:
"
Death! Death!
"
The Nubians heard that sound, and well they knew its fearful import. Two leaders had they already lost by one arm, and now they knew they had not only that arm against them, but also all the Egyptians. A hurried consultation, a mere word and agreement—passed between them, then drawing their horses into springing crouch, and catching their spears in their hands, they gave a quick cry, and on the next instant they were darting off with an arrow's speed across the desert. They had fled from the death they dared not meet!
Not until the Nubians were hid from sight by the cloud of sand and dust in the distance, did Noureddin move from his position—then he turned towards the pavilion, from the entrance in which the two girls were looking.
"Now, my fair lady," exclaimed Noureddin, 
 came up, "you are free. The tyrant's power is, for the present, at least, crushed, and your course shall be once more towards your native city."
"O, sir, and am I free? Shall I be carried again to my home?" uttered the fair Selina, as she gazed upon the man before her.
"If this right arm retains its strength, no earthly power shall prevent it," returned Noureddin, as he came nearer to the pavilion and dismounted.
"And my father—you said he, too, should be safe?"
"So I said, lady, and so it shall be," answered the youth, as he gazed in admiration upon the beautiful features before him. "You are released from a state worse than death, and your father shall receive you back again to his arms with joy and with safety."
As Noureddin spoke, he took the small white hand of the maiden within his own, and almost unconsciously he pressed its fair surface to his lips. It was not withdrawn, but when the youth would have trembled at his own temerity, he met the beaming, thankful expression of Selina's soft eyes, and he knew that she felt not offended.
In a few moments more, Noureddin had arranged the pavilion for the return, and as he turned from its side he experienced a sensation that had never before thrilled through his veins. That small, soft hand still burned upon his lips, and the peculiar glance of those two beaming eyes still pierced his soul—a glance in which there was much of thankfulness, and much of some other emotion which he dared not define to himself—at least, so thought Noureddin.
Once more the train was turned towards Petra. Noureddin rode at its head in a thoughtful, meditative mood, and for the time being he seemed almost to forget that he was not alone. A new path had opened before him. Its way was spread with green buds from which no rose had yet bloomed.
CHAPTER X.
The corn-seller. His trouble, and his visitor. A strange passage, and a stranger inhabitant. A plan is on foot for the circumvention of royalty.
IN that part of Petra where the stream that watered the city lost itself in the rocks, stood a small dwelling, connected with which, to the left, was quite a large corn-market. The simple cross-bar that guarded the front of the store was secured across the entrance, for the day had passed, and the season of trade had dwindled into the hours of rest. In one of the rooms of the adjoining dwelling—a room which overlooked the street—stood an elderly man, whose white jubbee and peculiarly turned turban at once betokened the corn-merchant. In one corner of the apartment stood a lounge, but it showed no signs of late use, for the dust of the last twenty-four hours had not been disturbed.
The man's head was bowed in grief, and as the long gray locks, that flowed out from beneath the turban, caught the rays of a small tallow candle that burned upon a projecting stone against the wall, they showed by their quick, vibratory tremulousness that the heart was beating with some painful emotion. At length the man raised his head and stepped to the window which overlooked the street, but ere he could open it to look forth, a footfall at the door arrested his attention, and as he turned back into the room he met the venerable form of Abdah-Nazor.
"Ali Kinah," said the old dervise, as he laid his hand upon the corn-seller's arm, "I find you bowed down by grief. What calamity bath befallen thee?"
"Ah, Abdah Nazor," replied Ali Kinah, seeming much relieved by the old man's presence, "my son, my son, has been taken from me."
"No, no, good Ali—you mistake."
"Mistake? And is he safe? Is Noureddin still alive?"
"Ay—or, if he be not, it is his own fault," returned the dervise, "for he knows all his danger, and none better than he knows how to avoid it."
"But where, where has he gone, and why?"
"He is on a message for the king."
"The king!" uttered Ali Kinah, exhibiting a degree of surprise mixed with paternal pride,
 "and has the king looked with favor upon the son of the poor corn-seller?"
A bitter smile rested upon the dervise's features as he replied:
"'Tis even so. Modad has chosen thy boy from out all his subjects as the one best fitted for his embassy. But list thee, Ali Kinah," continued the old man, while his face assumed a deeper expression, "I have come, not only to tell thee this—to assure thee that thy boy is safe, but also to warn thee that thou dost not speak of his absence to a living soul. Let not a word fall from thy lips that can betray any knowledge of Noureddin's whereabouts, for if thou shouldst it might be the worse for thee."
Ali Kinah gazed into the face of his companion with an expression of startled wonder. A vague sense of some hidden danger crept through his mind, but it was beyond his power to comprehend or define it.
"Tell me, Abdah Nazor," he at length said, "wherein lies my danger? If the king has looked with favor upon my boy, why can there be danger for me?"
"I have told thee there 
was
 danger," returned the old man; "and I have also told thee how to escape it. 
Perhaps
 the king's business is somewhat secret, and such as he would not like that you should know of, nor that you should ever know that the youth had been sent on it."
"But surely, the king knows that Noureddin possesses the secret of his business, and also that he is my child. Then why should he fear to have me know of it?"
"Modad has assured himself that Noureddin will not disclose the secret of his mission, even to you," Abdah Nazor said, in a tone so peculiar and strange that the corn-seller was startled at its sound.
Ali Kinah laid his hand upon the old dervise's shoulder, and in a trembling, anxious tone, he asked:
"Does the king meditate harm?"
"Once I told thee," the dervise replied, in a confident tone, "that Noureddin knew of his danger, and that none better than himself knew how to avoid it. He 
can
 avoid all 
present
 harm, but as to what may come in the future may not now be told. I came to-night to put thee on thy guard, and once more I tell thee, let not a word escape regarding the youth, at least, for the present."
Ali Kinah gave his assent, but still he felt ill at ease, and shortly afterwards, when Abdah Nazor left, he experienced as much uneasiness as he did before he received the old man's intelligence. To be sure he knew that his child was alive, and that he was comparatively safe; but yet there was a cloud over the youth's fate which he could not penetrate. In the hands of the dervise there was some mysterious power over all with whom he was connected, but over none did that power seem to hang with so much portentousness as over Noureddin. The youth not only seemed moulded to Abdah Nazor's will, but far in the future, beyond the ken of sight or reason, the old man bent the boy to his purpose. Not a word would he explain of his reason or of his knowledge on this particular, but simply asserting that the youth's destiny was known to himself alone on earth, he pursued his course as he saw fit.
At times, Ali Kinah had doubted the old man's intentions, but then the manner in which his lessons were given to Noureddin, and, above all, their pure and ennobling influence, led him back to confidence. When his son was yet scarcely able to talk, Abdah Nazor had strangely offered his services as tutor, and had even then given directions for his first childish developments, though it was several years later that he assumed a complete guardianship. One thing alone puzzled the corn-seller more than all others. Though Abdah Nazor pretended to read the youth's destiny like a scroll, and though he fashioned his mind and body for that destiny, as an artizan would fit a lens for its appropriate sphere in the telescope, yet he would never let a word drop from his lips that might reveal his knowledge or his purpose to other ears.
Long after the old man left the dwelling did Ali Kinah pace to and fro in his room, pondering upon these circumstances, and at length, when he had become somewhat calm and composed
 posed from reflection, he sought his pillow for the night.
As Abdah Nazor stepped forth from the corn-seller's dwelling, he stopped for a moment on the pavement and cast his eyes towards the spot where the gilded turrets and domes of the royal palace lifted themselves in the starbeams. He shook his head with a mournful but yet significant motion, as he gazed upon the glittering pile, and raising his finger towards heaven, he murmured:
"Ah, thou false-hearted king—thou craven, coward heart! Must the city of Idumea's pride—the queen of the rocky desert, with her thousands of noble souls and brave, be humbled in the dust because 
thou
 art a coward! Sit there upon your throne; let the flattering tongues of thy slaves sound music in thine cars, but O, there is a God who will not long suffer thee thus to be. Beware, Modad, for the hour draweth near when judgment shall come upon thee, most certain, and most fearful!"
Slowly the old man turned away, and having crossed the small stream by means of a bridge which was thrown across it, he kept on towards the extreme western part of the city until he entered a small defile which lost itself at the distance of only a few rods in the darkness beyond. Back from this the way was arched by the solid rock overhead, until at length it gradually dwindled down to a low, narrow passage, through which, for a distance of ten yards, the old man was forced to crawl upon his hands and knees. The bottom of the pass was comparatively smooth, and gave evidence of having at some former time been the passage for no inconsiderable stream of water, but the sides and the top were jagged and rough, and he must be well acquainted with its peculiarities who would venture its exploration.
At length the old man came to a place where the way grew wider and higher, and to the left, through a chink in the stone, twinkled a starlike gleam, seeming only a single ray of light which might have been caught from the sun and shut up in this rocky dungeon. Towards this spot the dervise moved with a quicker step, and having uttered a low, shrill cry, he waited, as if for an answer. Soon the glimmering spark began to multiply its rays, until at length it spread to a broad sheet of light which came streaming through an aperture large enough to admit a man with ease. Abdah Nazor stepped into the cavern beyond, where burned a large torch, and by the light of which sat an old woman engaged in picking in pieces a sort of reed, from the bark of which she was making wicks for the torch that lighted up her rocky abode. From the side of her stool hung one end of a small chain, the other end of which was bolted into the rock that closed the entrance to the cave, and which she could thus open and shut at pleasure without rising from her seat. Such was Ossifrage, an Arabian woman, who had been one of the first to embrace the faith of the 
One God,
 and who had become, in view of the sins of her people, almost a monomaniac in religious enthusiasm. Seldom went she forth from her cave, and when she did so, it was only in quest of tallow and pitch for her torch, and food for her body. Her clothing she made herself, from the same reed of which she formed her torch-wicks, her spare time being all spent in prayer and study.
She nodded a welcome to the old dervise as he entered, and almost a smile started forth to her swarthy features as she recognized one with whom she seemed well acquainted. She moved not from her seat, however, but only pointed to a large projection from the solid wall, upon which she silently bade the dervise to be seated.
"Sister," said Abdah Nazor, as he seated himself upon the stone, "there is a tell-tale chink in your wall. As I entered your porch, a single ray of light shone forth as brilliantly as twinkles one of my own silent stars."
"
Your
 stars?" half reprovingly and half inquisitively returned the woman.
"Ay, Ossifrage," replied the old man, "
my
 stars."
"The stars are God's, and his alone—the only true, the only living God's," uttered the woman, as she looked up into her visitor's face, without ceasing from her work.
"They are most surely God's," Abdah nazor
 zor said, "but not his alone. 
I
 am God's, and nature is mine—God is mine. The midnight wanderer upon the trackless desert owns the stars, and they are his, if he but knows the great goodness that gave them. Tell me, Ossifrage, do we not realize gifts from God?"
"Yes, my brother, and hence I praise him."
"And has he not given us the twinkling lights that gem the night-sky? Has he not given them to us for our joy and comfort on earth?"
"He has 
lent
 them to us."
"No," said the old dervise. "He has given them to us, for 
we
 are his, and what he bestows upon us he gives to himself. In the economy of the one God nothing is wasted. All things are his, and so he giveth jewels to his children without losing them to himself. Hence I love to praise God that he has given to me those night-gems of beauty to make glad my eyes."
The old woman had dropped her reeds by her side while Abdah Nazor spoke, and for several moments after he closed she maintained a thoughtful silence; but at length she raised her eyes and uttered:
"I have learned from thee a lesson. Henceforth I will accept those gifts and render thanks accordingly, and all excepting life itself will I take as his gifts."
A bright beam shot forth from the old man's eyes as his companion spoke, and drawing nearer to her, he laid his hand upon her withered brow, and said:
"My sister, 
life
 is the only thing that God has given to us forever. 
Life
 is the only one of all his gifts that he will never take from us. This poor body of dust may moulder away upon the desert of earth, or become the food for the eagle and the jackall, but the 
life
 that is given with it may never be extinguished. God himself is not more lasting, than becomes the soul he creates. The breath of the body is not the life of man. That only keeps in motion the wonderful mechanism that is tied to the clay; but 'tis the SOUL—that principle that loves the beautiful and the good—that principle that can 
never
 die, that forms our 
life
. That life will be ever ours, and as we 
live
 it, either here, or among the stars of the brighter world hereafter, so shall we enjoy it, or be made miserable in its possession."
As the old man ceased speaking, he re-seated himself upon his stone bench, and regarded his companion with a curious eye.
"So it is, and 'tis surely true," murmured the woman to herself. "This wrinkled brow will soon lie lifeless in the earth, but 
I—I
, shall live forever. I thank thee, Abdah Nazor, that thou hast thus spoken."
Ossifrage picked up her reeds, and in a thoughtful mood resumed her work, while the old man gazed upon her for some moments in silence, and then, as he arose from his seat a second time, he said:
"Sister, I have come to-night on business. What amount of food have you in your cell?"
"Not more than enough to last myself eight-and-forty hours."
"Then I must furnish you with money to procure more, for you may have occasion to entertain visitors."
"And whom will you bring hither?"
"As yet I cannot tell," returned the old man. "It may be Ali Kinah."
"Surely, nothing can have happened to Noureddin," quickly exclaimed Ossifrage, betraying in her manner a degree of solicitude for which few would have given her credit.
"Not much," replied Abdah Nazor, and in as few words as possible, he went on and related all that had occurred.
"Be sure and watch well the youth," said Ossifrage, as the old man concluded; "for I would rather die than that harm should come to him. Were he of my own blood I could love him no better than I do now."
"Fear not for him," returned Abdah Nazor; "for you may rest assured that he is safe from all harm, save such as God may choose to mete out to him for good. But I will give thee money, and on the morrow you must go to the marketplace, and procure food."
"It shall be done," answered the old woman
 man. "My humble cell shall be ever open to such as flee from the wickedness of the recreant Modad, and humble though it be, 'tis strong against opposition."
"So should ever be the dwelling of him who lives in love and fear of God," pronounced Abdah Nazor, as he moved towards the entrance of the cave. "It may be several days ere our hospitality will be needed, but when the time comes I would have all in readiness."
"You may depend upon it."
"Then fare thee well, under God's care till we meet again," said the old dervise, and as he spoke he took hold of the chain and pulled back the swinging rock that gave him egress from the place.
As Abdah Nazor stepped forth into the narrow cave, he went not back the way he had come, but continued on further still from the city. Sometimes he would crawl upon his hands and knees, sometimes a mere stoop would give him passage, while at others he could walk upright. At length, at the end of about fifteen minutes, the way took a sudden turn to the left, by several abrupt projections, each one of which seemed to utterly bar the way; but these being passed the old man was obliged to let himself down considerable distance from point to point of the jagged rocks, until he found himself in the midst of a thick growth of dwarf shrubbery. Pushing these on one side he stepped forth upon the plain outside of the mountain wall that encompassed the city, and casting a hurried glance about him, he took his way round towards the foot of Mount Hor.
CHAPTER XI.
Al-Bassa in his misery. A messenger from the king. The royal proposition, and the unexpected reception with which it met. The Augustan dungeons, and their intended victim.
ALL that the art of man could do for the comfort and happiness of any individual, had been done for Al-Bassa, the king's minister and privy counsellor; upon his dwelling had been lavished all that the most sumptuous taste could demand, his table was loaded with the richest dainties of the east, and a score of ready servants stood obedient to his will; but Al-Bassa had most bitterly learned that all his wealth, that all his pomp and pride of state, could afford no happiness. His gold, for which thousands would have even shed a brother's blood, was but as dross in his eyes; and his jewels, for which monarchs might have envied him, were like so many worthless pebbles in his coffers. The old man had tasted deeply of sorrow, nor was there a single gleam of sunlight to relieve the darkness of his soul.
It was late at night—on the same night that Abdah Nazor visited the cell of Ossifrage—that Al-Bassa stepped forth from his porch and entered the rose-lined walks of his garden. His hands were clasped in agony, and his eyes were raised towards the star-lit heavens, the twinkling beams from which played in the tear-drops that stood trembling upon his eyelids.
"O," he murmured, as he placed his hands to his throbbing brow, "why has this blow come upon me? Why have my gray hairs been thus brought down in sorrow, and the brightness of my home changed into the darkness of utter desolation? The sun has gone out from my path, the gentle moon refuses me her light, and the stars of heaven each send a stream of living fire to my soul. My child! my child!—my gentle Selina, is lost to me forever! She upon whom my heart was fixed as the unfledged eagle to its nest, has been torn from me, and upon the wide earth not a tie exists to bind me to myself.
"O, if angels look forth from yonder stars, let them pity me in my distress, and let them shed one ray of hope into my soul, for soon, very soon, that soul must be a wanderer among their gentle beams. Earth cannot much longer be the home of such a spirit as is mine. Crushed! broken! cast down beneath even mine own contempt!"
For a moment, Al-Bassa stopped in his walk.
 The tears which had been starting forth were dried in their course, and the trembling of the muscles was stilled to an iron calmness. Soon a simple word broke from his lips.
"
Modad!
" he uttered, and then clenched his hands with a sort of sudden determination that sent its tone through every nerve in his system. "Modad, I have served thee long and faithfully, but I will serve thee no longer, and would to heaven that my heart had been steeled against thy wickedness ere the shaft of misery was sent to my bosom."
The old man walked on for a time, and at length he turned towards his dwelling. Half the distance had he traversed back when he was met by one of his slaves.
"Master," said the slave, bowing low before the counsellor, "a messenger from the king awaits you in your dwelling."
"From the king, said you?" exclaimed the old man, starting as though his foot had trodden upon a scorpion.
"Yes, my master."
"He gave not his errand?"
"Only that the king desired your immediate attendance at the palace."
"Go back and tell the messenger that I can—"
Al-Bassa hesitated a moment, and bent his eyes thoughtfully upon the ground. The first flash of indignation passed away; but it was succeeded by a calmness that had far more depth of meaning, and looking up once more at his servant, he said:
"Tell the messenger I will attend him anon."
Slowly and thoughtfully Al-Bassa continued his walk towards his dwelling. At times there was a kind of hesitation in his manner, as though he would reject the plan he had formed, but ere his foot touched the threshold of his dwelling he had banished all traces of perturbation from his features, and with a calm and collected mien he soon accompanied the royal messenger to the palace of his monarch.
Modad received his counsellor in one of the upper private apartments of his palace, and, even as the apples of his eyes, the two mutes bore him company. There was, as usual, a cloudy expression upon his brow, but a far deeper concern than he often expressed, sat upon his features. When Al-Bassa entered, the king was pacing up and down his apartment with unequal, nervous strides, but as his eyes fell upon the old man he stopped in his walk, while a satisfied expression flitted across his countenance.
"I am glad you have come, Al-Bassa," was the monarch's first exclamation, as he extended his hand to his counsellor, "for I have need of thy services."
Al-Bassa took the extended hand of his king, but he made no answer to his remark.
"How now, my old friend?" rather abruptly continued Modad, as he glanced at the strange expression upon the old man's features. "Have you no word of well-wishing for your king?"
"I do most certainly wish your majesty well," replied Al-Bassa, without bending from his former reserve; "and I am prepared to hear your orders."
"To 
hear
 them," uttered Modad, as a quick flash of something like anger trembled upon his cheeks and lips. Then bending a meaning look upon Al-Bassa, he added, in a half suppressed tone:
"To hear your king is to obey!"
"But yet I cannot obey till I hear," returned the old man, without seeming to notice his monarch's manner.
For a moment the king seemed puzzled by the manner of his counsellor. He had never before seen Al-Bassa in such a mood, and he never had expected aught but meek submission to his will. The pampered, arbitrary monarch knew not how much grief the human heart might feel, nor knew he how that same grief might steel the heart that had at first bent submissively beneath it.
"Al-Bassa," at length said the king, assuming a kind and patronizing air, "I have need not only of thy counsel and advice, but I have need also of thine efficient aid. I 
must
 have the Petran monarch's talisman."
"The King's Talisman?" iterated Al-Bassa, in startled surprise.
"Ay," returned the king, "I must possess that talisman, even though all Egypt and Arabia be ransacked to find it."
"In this case, your majesty," deliberately replied the counsellor, "I can neither advise nor assist, for I have no clue to its whereabouts."
"Neither have I," Modad said, "but still I must have it. Something tells me that without it my reign must be shortened. One blow I have already averted, but—. What ails thee, my friend?" the king exclaimed, as he noticed Al-Bassa's countenance turn pale.
"Nothing, sire—only your words brought back to my mind a scene that I cannot reflect upon but with the deepest sorrow."
The king understood the allusion, but passing it by in silence, he continued:
"I am threatened by a calamity still greater than would have been the attack of Boljaz, and if I am without the talisman I must surely fall. That talisman must have either been lost or stolen, and it may be even now in Petra."
"But this calamity, sire—what is its nature?" asked Al-Bassa, with surprise.
"That is more than I can tell thee now," answered Modad, while a slight trembling seized his limbs, "for to myself I cannot define it. Still I feel it hanging about me, and at every step some hidden pitfall seems yawning before me. But one thing I would have thee do," the king continued with a sudden start, and seeming for the moment to forget the talisman. "Do you know that old soothsayer!"
"Abdah Nazor?"
"The same."
"Yes, sire."
"Then I would have him removed from my path."
"Well," uttered the old counsellor, gazing calmly at his monarch, as if he understood not the hint.
"I would have 
thee
 do it, Al-Bassa."
Al-Bassa may have given a sudden start, but its effects were hardly perceptible, for almost on the instant he answered:
"Sire, I will serve you in all that is just and honorable, so long as we both may live, but I will not sacrifice more of my honor to your will."
Modad at first failed to comprehend the full import of the old man's words, and in a smothered tone, he said:
"You did not understand me. I said that I wished thee to remove Abdah Nazor from my way. You have trusty servants, and the thing may be easily done, for the old soothsayer almost daily, so I am told, visits the city from his mountain retreat."
Al-Bassa's first step in moral independence had been taken, and now he had no mind to retract, so in a decided manner he replied:
"I understood your meaning, sire, and my answer was just. I have already sacrificed more than mortal man might have demanded of me, but the danger of the city had great weight in my decision. Now, however, I will sacrifice no more."
"Then you will not do my bidding?"
"Not to raise my hand against the old man of whom you speak."
"Beware!" exclaimed the monarch, while his cheeks paled and his lips grew purple with rage. "Beware, Al-Bassa! Once more—will you see that Abdah Nazor is removed from my way?"
"I will not," proudly returned the counsellor, as he took a step back, and folded his arms across his breast.
"Then, by the powers of Tartarus, your own head shall be the forfeit!" cried Modad, as he brought his hands together with a sharp clap.
"My heart is already crushed and broken, sire," calmly returned Al-Bassa, as four black eunuchs entered the apartment at the signal just given by the king, "and my head you may take in welcome; but I tell thee, Modad, Al-Bassa's blood will lay heavily on your soul."
"Not half so heavily as his own disobedience shall rest upon his own," muttered Modad, moving back a pace and motioning the eunuchs forward. "I would not harm thee, Al-Bassa," he continued, betraying a slight hesitation in his
 purpose, "but I must be obeyed. Once more, will you do as I have desired?"
"Never!"
For a full minute the king gazed upon his stubborn counsellor in silence. Anger had been succeeded by astonishment, and again anger had gained the ascendency. He could have smitten a common citizen at once to the dust who should have dared to disobey him, but there was that in the air and mien of the old man before him, that held his anger back from its most terrible purpose, and smothering the words that rose to his lips, he turned to the eunuchs, and with a calmness that was far more fearful in its import, he said:
"Take that old man away, slaves, and confine him in one of the dungeons beneath the Augustan Pillar."
"Modad," said Al-Bassa, as the eunuchs laid their hands upon him, "tell me all that you meditate against me. I can bear it with as much fortitude as you can speak it."
"Death or liberty are at your own disposal," the king replied. "But no man can live who dares to disobey me."
"Then I am one who dares do even that," fell calmly from the old counsellor's lips, and on the next instant he was led away from his monarch's presence.
The Augustan Pillar was a huge marble column which raised its towering form within the western park of the palace, and beneath it, connecting with the cells beneath the palace itself, were several small dungeons, the farthest removed of any from sight and hearing, and the most dark and loathsome in the vicinity. Al-Bassa well knew their locality, and he knew, too, the sure fate of those who once crossed their fatal thresholds.
What the silent waters of the Bosphorus were to the Turkish sultan, were the Augustan dungeons to the Petran king. Their deep and gloomy silence told no tales of those who slept the last sleep within their massive walls, nor did the prayers of their victims fall upon other ears than those of God. He who once passed within their precincts by the fiat of the king never again saw the light of day—no tongue might ever again lisp to them the sweet sounds of friendship, nor might the hum of the busy world again break over their senses.
The old man knew all this, and yet, when he turned away from the monarch, he did so with firmness, but ere he had passed many steps from the apartment where he had received his death warrant, a new gleam of light broke in upon his mind. This order of Modad's, he thought, was not so suddenly conceived as might at first appear, though perhaps, he had not intended to have executed his purpose so quickly, as had now been done.
"For those whom the king has sent on his mission to Khaibar, with the exception of his trusty Nubians," thought Al-Bassa, to himself, "he has prepared a sure safeguard for their secresy in death. Perhaps this old soothsayer is also possessed of his secret, and hence he would have me put him out of the way. 
Me
 he chooses for this work because I alone might know the reason for the old man's death, and then, I am the only living witness of his perfidy, and my death would be sure to follow! Modad has meditated my death from the first, but he only waits till I have served him to the last!"
These thoughts passed with the rapidity of lightning through the old counsellor's mind—their weight changed his purpose on the instant, and he determined that the dungeons should receive not his body while his soul held possession of it.
His sword still hung by his side, and as the vigor of former years, when he fought by the side of the brave Merolboth, once more went thrilling through his nerves, he dropped his hand upon its hilt, and compressed his muscles for a final effort. He knew every avenue of the palace, and every turn was as familiar as were the walks of his own garden. Two of the eunuchs walked by his side, one with his hand upon each shoulder, while the other two walked close behind.
At length, Al-Bassa reached the long passage that led from the divan to the rear of the palace
 ace, and the moment that his feet touched its marble pavement he knew that the time for his trial had come. His steps grew slow and weak, his head dropped in apparent anguish, and deep sobs escaped from his bosom. Fainter and still fainter grew the old man's steps, until he seemed about to fall from the weakness that overcame him. The eunuchs who were behind came up to his assistance, and together the four essayed to help him along. The old counsellor's eyes were fastened upon the wall, and ere long the way appeared open to the divan. Every nerve was strained to its utmost, and with one quick, sudden bound, the prisoner leaped from those who held him. His sword flew from its sheath, and almost with the speed of light he darted towards the great chamber of audience. The heavy tapestry that guarded its entrance was thrown aside—the window that overlooked the court was gained—the stained glass fell in a thousand fragments upon the pavement beneath, and in an instant more, untouched by the half petrified, pursuing eunuchs, Al-Bassa fell heavily amid the rattling ruins of the window. He would have arisen, but a thick cloud came over his vision, and with a faint sensation, as of some one moving his body, he sank into utter unconsciousness.
CHAPTER XII.
The sunlight of hope has fairly struggled through the clouds. Noureddin receives a joy-giving answer to a bold question. Memory struggles in its chains. A mystery, and the effects of Miriam's solution of it.
THE Petran train moved rapidly after it had been turned towards home, for Noureddin determined that he would pass on as far as possible, ere he stopped for the night. The eunuchs betrayed some uneasiness in their manners, but still they were ready and cheerful in their obedience to their young leader, for though the fear of the king rested somewhat harshly upon them, yet they trusted to the young man's promise that they should not be harmed, and after a while they seemed to transfer all their thought to the service of him who had now become their only director. Through Molech, they had learned of the king's diabolical purpose respecting them, and they plainly saw that in Noureddin they had a noble preserver.
Selina, too, had calmed most of her fears, and once more the tide of joy went coursing through her veins. As the sun now sank towards its western home, its beams threw her shadow towards her native city, and she was following its welcome index. Oft during the day had she looked forth from her pavilion, and as often had her eyes instinctively sought out the noble form of him who had been the author of her salvation. What feelings swelled in her bosom, or what thoughts possessed her mind, she hardly know herself—they were deep and heartfelt, but they came so thick and fast, and, withal, so overwhelming, that she knew only that they left a soft shade of gladness behind.
"Selina," said Miriam, just after Noureddin had ridden past the pavilion, and passed a respectful word of kindness with its occupants, "did I not tell thee truly when I said there was hope for us yet?"
"You spoke with prophetic vision, kind one," Selina answered, as she gazed into the face of her faithful attendant. "God grant that all may end as well as it has now began."
"God 
will
 grant it," enthusiastically returned Miriam, "or else he is not the kind Being that you have so often bidden me look up to in my prayers."
"Ah, my child, you have not yet learned to read the character of the God whom I have taught you to worship. His children may not know why he marks out their thorny paths, but
 yet for their good it is done. I may suffer—I may even die in my sufferings, but beyond that God has laid his plans, and none may see their end, save to know that they are good."
Selina saw the half vacant stare with which her companion regarded her, and she knew that the girl's mind comprehended not the mysteries of her religion, and instantly changing the subject, she added:
"But I do trust, Miriam, that all will end well with us, though we have by far the darkest point yet to pass over."
"Surely, my mistress, we can have none darker than that which has already passed.
"Yes," replied Selina, "we must stand again in the power of the king, and though the brave Noureddin may raise his hand against the king's servants, yet he will have no power against the monarch's own personal authority."
"But the young man has assured you that he 
has
 the power to protect you from Modad's evil designs, and we surely have seen enough of his character to know that he would not boast idly. He is too noble for that."
"Noble," murmured Selina, as a flood of peculiar light swam in her eyes,—"ay, he 
is
 noble, and he is kind, and I will trust him even with life itself."
There was nothing in the words that her mistress had spoken that caused the quick flash of intelligence in Miriam's face, but 'twas in their tone and manner; and laying her hand upon the maiden's arm, she looked curiously up into her face. Selina would have spoken further, but at that moment Noureddin looked in upon them.
"Fair lady," said he, "the sun is just dipping upon the mountain tops, and its heat is nearly gone. Will you now taste the air that is moving without your pavilion?"
"I will, indeed, sir," replied Selina, with a thankful expression.
"And your attendant, too."
"You will go, Miriam," Selina said, turning to her companion.
"With pleasure," returned Miriam, and ere long the two females were again upon horseback.
As the evening shades threw their gauzy veil over the desert sands and the mountain peaks, Noureddin drew his steed nearer to that of the fair Selina, and by a sort of instinctive, mutual consent, they rode further in advance of the train. Thus far they had said but little, save casual remarks upon the nature and appearance of the barren scenery that met the eye on their path, but the most careless observer could not have failed to notice that there was much thought and feeling in their hearts, even though it found no utterance. Several times had Noureddin found the eyes of his companion fixed upon his features with a most earnest and inquisitive glance, but his own look was sure to turn those orbs away, and call up a blush beneath their dark lashes.
"Lady," at length said the young man, with a slight tremulousness in his tone, "the short time that we have spent together has been an eventful season, I believe, for us both, but to me its memory will be fraught with some happy associations."
"So may I too say," fell from Selina's lips, as she looked gratefully into the face of her companion. "My journey was commenced in sorrow and darkness, but the halo of a noble and pure heart soon penetrated the gloom, and now the full brightness of that noble heart's friendship has chased away all the gloom from my way, and the future of my poor life shall be made better and happier in memory of the disinterested deed."
"Then you will not forget the poor youth who has thus made his first essay of responsibility. You will at times remember him in your prayers, and give his picture a place in your thoughts."
"Made his first essay!" iterated Selina, after a moment's hesitation, during which time a rich fount of blood had mounted to her neck and temples, and gone back again to her heart.
"Yes, lady, this is my first chapter in life. Until the morning on which you were led out from the city, I had been but a scholar under my master's tutorship, and to God be the praise that my first act has been in behalf of one so
 worthy and yet so unfortunate as yourself. But you will soon be returned to the arms of your father, my mission thus far will be accomplished, and in addition to the joy which the performance of duty has given to me, let me feel that I am not forgotten by her whom I have endeavored to serve."
For some time Selina remained silent. Her eyes were bent upon the arching neck of her horse, but she saw not the object towards which they were turned. If she tried to see at all, it was a vision of the world within her, where the ruling heart was struggling in its chains, and fast giving way to a power more potent than the impulsive reason which had heretofore been its governing principle. At length she called back her wandering thoughts, and turning her eyes frankly, but yet tremblingly, upon her companion, she said:
"Ah, kind sir, this heart of mine was not framed for a forgetfulness of those who minister to its joy and peace, and surely to one who has ministered as you have done, it must ever bow in humble gratitude. But," she continued, in a somewhat anxious tone, "I trust that you will bring no harm upon yourself in thus serving me."
The manner in which Selina spoke this plainly indicated that she feared rather than trusted—that she was deeply concerned lest that very danger to her preserver that she would hope against should come upon him. Noureddin noticed her manner, and he marked, too, the depth of tone with which she spoke, and while a strange light shone forth from his eyes, he replied:
"Fair lady, the only source of danger that I have to fear is that which may have become planted in my own soul. Had I served thee without seeing your face, and without hearing thy sweet voice, all would have been unclouded in the memories which must hang over the scenes I have passed. Had I looked not within the casket, I might have saved the jewel from tarnish and destruction without having coveted it for myself. Blame me not for thus speaking so plainly, for you have inspired me with the feelings which I utter, and to none else would I speak them."
Beneath the language of looks and indirectly implied feelings Selina had trembled and blushed, for they dealt with so much doubt, and were yet so potent, that she had not sure ground for either hope or fear, while her own feelings were tossed about upon a sea of uncertainty. But her heart was too noble for dissimulation, and now that her companion had spoken so freely, so openly, she could not, she dared not, deceive him, and with a look and tone in which all was frankness and nobleness, she said:
"If you have found a jewel worth coveting, what have I not found in the heart and soul of one who has been the first to show me how noble and good man can be."
"And have you found in me one whose pure and holy love you could return? one to whom you could give a place in your maiden heart?" asked Noureddin, almost breathless from the intensely absorbing feeling that moved within him.
"Perhaps," returned Selina, "an answer to such a question at the present time might be somewhat biassed, for the weight of gratitude that lays upon my heart might give wider wings to my tongue. But," the maiden dropped her eyes as she said it—"even if 'twere a sin to love thee, I fear my poor heart could not break the chains that your kindness to me has wound around it."
The stars twinkled in the blue vault of the celestial throne—their beams danced merrily o'er the tiny crystals that lay upon the surface of the sands, and the steady footfalls of the horses alone broke the stillness around, but Noureddin heeded nothing save the new heaven that had been opened in his soul—he heard no sound save the melody of that sweet voice that yet rang its enchanting music in his ears.
"Selina," he said, in accents so soft and rich that they seemed like the intonations of the swept viol, "you know not the degree of joy your words have imparted to my soul; but until different circumstances surround us—until our hearts are free from all extraneous motives, I will rest upon the token I have this night received, and should our lives be spared to the
 future, I may yet strive for the jewel that now sends its dazzling brightness o'er my spirit's way. Your path it is easy to see, for once more restored to the arms of your father, your home will again be the abode of peace and joy, with wealth and station at your command; but with me the future is as uncertain as the winds of heaven. One thing only do I know; so long as earth receives the impress of my feet, an untarnished honor and a truthful heart shall be mine."
"A wealth that monarchs might covet, did they but know the source of true greatness," quickly returned Selina, as she raised her eyes, beaming with love and pride, to the face of her companion. "But tell me," she continued, as she gazed more intently upon the features of the young man, "where it is that I have seen you before. Did you ever visit my father's house?"
"Never," returned Noureddin, somewhat surprised at the question. "I have seen your father in the street, but he knows not me. Some countenance resembling mine must be in your memory."
"No, that cannot be. A countenance like yours would never pass from my mind."
"And yet you cannot even now identify it, nor call to mind where nor when you have seen its like," returned Noureddin, with a smile.
"True, true," murmured Selina, half to herself, "but yet 'tis connected with a thousand associations in my mind, and even as far back as childhood the chain seems to run, though I cannot call to mind one link of that chain."
"It must be some one else besides me," Noureddin said, "for one in my humble station could not have been identified with such associations."
"No, the picture is too vivid—too absorbing in its very uncertain strangeness, to admit of such a construction. I cannot solve the mystery, though I have tried to do it from the moment I first saw you, but of one thing I am certain, your form and features alone are at the bottom of it."
As the maiden spoke, she turned towards Miriam, who rode at a respectful distance behind, and beckoned her forward.
"Miriam," she said, in an under tone, "is not our young leader's countenance familiar to you? Have you not seen it somewhere before we met him here?"
A quick beam of intelligence shot across the attendant's face, and bending her lips close to the ear of her mistress, she whispered a hurried sentence. Selina started as the words of Miriam fell upon her ear, and instinctively she turned her eyes again towards Noureddin. They rested there for a moment,—a dozen shadows of quick thought flitted across her beautiful features the while, and when, at length, she removed her gaze, the veil seemed lifted from her memory, but the light that had burst forth from behind it nearly overpowered her, and until the train stopped for the night, though she answered her companion's questions, she was strangely moved by the thoughts that whirled through her busy brain.
CHAPTER XIII.
A reverie, and its interruption. The Egyptian's fearful suspicions are confirmed. A dangerous enemy and his allies. The fight. A strange recognition, and its important consequences.
ON the next morning Noureddin was stirring betimes, and ere the sun had burned up all the coolness his train was in motion. For three hours he rode on in a thoughtful, silent mood, occasionally casting his eyes behind him to see that all was in order, and again sinking into a deep reverie. He had noticed the strange manner of Selina on the previous evening, and he had noticed, too, the whisper of Miriam, but though his curiosity had been excited to its highest pitch, yet he had too much politeness to intrude any questions. The circumstance was not to be lightly passed over, nor thrown aside, however, for that there was some deep mystery hidden behind the whole the youth felt assured, and he felt, too, that in some way its solution would materially affect him. At first he tried to persuade himself that Selina's strange recognition of himself must have been the result of some peculiar coincidence of likeness, but her manner had been too confident to admit of such a supposition,—and then her bearing afterwards, when she had received the whispered answer of her attendant, was of itself a convincing proof that her first impressions had been confirmed.
So deeply had Noureddin become buried in his reflections, that he knew but little, if anything, of what was going on about him. The whole train might have stopped, and for half an hour he would have ridden unsuspectingly along without them; but he was soon startled from his dreamy reverie, by a quick cry from one of the eunuchs, and in an instant mere Molech came dashing up to his side.
"See there, sir!" exclaimed the Egyptian, at the same time pointing with his finger off to wards the northward and eastward, where a small cloud seemed hanging upon the horizon.
"Some caravan, perhaps, bound for Petra," said Noureddin.
"But they are coming directly toward us," replied Molech. "See, there their spear-heads gleam in the sunlight."
The youthful leader had now fairly collected his scattered senses, and he saw in a moment that the approaching cavalcade was on no regular track, but riding directly towards his own train.
"They are coming this way," he said to the Egyptian.
"Yes, my master, and I fear, too, that our time has come," replied Molech, while he trembled with a fearful agitation.
"What mean you, Molech?" the young man asked, and he gazed in astonishment upon his follower's trepidation. "We are armed."
"Do you not recognize those spear-heads?" Molech returned.
"Are they different from others?"
"Their 
length
, sir. See! they are a half a dozen spans above the riders' heads."
"Well, what of that?"
"What of it! Why sir, I think you might know them out of ten thousand. They are those accursed Nubians.
Noureddin gazed more intently upon the swiftly approaching party, and at length he became convinced that Molech's fears were well founded. Not only were the Nubians returning, but they had a heavy addition with them, consisting of full forty of those wild Arabs who roved among the mountains, and whose prowess and warlike endowments were the terror of all whom they chanced to meet in combat.
The train had halted of its own accord, when the pursuers came well in sight, and casting his eyes around upon the eunuchs, Noureddin saw that a panic of terror had seized upon them. They sat trembling in their saddles like so many dwarf aspens, and the sagacious horses seemed to be well aware of the danger which their riders so much feared. The young man cast one more look at the Nubians and their allies, and that sufficed to convince him that he had to contend with the whole party, for he could see that their spears were cast from their beckets, only resting in the stirrup-socket, while their whole bearing was indicative of an immediate attack.
"Selina," he said, riding hastily up to the side of the pavilion, from which the lady was looking forth upon the distant horsemen, "there's danger at hand, perhaps fearful, but let your heart faint not. We will fight to the last, and we may be able to overcome the opposition."
"And are they 
all
 enemies?" asked the trembling girl, as she looked in dismay upon the coming troop.
"You may as well know the truth, Selina, I fear they are. Those Nubians have been quick in their operations, and you see the reinforcement they bring."
"The 
Nubians!
" cried the poor girl, for the first time recognizing the deadly blacks. "O God! then indeed I am lost!"
"No, no, dearest maiden,—you are not lost till you see my form cold in death. Watch me, and so long as this right arm remains true to its duty, you are safe."
"O, do not, do not give battle to them," exclaimed Selina, as she grasped Noureddin's arm, "for see! they outnumber you three to one. They will kill you, and then I shall have no protector, no friend!
"Yes, you will," said a soft, sweet, calm voice behind her, and as she spoke, Miriam stepped forward, and held out the small dagger which she still kept in her possession.
Selina's tearful eye grew brighter, as she saw the gleaming weapon, and while her features grew calm and composed, she took the dagger, and unloosed the lacing of her silken vest.
"Go on, Noureddin," she said, with a potent calmness,—"and when I see you fall, Selina and Miriam will remain not long behind you!"
A tremor shook the young man's frame, as he saw the significant movement, and averting his gaze from the fatal weapon, he said:
"Be sure that I am dead, ere you strike; but if I fall to rise no more, then God direct your hand."
Noureddin seized the fair hand that had been laid upon his arm, and imprinting upon it a warm kiss, he turned his horse's head away. There was a strange misgiving in his heart, as he saw the powerful force that came sweeping down upon him, for he could see no possible way of escape, but he would not let the eunuchs see his thoughts, and assuming a confident air and tone, he ordered the pavilion to be moved
 as far in the rear as possible, and then turning towards the still trembling Egyptians, he said:
"Now, my brave followers, we have got to fight. I know that the enemy outnumber us, but let us trust in Heaven for aid. Do not shrink nor quail, but strike home with all your might. You all know that good fighting alone can save you, for to submit is but to be instantly murdered. Now, my men, which death will you choose? Will you have your throats cut like dogs, or will you die like the brave men you have already proved yourselves?"
The eunuchs gazed upon the calm features of their noble leader—they saw at once how they were situated,—that escape was impossible, and that quiet submission would be nought but sure death, and as one man they unslung their lances and placed their shields upon the guard. By the time Noureddin had arranged his scanty band in order of defence, the enemy were hard upon him.
"Stand firm, my men," he shouted, "and let each blow be well aimed and strong. Be the Nubians your first marks. There are but eight of them, and if we can manage to put them out of the way, we have hope of quarters from the others."
Hardly had Noureddin ceased speaking, when the powerful Nubians, and their still more powerful allies, came dashing upon them. The leader of the mountain Arabs was a sinewy, stalwart fellow, with a most savage expression of countenance, and his followers, to the number of thirty-five, were in good keeping with their leader. On they came and the Egyptians received the shock bravely, and not one of them was unhorsed, while Noureddin's good sword had found the life of another of the Nubians on the first blow. At first the Egyptians tried to aim all their blows at the blacks, but the Arabs pressed them so hard, that they were forced to give up the purpose, and letting go their spears they drew their heavy swords and defended themselves with the strength of madmen. They knew they must fight till they died—there was no other alternative, and with a fury almost superhuman, they dashed among the foe.
Thick and fast fell the blows upon the shield and sword of Noureddin, but as yet no steel had touched him. Once he cast his eyes towards the pavilion, and he received a fresh impulse from the view. Selina was gazing forth upon the scene of conflict with a tearless eye and marble face,—in her right hand she held the dagger, while the left was pressed firmly upon her heart. Again the youth swept his sword above his head, and a powerful Arab fell before its stroke. Five of his faithful Egyptians were stretched upon the sand, while one or two of the others were severely wounded.
"Now, dog, take thy death," shouted one of the Nubians, as he pressed upon the young man, and knocked his sword from its guard.
A piercing cry rent the air above the clang and rattle of the clashing steel as the Nubian's sword swept the air above Noureddin's head. He heard the sound, and like an electric shock it thrilled through his soul. Sinking his rowel deep into the flank of his horse, he drew the animal quickly on one side, and as the half-blinded, infatuated Nubian's sword came whistling down within an inch of his side, he drove his own weapon deep into the black's breast. Again he cast his eye about, and another of his Egyptians had fallen, while the rest were fast giving way before the pressing foe. Three of the Nubians had bitten the dust, and hardly had Noureddin slain the last, when the remaining five dashed towards him in a body.
The almost exhausted youth saw them coming, and for the first time in his life, he felt a thrill of fear, but it was only for the moment, for gathering his shield firmly upon his arm, and grasping his sword with a firmer grip, he resolved to sell his life at a dear cost. The Nubians were within a spear's length of the youth, when from the other side came the Arab leader followed by six of his men. His sword was in the air, and Noureddin's head was its aim. Suddenly the Arab's flashing eyes caught the upturned features of the young Petran leader, and on the instant the course of his weapon was changed, and the headmost Nubian fell beneath its descending stroke!
"Hold!" shouted the stalwart Arab, as he dashed in between Noureddin and the Nubians. "Here are your victims!" and as he spoke another of the now petrified Nubians tumbled from his horse from the blow of his heavy sword.
Like as the young vulture pounces upon the prey which its mother has pointed out, darted the Arabs upon the remaining Nubians, and ere the youth fully realized what had taken place, the last of his intended murderers had fallen into that sleep which knows no earthly waking. Every sword-point was dropped, and every eye was turned upon the Arab leader.
"Pardon, noble youth," cried the Arab, removing his tasselled cap from his brow. "These dastard Nubians hired me to assist them in protecting their train against the designs of one who had turned traitor, but in God's truth I knew you not till my steel had well nigh found your life."
"Marmiel!" exclaimed Noureddin, as he recognized the features of one whom he well knew, "I rather owe you thanks than pardon."
"Well, be that as it may, suit yourself," returned the Arab, placing his cap once more upon his brow, "but I would have sooner stricken my right hand from its wrist, than to have raised that hand against the preserver of my life."
Noureddin extended his hand to his new found friend, and was not a little pleased when Marmiel told him that he and his band would accompany him to within an hour's journey of Petra. While the Arab was regulating his men, the youth hastened to the pavilion. As he came up to the entrance, Selina received him with a look of the deepest gratitude, and wiping the tears from her eyes, she murmured:
"We are safe, we are safe,—and to you, my best of friends, I owe it all. O, God grant that I may be able yet to repay thee."
"Repay me? Say not that, dear Selina, for you have already spoken that which is worth even life itself. But we 
are
 safe, and we need fear no more danger. The Arab leader is one whom I once found perishing, on the rugged side of Mount Hor, from the effects of a fall he had received in chasing an antelope. I assisted him to the cave of my old tutor, and there I nursed him till he recovered. My kindness is now returned."
"So may it ever be," Selina uttered, and with a smile struggling through her fast dispersing fears, she received her preserver's thanks.
Twelve of the Egyptian eunuchs were left, with no wounds of consequence, to follow the youth, while only four of the Arabs had fallen in the conflict, the principal offensive attack of Noureddin's party having been aimed against the Nubians. Molech was unharmed, and with his assistance the camels were got back into the path, the train again arranged, and with a thankful heart Noureddin once more started on his way.
CHAPTER XIV.
The censors. Their strange visiter, and the startling developments he received. An ambush. The counsellor once more in the trap. A meeting as unwelcome as it was unexpected, and its results.
THOUGH the king of Petra was invested with absolute power over the affairs of his realm, yet there were two men in his kingdom with whom he feared to come in civil contact. These were Moran and Velorus, the two censors of the people. At first they had been elected by the citizens as overseers of the public morals only, but gradually they became arbiters in petty suits of individual rights, and at length, by a common consent among the people, matters of a graver import, not involving any state affairs, were left to their decision, until they had actually become the dispensers of common justice in the city. At first Modad had looked with satisfaction upon the growing duties of the two censors, for it removed considerable weight from his own shoulders, and he was not troubled with those small affairs which his predecessor had always attended to in person; but he saw not, however, how much power he was gradually losing,—he saw not, until the thing had gone too far for remedy, how much he was slowly, but surely, losing of the respect of his subjects. At the time of which we write, Modad knew little of the affairs of the citizens, excepting that they paid their taxes regularly, and that he received but little trouble from their presence, but as his own net of wickedness began to draw closer about him, he realized how much authority he had allowed to slip from his fingers,—he began to understand that a monarch's throne is firm and stable only when it is sustained by the affections of the people, and he knew full well that he possessed but little, if any, of that requisite; but still Modad had determined upon his course,—he was resolved to pursue his way with impunity, and to accomplish the destruction of all who might stand in his path. But little dreamt the monarch of the power that was working against him, though, in fact, he feared much.
At about a stone's throw from the Petran market-place, on the opposite side of the stream that watered the city, stood a small stone building, which was now become the audience place of the censors. The day had crept far into its evening, and one by one, or in small parties, numbers of the citizens had been passing in and
 out for the last hour. Upon a stone near the door, set an old woman, habited in a coarse gown of reeds, while nought but the long, matted hair that fell in gray masses over her shoulders, served as a covering for her head. She appeared to take little notice of those who passed, but yet she knew full well the character of each, for though her head was bent to the ground, yet her sharp eye was constantly peering out from beneath the mass of hair that hid it. Many of the citizens stopped and asked her what she waited for, and some offered her alms, but to the former she replied that she only rested her wearied limbs, while to the latter she gave a simple word of refusal.
At length a form whose features were almost entirely concealed from sight by the yellow mantle that was pulled up over the head, approached the building with a cautious tread. The old woman gave a sudden start, and removing the hair farther aside from her eye, she eagerly scrutinized the enveloped form. She seemed satisfied with the survey, for no sooner had the object of her interest entered the doorway, than she arose from her position and crossed over to the bridge, where she again seated herself.
Meanwhile the individual referred to, passed on to the room of audience, and took a seat as far removed as possible from observation, where he patiently waited until he was left alone with the two censors and their official attendants.
"Now, sir," said Moran, with a benevolent look that always rested upon his features when people sought his justice; at the same time casting his eye towards the spot where the last comer sat, "you may have a hearing."
The individual thus addressed arose and deliberately moved to the door, which he shut and bolted upon the inside.
"Hold there," exclaimed Moran. "The doors of our chamber are never shut against the people."
"Half a dozen of the censors' attending officers moved quickly from their places, and started towards the door, but the mysterious stranger waved them back with his hand, and turning towards the censors be said:
"Most noble censors, hold a moment ere you re-open the door."
As he spoke, he threw the mantle back from his head, thus revealing the aged features of the king's counsellor.
"Al-Bassa!" uttered both the censors at a breath, as they gazed in wonder upon the old man.
"What has brought thee hither at this season, and in this guise!" asked Moran.
Al-Bassa cast his eyes around upon the attendant officers, and then said:
"What I have to say I would communicate to no ears but your own."
The censors hesitated not in complying with the implied wish of the old counsellor, for they immediately requested their attendants to withdraw, and as soon as they were left alone with the old man, the latter said:
"I know not, sirs, to whom I shall look for assistance, unless it be yourselves, nor do I know of another in whose discretion I can trust."
"You may surely trust me," Velorus replied, with a puzzled look, "but methinks it must be strange business that should have brought 
thee
 hither."
"It is indeed strange," Al-Bassa answered, while a shudder passed through his frame. "It is no more nor less than to ask of you protection against the king."
"Protection against the king?" iterated the censors, half starting from their seats.
"Yes, noble censors. Within the last twenty-four hours—a little later than this on yesterday-night—Modad attempted my life."
"Didst hear that, Velorus?" exclaimed Moran, turning to his colleague. "But tell us, Al-Bassa," he continued, "what has caused this villany on the king's part?"
"I may not now tell thee all," replied the old counsellor, after a few moments' hesitation, "but thus much you may know. I refused to do an act of his command which was repugnant and wicked, and for that he would have taken my life."
"But he did not this attempt in his palace?"
"Yes."
"Then how did you escape?"
"Four of his eunuchs were conveying me to the Augustan dungeons, when by a suddenly conceived manoeuvre, I broke from them and dashed through the window of the divan. The fall was greater than I had thought, and for some time I was entirely senseless. Whether the eunuchs followed me out of the window I know not, but when I came to myself, I was in my own dwelling, and a number of my servants were standing by me. It seemed that one of the night-soldiers was passing at the time I leaped forth, and instantly recognizing me, he conveyed me to my dwelling. But though I am safe for the present, yet that safety may not be long, for the king has reason to fear me?"
"So he has 
reason
 to fear others," replied Moran, as the old man concluded, and then bending upon Al-Bassa a searching look, he continued:
"Was it a murder that Modad wished thee to perform?"
Al-Bassa started at the question, but he did not answer ere Moran added:
"I have a reason for asking this question—a most potent reason. Was it not the murder of thy old dervise, Abdah Nazor, that the king wished thee to do?"
At this question, Al-Bassa hesitated but a moment, for he saw that the censor had by some means become possessed of more knowledge than he had thought for, and quickly clearing away his reserve he answered:
"Since it appears that you have obtained a clue to what I suppose was not even suspected by any save Modad and myself, I may as well tell thee the truth. It 
was
 because I refused to murder that old man that the monarch sought my life."
"So I thought," Moran said, while the peculiar expression of his countenance grew deeper; "but perhaps that was only a pretext of the king's. If I mistake not, Modad had ere that resolved upon your death."
Al-Bassa gazed up into the face of the censors in blank astonishment. He could not conceive how 'twas possible for them to have become possessed of a knowledge with regard to himself which must have been even prior to his own suspicions, for not until the preceding evening had the thought ever entered his mind that his king meditated personal harm against himself. Had he suspected such a thing, he would have sooner cast off the timid fear that had so long marked his old age, and which had been noticed by all who knew him.
"You need not be surprised Al-Bassa," continued Moran, "for we know of many things that transpire within the royal palace, which perhaps you, even, are ignorant of, Velorus and myself have not been idle in our seats, and from the thousand and one persons who are weekly flocking to us, we learn much that might profit even royalty itself. The secret of Modad's trouble we know, and are also aware of the circumstances to which that has given birth."
"Do you know of the loss of—of—"
"The talisman from the royal treasury, you would say," said Moran, as Al-Bassa hesitated.
"Then you know all, worthy censors, and can judge of my situation; but still I am at a loss to comprehend how you learned this. You must have some powerful agency at work in your behalf."
"Yes, 'tis powerful," returned Moran, but yet I think you might guess the source of information."
The censor spoke in a curious tone, and after a moment's thought the truth flashed upon the mind of the old man. Surely he knew whom the king feared, and in a half interrogatory manner he said:
"Abdah Nazor told you."
"You are right, Al-Bassa. The old dervise has kept us informed of all that has transpired, and I assure you that we are governed not a little by the information thus gained. Since we have had two-thirds of the king's duty to perform, it has been fortunate for us that we have known somewhat of his secrets."
"But this Abdah Nazor," uttered the old counsellor, "who is he that possesses such secrets."
"Simply an old dervise who has lived among the fastnesses of Mount Hor for many years, and who seems to possess a vast deal of knowledge that he takes no pains to communicate."
"But simple knowledge cannot give a man power over the king's secrets."
"True," returned Moran, "yet Abdah Nazor possesses these secrets, and— I have no fear that you will tattle, Al-Bassa, for I trust you as one who is already aware of the king's true character and designs."
"Speak on, sir." Al-Bassa quickly answered, as a look of anxiety rested upon his features. "If there be a man in Petra who has a right to know all that can bear upon the affairs of the king and the civil government, then I am surely the man."
"I believe you," said Moran, "and what I know, you shall know. What strange power it is that the old dervise possesses, I know not, but sure it is that he 
has
 a power over the destinies of the kingdom, and though at first, the thing appeared inconsistent and almost impossible, yet I believe now that he has even the king himself under his mysterious control, though as yet he has not drawn upon the reins which he holds in his hands."
"Do you speak in riddles?" Al-Bassa asked, as he heard the censor through, seeming unable to take what he had heard as literal.
"Not at all," was Moran's reply.
"Then Abdah Nazor is to all intents and purposes, himself a king," thoughtfully remarked the counsellor, speaking rather to himself than to the men before him.
"I mistake me if he does not at least possess more kingly power and qualities," returned the censor, "and to tell the truth, I sometimes think that he is not the old dervise that he pretends to be."
"Have you then suspicions?"
"No, for I have nothing to suspect. Suspicion implies more than I feel, for the old man has never said ought concerning his station, but I 
think
 that he is yet to appear in some different light,—how or what, I know not."
"And do you think he will exercise the power soon?" Al-Bassa asked, in a nervous, anxious manner.
"It cannot be a great while first."
"God grant that it may not," murmured the counsellor, and while a shade of painful anguish passed over his features, he continued:
"O, if I had known this, perhaps the heavy blow that has fallen upon me might have been averted,—my soul might have yet dwelt in the light of its earthly heaven. But 'tis past now. My own weakness brought it upon me, and I must suffer its sting."
"Do not fail in your heart yet, Al-Bassa, for the Khaibarite king may yet be brought upon his knees. You see, I know all about your trouble, but though I can give thee no assurance of hope for your child, yet I can advise thee to rest as much as possible upon the future."
Al-Bassa fastened a keen, searching glance upon the censor as he spoke, and he thought that in his manner he could perceive more meaning than was uttered in words, yet he dared not ask a question for fear of betraying emotions which he cared not should be seen, for as he stood now before the two censors he felt himself to be humbled and degraded. Never before had he realized to what an extent he had been guilty in his submission to the baseness of the king, nor had he ever before felt the depth of degradation to which he had lowered himself, for now he fully realized what a hypocritical tyrant he had bent before. Then, too, the thought insinuated itself upon his mind, that, had he at first rejected the proposal of the king with regard to his daughter, and, as was his moral duty, appealed to the people against the wrong, all might have been well with him. But his cowardly fear of the threats of a still more cowardly king had crushed him down, and his thoughts upon neglected duties only made him more miserable; so he tried to banish them, and looking up into the censors' faces, he said:
"What you have told me is indeed strange. When I came, I had thought myself the possessor of secrets which I feared to tell thee, but I find that I must learn of thee. But I hear that there are people without who probably seek
 admittance, but before I go I would ask for that which brought me here,—protection from the enmity of the king."
For a few moments the two censors conversed together in a low tone, and then turning to the old counsellor, Moran said:
"You will be safe to-night in your own dwelling, and so you will be for a long time, for the king dares not send a force after you sufficient to drag you to him, as that would be the occasion of more publicity than he dares give his diabolical acts. Let your trusty servants be set on the watch, and rest you in peace till there is real danger."
Al-Bassa turned to go, but ere he had gone far he hesitated a moment, and then turned back.
"One question more," said he, "and I will leave. In what mood are the people towards their king?"
"They know but little of him as a whole; but those who do know him bear him a perfect hatred, though, like all people who bow before an absolute monarchy, they would not dare to oppose him."
As Al-Bassa received this answer, he turned once more towards the door, and was soon in the street, where he found some half-dozen of the citizens waiting to gain admittance to the audience of the censors. He had forgotten in the whirl of his thoughts, to draw his mantle over his face, and the citizens bowed respectfully before him as they recognized the old counsellor.
There was a tremulousness in his answer as he returned the salute, and blaming himself for his forgetfulness, he passed on and carefully hid his features within the folds of his outer garment.
As Al-Bassa passed over the bridge, he found himself to be its sole occupant, and stopping for a moment, he leaned over the marble wall that guarded its sides, and gazed thoughtfully into the limpid stream beneath. The old woman whom we left upon the structure had gone, and save here and there, where a solitary pedestrian was wending his way homeward, all was still and quiet. The cool, fresh breeze swept gratefully over the burning brow of the old man, and with a sudden start, as though the thought of his present unprotected situation had but just entered his mind, he turned from the bridge, and hastened towards his dwelling.
With a cautious, but yet hurried step, the counsellor pursued his way, until at length he reached the small square within which stood the monumental tomb of Dilotus. The place was sacred ground, and nought but the footfall of Al-Bassa broke its solemn stillness. A bronze railing guarded the base of the monument from the tomb of the profane, and from within this railing, just as the old man came opposite to it, leaped forth a human form.
"Hold, there!" exclaimed the person who had thus unceremoniously shown himself. "Ere you pass on, I would see that face of yours."
"Stand back," said Al-Bassa, endeavoring to assume a calmness which he did not feel.
"Not until I see that face of yours," persisted the stranger, as he laid his hand upon the old man's shoulder.
"And what can my face be to you!" Al-Bassa asked, while a fear of some impending evil crept over him.
"It may be much,—perhaps, nothing."
"Then it can be nothing. Let me pass, or it may be the worse for thee."
As Al-Bassa spoke, he shook off the grasp that was laid upon his shoulder, but in so doing he also released the mantle from his head, and though the night was only relieved by the stars, yet the stranger at once recognized the pedestrian, for placing his hand quickly back upon its hold of the old man's shoulder with a firmer grip than before, he said:
"Al-Bassa, you are the very man I seek," and then turning to the place from which he had first appeared, he gave a low whistle, which soon brought two more men to his assistance.
"What means this? Why am I, the king's counsellor, thus stopped in my way?"
"It is because you 
are
 the king's counsellor," laconically replied the man who held him.
"And does the 
king
 send for me that!"
 asked the counsellor, while he trembled at every joint.
"He has sen for thee, and the sooner he sees your countenance, the better he will be pleased."
"Then tell Modad that I will attend him as soon as possible. I must first repair to my dwelling, then I will make such haste as I can."
"O, good counsellor, the king has given us directions not to put you to that trouble. We will conduct you at once to his presence."
Al-Bassa's heart sank within him at this announcement, and with all his lately accumulated courage, he found his spirits fast drooping before the calamity that now threatened him. He thought not of resistance against the three men who now surrounded him, and without a struggle, he suffered himself to be led away.
In the next square from that of Dilotus, stood a still more splendid column which rose above the remains of the lamented Merolboth. Its base was a huge marble mausoleum, elaborately carved with inscriptions and emblems, and as Al-Bassa's eyes fell upon the towering pile, he instinctively prayed that the spirit of the good, departed king might come now to his assistance.
Hardly had the three messengers and their victim approached the monument, when a dusky form was seen to glide forth from its base and stand in their way. At first they would have stopped, but the form stood in their only available passage, and with a quick step they hastened on, but as they came near to the strange object which had thus intruded itself in their way, they were stopped short by its movement, and a shudder ran through the frame of him who appeared to be the chief of the king's emissaries, as he recognized Ossifrage, the old seeress of Petra.
"Hold, a moment," exclaimed the old woman, as she waved her hand towards the advancing party. "Have any of ye seen the old counsellor, Al-Bassa?"
The old man started, as he heard his name thus pronounced, but a strong hand forced him back, and then turning towards the seeress his captor said:
"Go your way, woman, and if you would find him whom ye seek, go ask at his dwelling."
"Al-Bassa is not there," Ossifrage returned, at the same time advancing. "I have seen him once to-night where ye followed him yourselves, and now I would see him again."
"Back, old woman. Interrupt not the king's messengers. Back, I say."
"The 
king's
 messengers are messengers of Satan. 
I
 come from one more powerful than the king. Now back 
ye
, while I look upon the face of him whom ye lead thus unwillingly along."
As the old woman spoke, she stalked boldly forward, and with a sort of intuitive dread, the three men fell slightly back from the way. Ossifrage bent her eyes searchingly upon the form of the old man, and then turning to him who held him, said:
"I pardon ye for your deception, but now I would take that old man myself. Let him go, therefore, and haste ye back to your king, and tell him to bide my pleasure."
"Come, come, old woman," exclaimed the king's men. "I would not strike such as thou, but, by the royal talisman, I'll stand no more of thy prating."
"Ha! ha! ha! the 
royal talisman!
" bitterly laughed the seeress, as she shook off the hand that was menacingly laid upon her. "Go, dastards, and ask your king if 
he
 dares swear by that sacred jewel!" Then changing her tone to a deeper meaning, she continued:
"Go now, while you may go in peace, for I came not upon my errand unprepared."
Again the leader of the king's party laid his hand upon the woman's arm, and with a rough push he thrust her from the path, while, pulling Al-Bassa with more vigor along, he essayed to pass on; but he soon found that he had counted without his host, for at a sharp clap from the hands of the seeress, half a score of men rushed forth from the deep shade of Morolboth's mausoleum, and in a moment more, two of the captors lay stunned upon the pavement, while the third fled hastily away towards the royal palace.
For a moment Al-Bassa comprehended not what had taken place, but as his scattered senses came back to his aid, he found himself surrounded by his own servants, while the two prostrate men, who had now recovered from the blows which had felled them, regained their feet and fled.
"How is this? Who has thus rescued me from the lion's jaws?" asked Al-Bassa, as he cast his eyes in wonder upon the strange woman before him. He knew that he was rescued, for his most trusty servants were gathered about him.
"One has rescued thee," replied Ossifrage, "who will yet protect thee. I watched thy steps as you entered the temple of the censors, and I marked the three men who followed thee. I knew them for Modad's servants, and hastening to thy house I secured assistance in season. But you must not go back to thy dwelling, for there is no safety for thee there at present. Let your servants go back and protect your property, while you follow me."
Al-Bassa gazed upon the old woman with marked wonder, and for the moment he seemed puzzled how to act.
"What assurance have I," asked he, "that I shall be safe with you?"
"I come from one who is able to protect you, and if you follow me, you will be safe."
"Who is he?"
"Abdah Nazor."
Al-Bassa started as he heard that name, and as the conversation of the censors came back to his mind, he bade the woman lead the way, and then directing his servants to look well to his house, he followed his mysterious guide.
CHAPTER XV.
The king learns of the failure of his plan for Al-Bassa's capture, but makes it the grounds for a new seizure. A sudden and fearful suspicion, and the strange test to which the suspected one is put.
MONARCHS are never more happy than are their subjects, and fortunate indeed is the kingly ruler who is not more miserable; but it would be difficult to imagine the fearful agitation that went burning and searing through the soul of Modad, when his messengers returned and informed him of the escape of Al-Bassa. At first he raved at his own misfortune—then he raved at his three discomfited servants, and for the moment he threatened them with the death which the counsellor had escaped; but a little more reason showed him that they were not to blame for the mishap, and, moreover, that his safest course was to keep as many of his trusty servants as possible.
"Ossifrage, you say this woman's name is?" uttered the king, as he at length gained sufficient calmness to speak.
"Yes, sire."
"And do you know where she resides?"
"Very nearly, sire. It is somewhere in the old river pass."
"A fitting abode, truly. She shall be seen to anon," uttered the king. "If that be her hole we will hunt her out. Do you know, Ahab, where Al-Bassa had been?"
"Yes, sire. We followed him to the temple of the censors, where he staid a full hour."
"Are you sure he had been with the censors?" asked Modad, turning pale and stopping short in the uneasy, nervous walk he had been keeping up.
"Yes, your majesty."
"Perhaps," the king uttered, while a gleam of momentary relief shot athwart his troubled features, "he went merely to hear the censors dispense justice. There must have been others there beside himself?"
"No, sire," returned Ahab, instinctively drawing back a step—for he saw that the king had entertained a hope which his answer would dash to the ground. "Al-Bassa was alone with the censors."
"How know you that, sirrah?"
"Because the doors were locked."
"Didst try them?"
"No, sire; but a number of the citizens gathered upon the pavement in front of the
 building who could not gain admittance till Al-Bassa came out."
"And he came out alone?"
"I think he did. We were on the other side of the bridge when he came forth, and started immediately on, but yet I think he was alone."
"
Think!
 Could you not swear to it?"
"Yes, sire."
During the space of a minute the monarch walked to and fro in his apartment, with his hands clutched tightly, and his eyes bent upon the carpet. A train of fierce thoughts seemed to be whirling through his brain, while a consuming fire raged in his bosom. At length he stopped, and turning quickly upon Ahab, he said, with startling energy:
"You say the doors of the censors' temple were 
locked?
"
"Yes, sire," returned the man, trembling at the king's manner.
"And that they were thus locked for a full hour?"
"I did."
"And that my minister—Al-Bassa—held secret converse with them?"
"I think he did."
"
Think!
 sirrah? Can you not swear to what your own eyes have seen?"
"Yes, your majesty—I can swear to that."
"'Tis well," muttered Modad to himself, as he started again on his pacing walk, but with more calmness than before. "I am well nigh pleased that this thing has happened, for I like not the power which these same censors are assuming, though there was no need that Al-Bassa should have escaped."
As the king gave utterance to this last sentence the shadow deepened upon his brow, but a ray of demoniac hope soon followed it, and turning to Ahab, he asked:
"Dost know where to find Nabal, the centurion?"
"I know where his quarters are, sire, but I think he has retired to his rest ere this."
"I care not for that. There can be no rest for the soldier while the city is in danger. Go you to the centurion's house and bid him hasten hither with all speed."
As Modad turned, after his messenger had gone, he met the keen, penetrating glance of one of his mutes. It was nothing strange that the poor fellow, who was governed only by his sight, should sometimes look with more than ordinary sharpness, but still the king was startled by that look, and had an asp at that moment been drawing its slimy form over his sandalled feet, he would not have stopped more suddenly in his way than he did before that glance of his mute. A moment he looked upon the speechless slave with a searching eye, and then, as his hands came significantly together, he motioned for the mutes to remain where they were, and left the apartment.
for fifteen minutes the mutes were thus left alone, and though at times a sort of inquisitive glance would pass between them, yet the same look of stoical indifference that generally characterized their deportment still rested upon their features, and, save the gleaming of their brilliant eyes, a marble statue might have exhibited almost as much life as did they.
At length the heavy drapery that hung directly behind where they stood was moved noiselessly aside, and the king peeped cautiously forth. The slaves' backs were both towards him, and with a bolder step Modad stepped forth from the arras and stood for a moment in their rear. He knew that he had not been seen, and lifting the drapery up he beckoned to some one behind it, and a stout trumpeter stepped forth and stood beside the king. As yet the mutes had not stirred, and at a sign from Modad the musician placed his trumpet to his mouth, and turning its muzzle full upon the ear of the suspected mute, he blew a blast that made the very walls of the apartment tremble.
The sound died away, but not a muscle moved in the countenance of the poor slave. The same marble stiffness remained, and the same stoicism dwelt upon his face. The trumpeter stepped back from whence he came, and the king moved out into the apartment; but though the strange experiment might have satisfied the
 most skeptical mind, yet the suspicion which had seized upon the king was not easily to be removed. Fear gives wings to the wildest of fancies, but in the breast of Modad not only the fears had good foundations, but even his fancies were not without substance. Encompassed as he was by dangers which he could not see, and met at every turn by obstacles which he dreamed not of, while his most important secrets took wings and flew from him, it is no wonder that the slightest shadow should darken upon his soul—it is no wonder that mere feathers floating upon the sea of circumstance should appear to his distorted imagination like giants of portentous evil.
Soon after the king had turned from watching the countenance of his slave the centurion for whom he had sent entered his presence.
"Ah, good Nabal," Modad exclaimed, his mind turning instantly back to its previous subject of absorbing interest, "you are in good season. Dost know where dwell the two censors, Moran and Velorus?"
"Yes, sire," replied the centurion, his countenance at the same time betraying the surprise the question had occasioned.
"Then on the morrow take you a sufficient guard and arrest both these censors and bring them before me."
"Moran and Velorus, sire?"
"Yes."
"Of course your majesty knows what you are doing?"
"Dost think me demented?" half angrily exclaimed the king, in reply to Nabal's question. "On the morrow the censors must both be arrested. You understand me!"
"I understand the order, sire, and I am ready to obey it, but still I would warn thee that those two men may not be taken without just grounds."
The centurion bowed low as he spoke, and then calmly awaited the king's reply.
"Centurion," cried Modad, vexed beyond measure at the cool manner in which he was thus advised, but yet not giving way to the anger that was perceptible in his heaving bosom; "I would have thee understand that the king of Petra dares do what he pleases. Did I choose take half the citizens prisoners, I should do it without a fear. Tell me, Nabal," he continued, growing more excited, and striking his hand heavily upon his breast, "am I to be a king, and not dare exercise a king's authority?"
"You misunderstand me, sire," meekly replied the centurion. "I meant not that your majesty had not the 
power
, but yet you must be aware that the citizens have 
some
 rights upon which even a king may not trample with impunity. The censors are the people's arbiters, and you must blame me not if I tell thee that they are too firmly enshrined within the affections of the citizens to be easily removed."
"Ha! centurion, thou speakest the truth," Modad exclaimed, while his eyes sparkled and flashed in their mad light. "These censors 
have
 obtained the affections of the people—they 
have
 insinuated themselves into the confidence of my subjects, and now, 
now
, Nabal, they would use their influence against our peace. Let this thing be done openly—let it be done boldly—when you take them proclaim it if you will, that they are 
traitors
—that they are 
conspirators!
 and if a man dares to even look resistance, cut him down."
"Traitors! Conspirators! Moran and Velorus conspired against the city!" uttered the centurion, in blank amazement.
"Ay, Nabal—they have been watched, and their temple hath been locked against the citizens while they held secret converse with one whom I 
know
 to be plotting against the king. Is not that sufficient reason for their arrest? Go, centurion, and bring me the censors hither as I have bidden thee. Take this signet, and let it be thine authority against all opposition."
As the king spoke, he drew from his finger a massive ring and gave it to the officer. The centurion received the token, and as he placed it upon his hand the monarch added:
"Now go, good Nabal, and early on the morrow let me see thine errand done."
The centurion bowed in token of acquiescence.
CHAPTER XVI.
Marmiel's prophetic farewell. A fortunate meeting. The suspicious horseman. An interruption which changes the plan of procedure. The temple of Taurus. The Bull and the Cross!
WHILE the king was consulting with the centurion for the seizure of the two censors there was being enacted a scene without the city, which, had he known it, might have sunk the shaft of fear still deeper into his soul.
Just at the base of Mount Hor, within half an hour's ride of the Petran pass, a party of horsemen had drawn up their somewhat jaded steeds by the side of the Lady Selina's pavilion. Marmiel rode up to Noureddin's side, and casting his eyes around upon the heavens, he said:
"Noureddin, it must be now near midnight, and from hence you must go without me, but if ever you need the services of strong arms and willing hearts, if you can but hunt up Marmiel and his troop, they will be ready at your service."
"I thank thee, my friend," Noureddin returned, as he extended his hand, "and I believe you speak the truth; but I trust I may never have occasion to call for the assistance you would extend; should I, however, chance to need it, I might not hesitate to seek you out. Fare thee well, Marmiel, till we meet again."
"One boon I would ask ere I go," said the Arab chief, still holding his young friend by the hand.
"Name it."
"I would bid adieu to the Lady Selina."
"God forbid that you should ask in vain for such a boon. Go, Marmiel, and let her thank you for the service you have rendered."
Selina had pushed aside the curtains of her pavilion, and within burned a waxen taper, by the light of which, Miriam had been drawing some curious hieroglyphics upon a small piece of parchment. She had heard the conversation of the two men, and she could not repress the shudder that crept through her frame as she saw the dusky form of the powerful Arab approaching through the gloom. The burning taper threw its struggling beams out through the opening in the tapestry, and Selina anxiously watched for the moment when they should reveal the savage features of him whom, though he had proved a preserver, she could not yet help fearing.
"Fair lady," said Marmiel, as he came near, "I am about to leave you for my mountain home, but ere I go I could not resist the temptation of bidding farewell to one whose sweet face I may never forget. My introduction to you was anything but favorable, but I trust that you have already forgiven me for that."
Selina gazed in rapt wonder upon the features of the man who spoke to her. That forbidding, savage expression was gone, and in its place there shone such a light of natural good feeling and friendship, that she could not help blaming herself for the momentary fear she had experienced.
"I trust I do not intrude," continued the Arab, as he marked the hesitation of the maiden.
"O, no, sir," exclaimed the fair girl, as she frankly took the rough, hard hand that had been extended to her. "A friend such as you have proved, can never intrude. The weight of my own gratitude made me silent, and if I fail to express my thanks in words, they are nevertheless pure and heartfelt. May God bless thee for the part thou hast done, and that your future life may be a blessing to yourself and to others will be my earnest prayer."
"Sweet blossom of innocence and purity, I thank thee for that," the stout Arab exclaimed, while the shade upon his features grew softer, and a tear glistened in his bright eye, "and if the blessings of one like me can affect thee aught, then thou hast them without measure; but I think not, lady, that we have met for the last time, for if both our lives be spared, we shall yet be together again. There is a star in the horizon that is yet to rise and shine with a brighter light, and beneath its bright beams we may meet once more. Till then I leave thee in God's arms."
As Marmiel spoke, he pressed the maiden's hand to his lips, and then turning quickly away he reined his horse from the place. Selina gazed after his stalwart form as it became indistinct in the gloom, and long she rested upon the strange words he had spoken. That there was some mysterious prophecy in his language she could not doubt, and when, at length, she turned her gaze within the pavilion the gleam that fitfully trembled upon her fair features seemed to indicate that she had at least caught a glimpse of their meaning, though the cloud that had been thus rent was by no means dispelled nor lightened.
The Arab horsemen were drawn up for their departure, and as Marmiel found them all in order he rode up to Noureddin's side once more and grasped him by the hand.
"Fare thee well, my young friend, for the present," he said. "In yonder pavilion you have a jewel worth preserving with even life, and the best blessing I can wish for thee is, that thou mayest live to be blessed by her."
Marmiel stopped not to hear Noureddin's reply, but placing himself quickly at the head of his men, he waved his hand to his followers, and the whole Arab troop were ere long lost in the shades of night. The young man followed the departing horsemen till they had disappeared from sight, and then calling Molech to his side he gave directions for the moving on of his own train.
"How much further shall we ride before you can allow us to seek safety in the mountains?" asked Molech, as he rode up to his leader's side.
"Till we come to the Eblian Pass," returned Noureddin. "From thence I can direct you to a place of safety, till I can come to your assistance."
"I fear we shall be forever excluded from the city, for surely we shall not dare again to see the king."
"If it must be so, then let it be," the youth answered. "You have life, at all events, and that you would not have had had the circumstances not transpired which have brought your present situation upon you."
"True," returned Molech, "but still it will be hard to find sustenance among the mountains for any length of time."
"Fear not for that, Molech. There dwells in yonder mountain one of whom I have yet to
 ask counsel. From him you shall receive all the assistance you will need."
Molech rode back to his station, and as Noureddin was in the act of turning towards the pavilion, his attention was arrested by a dark object which seemed to be approaching him from ahead. At first, the thought of some new danger flashed through his mind, but as it came nearer he thought he recognized one whose motions he knew, and in a moment more he leaped from his horse and fell at the feet of Abdah Nazor!
"My dear master," he exclaimed, as he rose to his feet and grasped the old man by the hand, "God be praised, that I meet you thus again."
"And I praise him, my son, that thou art again restored to me. I have met thee most opportunely."
"That you have, good father, but still I am surprised that you should be here, for surely you could have had no notice of my coming?"
"Yes, I did, Noureddin."
"And how?"
"Just at nightfall, from the top of the mountain, I espied thy troop. At first I doubted that it could be thee, but even my old eyes distinguished the pavilion, and I knew that you had returned. But who were those horsemen that then bore thee company?"
"Do you remember Marmiel?"
"He whom we entertained at our cave?"
"The same man."
"Yes, my son, I remember him well, for even then he swore to serve thee."
"'Twas he and his party whom you saw," returned Noureddin, and thereupon he related to the old dervise all that had transpired since he left, being careful to take as little credit upon his own shoulders as possible.
For some time after the youth had closed his narrative, the old man gazed in silence upon him. Even through the darkness Noureddin could see the look of peculiar pride that dwelt upon his features.
"And did you awe the Nubians with fear of your single arm?"
"I know not that they feared my arm," the young man replied; "but openly they did not resist me."
"No, they 
dared
 not do it, my son. 'Twas in thine eye and in thy manner that dwelt the power which awed them. And this you did for the safety of one whom you would protect?"
"For the safety of one whom God has placed in my charge—for the safety of virtue and innocence—my life shall ever be the guard."
Abdah Nazor took the hand of his pupil, and in a tone of the deepest meaning, he said:
"Noureddin, you have come forth bright from the furnace, though in truth I knew not that the coals would be heaped so plentifully upon thee; but all this is well, however, and I shall now read thy destiny without doubting."
The youth had too often asked in vain for a solution of the mystery to which his old tutor alone held the key, to press the matter now, and so passing on to matters of more immediate import, he said:
"One thing, my kind master, you can help me to now. I have pledged my faithful Egyptian followers, that I would see them safe from the power of the king."
"How many have you left?"
"Twelve."
"Then let them follow us into the city."
"But I have promised that they should not come within the power of the king."
"Neither shall they. I will find them shelter in a place where no power of the king's can find them."
"Within the city walls?"
"Ay, 
in
 the city walls."
"Then the sooner we enter the better," Noureddin said, seeming to understand that the old man had some safe place of concealment marked out.
The young leader turned to one of the eunuchs and ordered him to lead forward one of the spare horses, and as soon as it was brought the old dervise mounted, and the train again set forward. It was somewhat past midnight when the party arrived at the entrance of the narrow pass that led into the city, and the guard stopped
 ped them for examination, but Noureddin still held the written commission which he had received from the king, and upon producing it he was allowed to pass without further question; but before he had started on, while yet the officer was examining his commission, a man moved stealthily away from the place, and as soon as the darkness had hidden him from the view of those behind, he darted swiftly away towards the city. No one had noticed his movements, nor had Abdah Nazor or his companion the least suspicion that any one had gone in advance of them, and unsuspectingly they moved on their way through the pass.
"Hark!" said Noureddin, in a startled tone, as his train had gained a third of the way through the Petran notch. "Do you not hear the sound of a horse's hoofs ahead of us?"
"Some night-soldier, probably," remarked Abdah Nazor, as the distant sound struck upon his ear.
"Then he must be on extraordinary business, for hear, how furiously he rides."
As Noureddin spoke, they both listened to the sounds, and ere long the deep reverberations died away, and nought but an indistinct clattering was heard.
"Whoever it is, he has cleared the pass," the old man said. "It may be a spy, but still I see not what clue could have been had upon us. But let us push boldly on, for even in the hands of Modad himself, we have nothing to fear."
It was full half an hour ere the party reached the city, and when they did so they took the street which led around by the northern wall, which they followed till they came to a huge building that had been cut out of the solid rock, and which was used as a sort of garrison for a squadron of soldiers. They had passed the building, and were about to turn off further to the right, through a sort of natural defile that led through a street of tombs, when the old man's attention was arrested by the form of a man just crossing the way in front of them.
"How now, strangers? What party is this?" asked the individual who had approached.
Noureddin was upon the point of answering, when Abdah Nazor motioned him to be silent, and turning towards the stranger, he said:
"Do I recognize Nabal, the centurion?"
The stranger came nearer, and seeming for the first time to recognize the old man, he replied, as he cast a furtive glance about him:
"You are right, Abdah Nazor; but tell me, what strange guise is this in which you appear?"
"That is a matter which alone concerns the king," the old man answered. "Our party is chiefly composed of the king's eunuchs, as you may see for yourself."
"There is something here I cannot comprehend," the centurion uttered, as he gazed first upon the eunuchs, and then upon the old man and his young companion, "for but now I met—"
Nabal hesitated ere he spoke further, and alighting from his horse, Abdah Nazor took the centurion on one side, and said, in a tone that could be heard by none save themselves:
"Tell me what you have to communicate, Nabal, for I see by thy manner that thou hast learned of something which relates to myself."
"An officer of the king's may not always tell the things he knows."
"Not if he loves an evil king more than he loves a suffering people," slowly returned the old man, as he bent a calm, dignified look upon the man before him.
"In the truth of the living God, I do 
not
 love an evil king more than I love the people."
"Then tell me what you know concerning the king's intentions towards me, for well I know by your manner that you know somewhat of that which I ask. Perhaps you have seen the king to-night?"
"Not an hour since, but from 
him
 I learned nothing concerning you."
"The king must have urgent business to call thee to his presence at such a season as this?"
"Ay, and somewhat curious, withal," the centurion replied; "but 'tis no secret, though, for he bade me proclaim it openly. On the
 morrow I am to arrest the two censors on the charge of treason."
"Do you speak in good faith, Nabal?"
"In truth I do, sir—I bear the king's signet for that purpose."
"And this treason—what is it?"
"I know not, except that they have had the doors of the temple locked while they held converse with some one whom the king declares to have conspired against him."
"Ah, Modad, Modad," exclaimed the old man, raising his eyes to heaven, "how hast thou debased—how dishonored, the mantle which thy sainted brother let fall upon thy shoulders; but surely thy day of reckoning is at hand. Even now thy star burns dimly, and with a fitful light in the heavens, and soon it shall set to rise no more. Set, did I say! No, Modad, thy star shall not 
set
—it shall be swept away from the starry track, and its atoms shall be annihilated—utterly and forever!"
The centurion gazed in astonishment upon the features of the dervise, to which the night-gloom gave a cast of peculiar solemnity, but ere he found words for either a question or an answer, Abdah Nazor continued:
"But come, good Nabal, I forget myself. Tell me without fear what thou hast learned respecting myself, and as sure as the one living and true God reigneth there shall no harm come to thee for it."
There was a strange power of assurance in the old man's manner, and the centurion seemed to catch its influence, for without further hesitation, he replied:
"Then, Abdah Nazor, I will tell thee what I know. The king has been on the watch for thee, and a short time since one of his spies carried him the information that you were entering the city by the pass. He was too late to intercept you there, and so he has sent a strong body of men to form an ambush near the old passage of the river, for by some means he has learned that you have been seen to go in there. This I learned from the officer who had command of the enterprise, and whom I met on his way thither not ten minutes ere I met you. Knowing this you will not wonder that I thought it strange to find you in company, and in apparent command, of a body of the king's own eunuchs."
"That seeming anomaly shall ere long be explained to thee, Nabal, and I thank thee for the information thou hast given; but I have one more favor to ask."
"Name it."
"Go you on the morrow and do the king's bidding, but ere you take the censors before him tell them to have no fear—tell them to answer all questions boldly and truthfully—tell them that Abdah Nazor knows of their situation, and that harm shall not come upon them. Will you tell them this?"
"I will."
"Then peace be with thee. The king has closed one path against me, but the granite walls of Petra open wide their arms in an hundred places to let me in."
As the dervise spoke, he returned to his horse and remounted, at the same time explaining to Noureddin what had occurred. The eunuchs were struck with a deadly fear at the interruption, and instinctively they gathered about their young leader, but he soon re-assured them, and once more emboldened by hopes of safety they urged their horses onward. Only a few rods were traversed ere Abdah Nazor reached another of those huge buildings, or rather excavations, carved out from the solid rock, before which he bade Noureddin stop the train.
"You will not stop here," the young man said, in amazement, as he recognized the old temple of Taurus, which had been closed by a royal edict for over half a century.
"Yes, my son. Wait you here while I enter by a private way and throw open the doors."
The old man alighted from his horse, and soon disappeared through a narrow arch-way which led into the right of the temple, and while Noureddin still wondered at the event, the heavy brazen doors creaked upon their hinges, and in a few moments more the tramp of horses echoed through the lofty arches of the place which had been shut to the world for fifty
 long years! Upon its pedestal of porphyry still stood the gigantic golden bull, but upon his back was reared the Cross!
"Here we may rest in peace and safety, my daughter," said Abdah Nazor, as Noureddin led Selina forward and explained to her that the old man was his tutor and guide. "'Tis a strange place for our lodging, but 'tis secure."
Selina gazed about her, but the single taper which the dervise had lighted revealed nothing beyond them save the golden bull, which stood like a giant spirit of the race that had gone. Poor Miriam caught the beams that were reflected from the gilded god, and her simple, benighted mind could there see a deity. She dared not fall upon her knees, but clasping her hands, she uttered a silent prayer, and in her heart she felt happier. Her soul comprehended not the invisible—her mind could dictate no prayer to a power which was not made visible to the eye.
Selina grasped her young preserver by the hand and led him towards the pedestal of Taurus. He followed the direction of her eyes, and they rested upon the cross! In a moment he comprehended her meaning, and together they knelt at the shrine and poured forth their young hearts' thanksgiving and prayer to their God.
That prayer, so simple, so heart-felt, offered up at the cross which Christianity had reared upon the heathen god, might have exorcised forever the last pagan memory that clung to the place!
CHAPTER XVII.
The meshes of the net grow closer and stronger. The coward can yet plan for safety. The secret passage. A meeting, and a demand which causes much astonishment in two of our characters.
ON the following morning the king was early astir, and ere he was dressed he had received a report from him who had been sent to intercept Abdah Nazor.
"And saw you nothing of this old man, Ahab?"
"Not even his shadow, sire. But one living soul in the streets, save my own party, did my eyes rest upon, and that was the centurion whom you sent me for, and whom I overtook on his return home."
"Mizar," said the king, turning to the servant who had brought him the intelligence of the old dervise's whereabouts, "are you sure that 'twas Abdah Nazor whom you saw at the pass?"
"Yes, sire. I know him well, and I saw his features distinctly by the light of the officer's torch as he examined the party."
"
Party
, said you, Mizar?"
"I told thee last night he had companions."
"Ay—I remember me now—thou didst make mention of a party, but the presence of this old soothsaying traitor so absorbed me, that I gave it not note. But what was this party?"
"Some party of your own, I should say, your majesty, for there were a dozen of your own eunuchs."
"And did they enter the pass from the eastward?"
"Yes, sire."
"So soon! so soon!" murmured the king to himself, as he turned away from his servants and paced thoughtfully across the apartment. "
Ten
 of them, you said, Mizar?"
"Twelve, sire."
"No—you mistake; there were but 
ten
."
"I counted twelve of your eunuchs."
"
Twelve!
" uttered the king, trembling with a suspicion he could not repress.
"I am sure, sire—they were twelve of your Egyptians."
"
Egyptians!
" gasped the monarch, as he caught Mizar by the arm, and gazed wildly into his face. "Now, by the royal diadem, slave, if thou speakest a lie, or if for the instant thou triflest, thy head shall feed the eagles on the next hour. Speak! tell me 'twas 
ten Nubians
 whom you saw! Thine eyes deceived thee, Mizar—I know they did. Poh! poh! why such suspicions? '
Twas
 ten Nubians, Mizar?"
"No, sire," Mizar returned, in careful, measured accents. I counted them, and I marked well their features from my hiding-place as the torch flashed upon them, and they were surely your Egyptians. Bearing them company was a youth called Noureddin, whom—"
Mizar spoke no further, for at that moment the king gasped suddenly for breath—his face turned ashy pale, and he seized a marble column for support. For a full minute he stared at his servant, with eyeballs rolling wildly in their sockets—then laying his hand again upon Mizar's arm, he said, in a tone of freezing calmness:
"There were twelve Egyptians! Noureddin led them!"
"So it was, sire—and they bore a pavilion upon four camels."
"Didst see within the pavilion?"
"No, sire; but there burned a candle within it, for I saw its beams."
Ere the astonished monarch could recover his speech, the crimson arras was thrown hastily aside, and a courier, all covered with sweat and dust, rushed unbidden into the room.
"How now, sirrah?" cried Modad, starting forward, and stretching his nervous hand towards the new comer. "Do you, too, bear me croakings of ill? Speak!"
"Last night, sire," returned the courier, in hurried, frightened accents, "some time after the turn of midnight, the heathen temple—the temple of Taurus—was opened from within, and horses and camels went in!"
"Was this seen and not told to me before?"
"A woman, sire, from her house-top, saw it, but from her fright she dared not move out till daylight."
"Now, by the holy cross, I do know that open treason stalks through the kingdom!" the monarch exclaimed, as he clutched his hands, and set his teeth firmly together. "My realm has become the den of conspirators—but by the power of the living God they shall revel no longer!"
The meanest reptile can be made to turn resolutely in defence, and so the coward may be wrought up to a point of cool desperation. When Xerxes re-crossed the Hellespont, alone and unattended, in a small fishing-boat, he was not entirely down-hearted, nor were his energies all broken, for he still had a kingdom, and in Greece he still had an army left behind him, and though at home and abroad his enemies were strong and subtle, yet he pushed his fortunes in their face. So Modad felt, as he now resolved to seize the helm and push boldly through the troubled waters. His every energy was strung, and his very fears had made him savage in his fierce determination. What sent fright to others was a balm to him—the mysterious opening of the heathen temple was not strange to his mind, but it assured him that his prey was safe, for he knew that those who entered the city at night had sought refuge within its walls. Gradually the blood returned to its wonted flow through the monarch's veins, and his step became firm and steady. He paced the apartment a dozen times when the arras was again pushed aside and the centurion entered his presence.
"Ah, Nabal," the king exclaimed, "you are prompt. Are the censors with you?"
"They wait without, sire."
"I thank thee. Now, centurion, take all thy men, and command more, if you have need, and hasten to the temple of Taurus. Stare not at me in such surprise, for even that heathen pile contains within its bowels a nest of traitors. Bring them all hither—all whom you may find there, and at the peril of your life let not one escape. You will find Abdah Nazor, the old mountain dervise; a youth called Noureddin; twelve of my own Egyptian eunuchs, and mayhap a maiden. But what ails thee, Nabal?"
"Nothing, sire," replied the centurion, who had started at the king's announcement; "only I was surprised at the strangeness of the circumstance that the Temple of Taurus should have been opened."
"So you might well be," returned Modad,
 not suspecting that the centurion had other cause for his emotions than that which he had named. "Now go, Nabal, and see that you fail not in your mission. Remember—your head shall answer for it. As you go out, send the two censors hither with four of the eunuchs who wait without."
Then turning to his two household officers, Ahab and Mizar, he bade them accompany the centurion, and in a few moments more the censors stood before him. The king turned his flashing eyes upon them, but the calm, mild serenity of their countenances, and the grandeur of the upright soul which shone forth from their mild, beaming eyes, startled him more than would have the presence of one like himself.
"Worthy censors," he at length said, with a spice of bitter irony in his tone, "methinks I have caught you playing the Roman. There's treason in your sacred temple!"
"We must wait your majesty's explanation ere we answer to such a charge," calmly replied Moran.
"Then you shall have it," the king answered, highly excited at the coolness of the censors. "You have had the doors of your temple locked against the citizens, and that, too, while you held converse with my minister."
"You speak truly, sire."
"Ha! and dost own it, traitors!"
"That the temple was locked, and that we held converse with Al-Bassa—yes; but 'twas for 
your
 sake that the citizens were excluded."
Moran stood with folded arms, and as he spoke, he gazed steadily into the face of his monarch. Modad started at the remark, for not only the words were deep in their meaning, but the manner of him who uttered them gave them the clear color of truth.
"
My
 sake, did you say?" at length uttered the king.
"Yes, sire."
"Then I 
am
 threatened. Then there 
is
 a scheme on foot against me."
"No, your majesty. 'Twas Al-Bassa who needed protection. The only thing we feared against the king was his own conduct, whereby the royal character might suffer reproach. For this we kept the doors fast."
"Didst learn from 
whom
 the counsellor needed protection?" asked Modad, while he trembled beneath the steady gaze of the men before him.
"We did, sire."
"And who was it?"
"His king!"
"And you offered him what he sought?" cried the monarch, giving loose to his rage now that he found Al-Bassa had betrayed him.
"No, sire—we bade him return to his own dwelling, assuring him that you would not dare openly to molest him."
"That I should not 
dare!
 Did you tell him this?"
"We did."
A moment Modad's bosom heaved as he looked upon the men who thus undauntedly spoke the truth to his face; but that moment passed, and with it went the emotions he had exhibited. His face was as calm as was the surface of the marble pillar at his side, and through his blueish tinted lips he hissed:
"Now you shall know how much your king 
dares
 to do! From hence you go to your prison, and when you come forth from thence it will be to your death! Al-Bassa shall follow you soon, and so shall the dervise whom I believe to be at the bottom of the whole. Petra shall know that I am her king!"
"Modad," said Velorus, "you may send us to our death, but thy throne shall tremble beneath the blow that takes our lives."
"Away with them, slaves," the monarch exclaimed. "Place them in the strongest of the northern dungeons, and bring me the keys."
The eunuchs led the censors away from the king's presence, and as they went, Modad wondered why they were so calm and resigned. Little knew he of the assurance those two men had received ere they had been brought into his presence. 
He
 thought they looked thus calmly in view of death.
While the king is waiting for the result of some of his undertakings, let us turn once more
 to the party within the temple of Taurus. Abdah Nazor and Noureddin had arisen from their hard couches while yet the two girls slept, and even the eunuchs, though they were bowed down by fatigue, had been aroused by the first movements of their young leader. Through the large window that had been cut in the rock which formed the roof of the temple, the bright beams of morning were shining, and as they lighted up the vast interior, with its rows of granite benches and curiously carved columns and reliefs, a peculiar feeling of solemn foreboding crept over the young man's soul. Of the future, he had ever cared but little, save to live uprightly and walk in the laws of his God during his life, being willing to leave the result in the hands of him whom he trusted as a father. But now he felt differently. He had entwined about his heart a new set of impulses; a second soul had identified its earthly destinies with his own, and his own life, his own joy and happiness, had become second to that of another's. He gazed upon the pavilion wherein slept the object of his ardent love, and from thence his eyes wandered up to the cross that towered above the bull. The soft light that beamed forth upon his handsome features was too intense, too glowing and earnest, for self, and one who had seen him, might well have known that his silent prayer was for some one who knew not that he prayed.
"Noureddin," said the old man, as the youth turned from the cross, "you look sad this morning."
"No, father, not sad; but yet there lays a weight about my heart which makes me serious."
"Ere your head shall wear the silver that glistens upon my brow, my son, you will learn that much of life is serious; but now you are sad."
"Well, perhaps I am," returned Noureddin; "for, to tell thee the truth, I fear that some harm may yet be in our path.'
"What, my son—
Fear?
"
"Nay, Abdah Nazor, not for myself—I know no fear from earth. 'Tis for one whom I love better than self, that I fear."
The old man regarded the youth a few moments in silence, then turning to where he could command a view of the cliff which overhung the temple, he said:
"The sun already gilds the temple peak, and for a short time we must leave the girls in charge of Molech and his companions, for I have business, of which you must be a witness, in another place."
"Where would you lead me?"
"To the dwelling of Ali Kinah."
"My father! Ah, then let us go—but Selina to be left alone—to leave her ere she wakes?"
"She will be safe here. We shall return ere long."
Noureddin went to the pavilion and anxiously listened to see if he might not catch a sound that would indicate Selina awake, but the deep, regular breathing dispelled his hope, and turning to Molech, he informed him that for a short time he must take charge of the pavilion and its inmates.
"Tell Selina, when she wakes, that the most urgent occasion called me away," he added. "I shall not be gone long."
Molech's face lengthened as the young man spoke, but he promised to do his bidding, and with one more look at the pavilion, Noureddin followed his tutor. Back of the altar was a moveable slab, and having put this on one side, they descended a few steps into a narrow passage which led directly through the rock to a natural excavation, where the way was only guarded by the abrupt turning of the outlet, which gave the appearance of utter inaccessibility. From here the way was short to the street, and when they had once gained it they walked quickly but boldly on.
No words were spoken on the way, but ever and anon, as Noureddin would raise his eyes to the old man's face, he would almost start at the strange expression which rested there. There was a firmness—a sort of iron-willed determination, and yet a sea of anxious, nervous thought seemed sweeping over it. His lips moved, but they were noiseless; his hands were in meaning
 ing motion, but they pointed to no definite object, and until they reached the dwelling of the corn-seller, Abdah Nazor remained in the same state of excited reverie. Ali Kinah had not yet opened his stalls, and as the old man and the youth entered the house he rushed forward, and caught his son in his arms.
"O, my son, my son," he uttered, as he pressed the youth to his bosom, "thanks be to God that I am once more permitted to look upon thy manly form."
"I told thee thou shouldst see him again," said the dervise.
"So thou didst, good Abdah Nazor, and all blessings be upon thy head for the peace which thine assurance has given me."
For some time the corn-seller and the youth exchanged those mutual congratulations which might be expected between the father and child, but at length, Abdah Nazor stepped forward and laying his hand upon Ali Kinah's arm, he said:
"Now we must despatch a business which I would see the end of. Set aside your congratulations, Ali Kinah, and lend an ear to something of more import. I have come to take back a treasure which years ago, I entrusted to thy keeping.
"A treasure! Entrusted to 
me! You
 entrusted me!" exclaimed the corn-seller, gazing into the old man's face to see if he spoke in earnest.
"Yes, Ali—your were entrusted with it. To-day, I must demand it back."
"Do not trifle with me," Ali uttered. "Surely you never would wish to make me appear dishonest by demanding of me that which I never received?"
"God forbid that I should trifle thus." Abdah Nazor returned. "No I speak in good faith, my friend."
Noureddin gazed in astonishment, first upon one, and then upon the other, of the speakers, and at length he said to his old tutor:
"Perhaps my father has forgotten."
"No, no, my son, he could not have forgotten that."
"Then I pray you tell me what you mean?" cried Ali Kinah, in an agony of suspense.
"Dost not remember a woman who, years ago, left with thee a certain treasure which thou promised to keep in safety?"
"A woman!—Years ago! Surely I—"
Suddenly Ali Kinah stopped and turned pale. He trembled at every joint, and looked imploringly into the dervise's face.
"You remember it now," Abdah Nazor said.
"I know what I think; but that cannot be the truth. No, no, I do not yet comprehend you."
"Yes, you do, Ali. I know by your manner you have guessed the truth."
"But that woman is 
dead
, and surely no power can claim the treasure now."
"Father," uttered Noureddin, in a trembling tone, as he placed his hand upon Ali Kinah's arm, "you have not 
used
 that which was deposited with you in trust."
"No, my boy—that which was placed in my hands I have multiplied by twice ten thousand; but she who gave it me has gone from earth."
"She 
lives
, Ali," the dervise said. "The old woman of the cave—Ossifrage—is she who gave you the trust, and she acted for me. That treasure was 
mine
—MINE, Ali, and now I must have it back again."
Then Abdah Nazor turned to Noureddin, who stood utterly astounded at what he had heard, and said:
"Wait you here a few moments, my son, while I speak with your father apart."
Ali Kinah followed the old man from the room with a trembling step, and Noureddin was left in a state of suspense not easily to be described. At first he feared for his father's honesty, but Ali Kinah's manner dispelled that doubt, and of nothing else could he conceive.
"I'll think no more," murmured Noureddin to himself, as he found that he was completely wound up in the intricacies of his own surmises, and thus murmuring, he sank back upon a stool and awaited their return.
CHAPTER XVIII.
An astounding development. The treasure is given up. A circumstance has occurred which startles the youth with a fearful apprehension. The king's soldiers versus the citizens.
NOUREDDIN at length heard the footsteps of the returning men, and anxiously he watched for the first expression he might catch upon the countenance of his father. That expression, when he saw it, was strange and curious. All shades of surprise had gone—there was no more of nervous anxiety, no more of uncomprehending wonder; but Ali Kinah's features were calm and tranquil, and a soft glow of pleasing melancholy waved in gentle shadows over his face. A moment after he re-entered the apartment the corn-seller looked in a sort of abstracted silence upon the youth—then stepping forward, he took his hand within his own, and imprinting a kiss upon the head of his child, he said:
"My child, I have now a duty to perform which I had humbly hoped might never have come to pass, but in the providence of God are all things, and in gratitude I bow to his will."
"You speak rightly, father," returned Noureddin, looking with wonder up into the face of Ali Kinah. "Let us ever so live that we can cherish naught but gratitude in our souls."
"So I have ever endeavored, Noureddin, and so have I ever endeavored to teach thee. But listen, my child, while I explain to thee what must have already caused thee much anxiety."
The youth bent a listening ear, and Ali Kinah continued:
"Many years ago, ere my wife was taken from me, as I sat in my doorway one evening, after the business of the day had been closed, I was accosted by an elderly woman who bore in her arms an infant. She begged shelter for the night, and, what I never yet refused to a human being, I readily granted. She spent the night beneath my roof, and in the morning she brake bread with me. After the morning's meal was concluded she remained some time in earnest conversation with myself and wife upon religious and moral subjects, her chief aim seeming to be to ascertain if we joined with her in accepting the child of Bethlehem as the Messiah. She seemed to have studied deeply into the matters of which she spoke, and at length, apparently satisfied with the result of her investigations,
 she asked us if we would, for a certain sum, take charge of the infant which she carried, at the same time explaining that she was alone in the world, and utterly unable to give the child such education as was meet. She told me that the child was of honest birth, and urged upon me the charge. I looked upon the face of the infant, and as it stretched forth its little hands towards me and smiled, my heart was warmed with a father's love, and having long desired a child to relieve the monotony of my home, I joyfully promised to take upon myself the charge, but I refused the money. The woman, however, would listen to no refusal of that kind, and when she rose to depart, she prayed of me to be an honest, upright, loving father to her child—then she imprinted a kiss upon its fair brow, and uttering a short prayer to God, she laid a well-filled purse into my lap, and hastily left my dwelling. She came afterwards, but only at distant periods, until at length she ceased her visits altogether. The purse contained three hundred pieces of gold, but nearly four years I touched not a mite of it; then, finding that it was not called for, I began to use it for the child's education. At length, Abdah Nazor presented himself one day at my house, after the child had begun to gather strength, and offered to take charge of its education, and knowing the old man's wisdom, I readily consented; but until the present time, I never knew that the old dervise was aware of the child's true origin, and now, that I have learned that he is, I have also learned that the charge, which for eighteen long years has been to me a source of the most exquisite pleasure, must be resigned to one who holds a prior claim."
As Ali Kinah spoke, he took the hand of the wonder-stricken youth, and while a tear trembled upon his lids, he continued:
"Noureddin, you are the child of whom I have spoken. God knows that I have endeavored to do my duty truly and faithfully, and in after years, whether your life shall be cast in fortune or misfortune, I shall feel that from me you have received naught but an honest and upright example."
"My father—for you are still a father unto me—" cried Noureddin, as he clasped the old man in his arms, "you 
have
 been all that a parent could be, and from my heart, God shall ever receive prayers in your behalf."
"I thank you, Noureddin, and, hoping that you will never forget him whose fortune it was to guide thine infant steps, I now resign you to him who has a right to claim you. He has already proved himself the donor of more than I could ever have bestowed."
As the poor corn-seller closed, he placed the hand of the youth into that of Abdah Nazor, and then turned away and wept. There was no sorrow in those tears, nor yet was there aught of disappointment, but they rather seemed the outpouring of a generous heart which was willingly and almost joyfully offering up the soul's holiest sacrifice.
Noureddin gazed first upon Abdah Nazor, and then upon the man whom, until the present moment, he had believed to be his natural father.
"Then 
you
," he said, turning his gaze upon the dervise, "are my father?"
"Thou art indeed my child, Noureddin, though Ali has proved himself as much a father as I, and to him let your heart ever go forth in filial love."
Ali Kinah cast a grateful look upon the speaker, and pressing the youth once more to his bosom, he dried away his tears, and then bade his visitors godspeed on their mission. Abdah Nazor took the young man by the hand, and promising that their host should see them again ere long, they turned from the humble dwelling, and were soon retracing their steps back from whence they came.
"Why," asked Noureddin, as they walked along, "have I been kept so long in ignorance of this matter?"
"Would its knowledge have made thee happier or better?" the old man returned, gazing with unwonted interest upon his companion.
"No, for all has been done that was possible for both, but yet the knowledge of my own birth should surely belong to me."
"Ay, Noureddin, perhaps it should; but I had a great reason for retaining it a secret, which, when you know it, you will not blame me for so keeping."
The young man was upon the point of a reply when an exclamation of startled anguish broke from his lips, and an ashy paleness overspread his features. He was outside of his companion, and his eye had been the first to catch the glimpse of a dense crowd which was collected around the doors of the heathen temple.
"Great God!" he cried, seizing the old man by the arm, "they have broken open the temple! See—see how they sway to and fro. O, if the coward king has seized again upon his innocent helpless victim, this arm shall not rest till he pay the forfeit, and as there is a God in heaven, his life shall be the penalty if mine angel be harmed!"
"Easy, my son. It cannot be that they have found out the maiden."
"Then why that crowd? I tell thee, Abdah Nazor, they 
have
 found her! O, God! and I was not there to protect her."
The old man's brow darkened, and in a tone of strange calmness, he said:
"My son, 'tis even as you say. They have most surely found the party we left within the temple, but how, I am unable to conceive."
As they drew nearer to the scene they found the crowd dense and excited. A thousand rumors were afloat with regard to the events that had happened, but one thing seemed to be generally understood: A force of soldiers had entered by the king's orders, and taken therefrom several black men, besides two ladies, and a number of horses and camels.
"Abdah Nazor," said some one from the crowd, stepping quickly forward and laying his hand upon the old man's arm, "you are not safe here, and your young companion, if he be Noureddin had better seek immediate safety. The king has ordered your arrest."
"But the temple," quickly exclaimed the youth, heeding not the admonition thus given; "what know you of that?"
"Not half an hour since, Nabal, the centurion, brought his men hither and broke open the doors in the king's name, and took therefrom twelve Egyptian eunuchs, two girls, and a number of horses and laden camels."
"Then Nabal has been the traitor," said Abdah Nazor, in a tone of bitter disappointment.
"No—he could not help what he did," replied he who came from the crowd. "A woman from yonder house-top saw them when they entered, and 
she
 spread the intelligence."
"Then let us at once to the royal palace!" cried Noureddin, in an excited, frenzied manner, as he half drew his sword from its sheath.
"Not yet, not yet, my son," Abdah Nazor returned. "There is yet time for that."
Hardly had the old man spoken, when there was a quick movement in the crowd near him, and a loud voice exclaimed:
"Seize him! Seize him! In the king's name be it done!" and in a moment more a stout soldier sprang forward and caught the dervise by the wrist.
Abdah Nazor shook off the hand that was laid upon him with a strength that few would have thought him possessed of, and raising his voice he cried, while a dozen more soldiers pressed hard upon him:
"Citizens of Petra, will you stand by and see my gray hairs brought down in disgrace? Will you bow your necks willingly to a yoke which the coward tyrant would fasten upon you?—Back, soldier—back, I say, or it may be the worse for thee."
The officers and soldiers of the king had surrounded the old man, and some half-dozen had set upon Noureddin, whom they had thought to make an easy capture, but in this they were mistaken, for the youth's sword flew from its scabbard, and with a look of defiance and determination that made his assailants start back, he raised his weapon, and stood his ground.
"Touch me not," he cried, bending his flashing eyes sternly upon those before him. "I myself will see the king in a moment when he desires it not. I am a citizen, and I will maintain a citizen's right."
The manner of the two men had by this time drawn the eager crowd more closely about them, and the soldiers had begun to tremble for their own safety, but still they kept their positions around the proscribed men, and watched their opportunity for seizing them and making their way through the crowd.
"Citizens of Petra," again exclaimed Abdah Nazor, in a voice that stilled all other sounds, save the swaying to and fro of the multitude, "listen to me. The Petran censors, Moran and Velorus, have been this very morning seized by order of your king, and even now they lay chained in the dungeons of the royal palace. The good old counsellor, Al-Bassa, has hid himself away from Modad's tyranny, and she whom you saw but now taken from yonder temple was that old man's only child. She had taken refuge there from a shame, worse than death, to which your monarch had consigned her; and this youth, whom you see by my side, is doomed because he would have rescued her—and I—
I
, am doomed because I dare to be a friend of the people. Now who shall triumph—the people in their might, or the king in his tyranny?"
A moment after the old man ceased, all was as silent as the wind-swept grave, but on the next a gentle murmur, like the whisperings of the coming tempest, trembled upon the air, and anon it burst into one loud, prolonged shout of—
"To the rescue! To the rescue!"
The names of Moran and Velorus were sounded from an hundred lips, while a thousand hearts beat with the sentiments they dared not utter. The soldiers knew the meaning of that sound, and they knew the stout hearts that had now been raised to rebellion against the execution of the order that was entrusted to them. They felt the pressure of the sea of humanity that rolled in at their backs, and they heard the heavy, eager breathing of those who were coming on to the rescue. They were but men, and they turned trembling away from the work which they dared not do.
The crowd still pressed on towards the spot where stood the old man and his youthful companion, and one, an old man who had in years gone by fought for his country, raised his cap, and was upon the point of addressing Abdah Nazor, when his eye fell upon the youth. The moment he saw that noble form, and those varying, speaking features, he stopped suddenly as though he had seen a spectre. Noureddin still held his unsheathed sword in his hand, but noticing the stranger's perturbation, he replaced it in its scabbard, saying, as he did so:
"Start not, good sire, I only meant my trusty steel for protection."
"That voice, too!" murmured the aged soldier, still gazing, almost entranced, upon the youth.
"Baal Hernon," spoke the dervise, "let us disperse the crowd, for I would be on my way elsewhere."
"But that youth," uttered the old soldier, hardly comprehending what Abdah Nazor had said, "who is he?"
"Mine, Baal Hernon—mine. Heaven gave him to me in trust. Be you satisfied with that for the present." Then turning to the people, he cried:
"Now, good citizens, let us to our homes. You have done me a service for which I will ere long repay you ten-fold. Go peaceably away, and let your business demand your attention, for remember, you are yet citizens."
"The censors! The censors!" came from an hundred voices. "We want them for the city!"
"And you shall have them," exclaimed the venerable dervise. "They shall again move among you unharmed, and you shall fear no more. I promise it by my hopes of immortality."
A hundred different shouts mingled confusedly together in the air. "The king," "Al-Bassa," "Abdah Nazor," and "the censors," were upon the lips of the people, while a cloud of caps and crimson scarfs waved above their heads. Gradually the crowd began to break—the sea of human beings swept off into waves, and each rolled away into the city; but yet a considerable number remained fixed upon the
 spot, nor would they move till they had seen Abdah Nazor and his companion safely off.
"Come, Noureddin," the old man said, as he took the youth by the arm, "let us on our way?"
"But where?" Noureddin asked, as he instinctively cast his eyes back upon the temple where, but a short time before, he had left his heart with her to whom he had given it.
"Where?" iterated the dervise. "First we must seek our mountain home, for there begins the work we have to do."
"And leave Selina to the will of the tyrant?"
"Leave that with me for the present. I would rather she were in the cave with Ossifrage, but yet you have naught to fear. Her father is safe with the woman, nor can the king rout him. But come, my son, moments are hours with us."
"But where will you seek egress? The ways are all guarded."
"Not 
all
, Noureddin. From the very walls of the royal palace there opens a way to the mountain which none now living, save myself, ever threaded. Ere another moon shall show its round face to the earth, you shall know of things that shall open the fountain of astonishment wide in your bosom. Come, our way lies through the dungeons of the palace."
Noureddin looked upon the man who had been his preceptor from childhood, with a degree of amazement that had never before possessed him. He had heard the old man read from tomes of knowledge which were hidden to the great mass of humanity, and he had seen him compute the mysterious evolutions of the heavenly hosts, but now he was diving deep into mysteries of a more startling character—mysteries which lay upon the verge of immediate affairs, and which comprehended the weal and woe of thousands. With such thoughts busy in his brain, he silently followed the way of him who had a right to guide him.
CHAPTER XIX.
Selina's interview with the king. A plan is on foot that might make a savage start with horror. The mute's strange occupation, and his visitor. The mysterious casket.
WITHIN an apartment of the royal palace sat Selina and her faithful attendant. The former had been weeping most bitterly, but upon the calm features of the latter there were no traces of tears. Miriam was calm and composed, and in the honest simplicity of her heart she vainly endeavored to impart to her mistress a spark of the flame that burned within herself; but the heart she sought to mould in resignation was too fearfully crushed—too bruised and lacerated, to rise from its utter darkness, and she only answered her companion's importunities by deeper and more hysterical sobs.
Miriam had ceased her efforts at consolation, and sat with her kindly beaming eyes turned mournfully upon her mistress, while the latter gazed vacantly upon the curiously wrought figures that seemed almost starting to life from the surface of the carpet. The heavy hangings of crimson and gold that guarded the private entrance to the room were thrust aside, and the king stepped into the girls' presence. His face was pale and haggard, his lips were livid in their fierce compressure, his heavy chest was heaving like the swelling sea, and from his eyes flashed a maniac fire of mad delirium. A moment he gazed upon the two girls, and while they shrank cowering from his forbidding look, be said:
"Daughter of Al-Bassa, dost comprehend that a king hath revenge within his power?"
Selina did not start at the words she heard, but she turned her gaze upon the speaker as does the dying stag upon its destroyer. That look asked not sympathy—it asked not kindness—it only begged for pity.
"Lady," continued the king, "thy father dies! 
Thou
 hast consigned him to his death. As soon as your eyes have beheld his cold corse, you shall go to Khaibar. Didst think you could come back to my very sight and not bring down the doom I had threatened?"
"But my father is not to blame," cried Selina, more startled by the fear of her parent's safety than of her own. "Surely you will not seek revenge upon a poor old man because his child has dared to preserve her innocence?"
"A poor old man, did you say! Better have said a gray-headed traitor! Lady, Petra swarms with traitors. To-day—not an hour since, when I did send a force to bring me Abdah Nazor and Noureddin, the people—ay, the 
people!
 rebelled against my power, and rescued the miscreants from my officers!"
"Thank God!" broke instinctively from Selina's lips; "Noureddin is safe from the tyrant's power."
"Aha," muttered the monarch, as a demoniac smile curled like an adder around his lips; "so 
there
 lies the treason. Your pretty face has captivated the youth from his loyalty. Then there is a sweet revenge in store. 
His
 head, too, thou shalt see in a charger—it shall be brought thee for thy parting gift!"
The maiden shrank away from the monster before her with a fearful loathing, and laid her head upon her attendant's shoulder. Until the present moment, Miriam had regarded the monarch as she would have looked upon a poisonous, creeping reptile; but when she saw her lady's grief—when she heard the inhuman threats of the mad king, her eyes flashed, and turning her gaze upon the fair brow that had pillowed itself upon her, she exclaimed:
"Let not your heart so grieve, dear lady, for you have often told me that the God in whom you trust was a just God, and if he be, then you have nothing to fear from such threats as these, for he will not surely let yonder tyrant Eblis triumph. He threatens where he has not power. Look up, Selina, and trust to the future. Noureddin is still at liberty, and the base monarch knows that your father is beyond his reach. The poor black slaves and two defenceless girls are all upon whom he can wreak his mean revenge. Come, Selina, take heart, and trust to a power mightier than the king's."
Selina raised her head, and slowly opened her eyes upon the girl who thus strangely taught her how to act the woman's part.
"My father," she uttered. "Did you say 
he
 was beyond the tyrant's power?"
"Yes, yes, my lady—for I heard it as we were brought hither. He is bidden in the same place to which we were destined last night, and no mortal power can drag him unwillingly forth."
"Miriam," murmured the fair maiden, as she threw her arms around her attendant's neck, "I thank thee for thy lesson, and God will bless thee for having turned a wandering heart back to its trust in him. Go, sire," she continued, turning her gaze upon the half petrified monarch, "and do thine unholy will. Let thine anger seek its own revenge, but curse me not longer with thy presence."
Modad knew not how to meet this new power that had started up in his path. He knew that Miriam spoke the truth when she said that his most dreaded enemies were beyond his reach, and in his soul he felt that her words bore a fearful prophecy, and with dread imprecations upon his lips, he turned away from those whom he knew not how to face, but ere he went he swore that no power on earth or in heaven could check his dire revenge!
"Trust him not, trust him not," Miriam urged, as she noticed her mistress pale beneath the king's threat. "Do you forget the strange suspicion we conceived upon the desert?"
Selina's face glowed again as her companion spoke, and she hushed the quicker pulsations that her fears had started forth.
The king moved on from the apartment where he had left his female prisoners, and with a hurried step he sought his place of private audience. Ahab and Mizar were both there for they dared not be out of their monarch's hearing now, and the trembling that seized upon them as Modad entered, showed how much they
 feared. A dozen turns had the king taken between the two marble columns that supported the ceiling, when he stopped and smiled a Tartarean look as some new idea of wickedness seemed to cross his mind.
"Ahab," said he, while his eyes sparkled with a fierce delight, "the day after to-morrow, is the season for the entertainments at the theatre."
"Yes, sire."
"The Syrian lion is in readiness?"
"He is, sire,"
"And the Bengal tiger?"
"Is also in readiness, your majesty."
"Go you, Mizar, and tell the superintendent that the hired swordsmen will not be wanted for that day, and tell him, too, that from this moment I would not have the animals fed. I will find men for the occasion."
Mizar turned amazed away, and as soon as he was gone, the king exclaimed:
"Ah, Ahab, I have sport in store. The wild beasts shall have food in plenty to make up for their fasting!"
"How means your majesty?"
"The Egyptian eunuchs, Ahab! 
They
 shall give us sport in the amphitheatre. Thus begins my revenge, and woe be to the enemy who next falls into my hands!"
"But you will let the poor fellows be armed against the beasts," ventured Ahab, who could not repress a shudder at the thought of the cold-blooded purpose of his monarch.
"Each shall have a club, but no swords or knives—they shall not have a vantage. And even then, Ahab, there will be twelve against two, ha, ha!"
The last clause of the king's sentence was accompanied by a low chuckle of savage delight, and he actually seemed to forget his troubles in view of the demoniac recreation he had planned out for himself.
"How think you the people will take it?" he continued, losing nothing of his strange satisfaction.
"If they know it to be the king's order, they will take it quietly, and no doubt 'twill prove acceptable to them."
Ahab knew that he spoke falsely, and he turned his gaze upon the knotting of his sword belt to hide his guilty face. Had he dared he would have advised the king to forego his unnatural pastime, for well he knew that the people were already much incensed by the summary seizure of the censors, and he knew, too, that they liked not such inhuman scenes as were thus proposed. But he dared not tell the king of this, and though he himself looked with loathing upon the spirit which could prompt such cruel measures, yet he strove hard to make it appear that he participated somewhat in the monarch's revengeful feelings.
"It 
must
 prove so, Ahab," the king returned; "for it hath been a long time since they have been treated to such sport. Go, now, and set the officers on the watch at the pass, and see, too, that the haunt of that old hag, Ossifrage, is well looked to, for that contains a traitor whom I must hold within my power. Abdah Nazor and this bold youth must be in the city somewhere, and as there is life in my heart they shall not escape me."
Ahab turned quickly away from his monarch's presence, and Modad thought his servant made haste to serve him. He little thought that Ahab had hastened to hide emotions which, had they been seen, might have looked like budding treason!
The day crept slowly on to its night, and as the royal palace was shut in by the gloom of approaching midnight, the king sought the rest of his couch, and soon lost his senses in an uneasy, dreamy slumber.
In an apartment not far situated from the royal chamber the king's two mutes had sought their quarters for the night, and after a few moments' hurried consultation by signs and nervous gestures, which could be intelligible to none but themselves, one of them threw himself upon the couch, while the other remained motionless in the centre of the room till his companion had ceased his movements, and then gazing about attentively till he seemed assured that no one was stirring, he stooped down and
 unloosed the sandals from his feet. This having been done, he stepped noiselessly to where stood a small ottoman, which he took and placed carefully against the door, in such a manner as to impede its opening, but at the same time not sufficient to give the appearance of an intentional fastening.
The floor of the apartment was a mosaic paving of black and white marble, each separate block being some ten inches square. The mute bent his cheek attentively to the door for several moments after he had placed the obstruction against it, but no breathings of the air betokened any movement without, and dropping upon his hands and knees he crept stealthily to a remote corner of the room. Here, mute as he was, with the avenues of sound forever closed to his brain, he again stopped as though a noise could have warned him—then drawing his yataghan from its sheath, he inserted its point into an almost imperceptible crevice between two of the paving blocks, and one of them was easily lifted from its place. From the small cavity thus revealed, the operator drew forth a piece of vellum, an ink-horn, and a reed, and then laying the stone carefully back into its place, he arose to his feet and sidled along to the niche within which burned the taper. Here he seated himself upon a spare ottoman, spread the vellum upon his knee, took the stopper from the ink-horn, and having examined the point of his reed, the poor mute began rapidly to write!
Ah, Modad, little dreamed thou that thy mute, whose ears your trumpet could not shake, had a power of comprehending half of all you say! Not a name of any of those whom you have once called in your slave's presence can escape thy lips a second time without his knowing it. Those keen, piercing eyes, that once made thee start with such a fearful suspicion, have learned the motion of thy lips with a dread certainty, and he can translate thy look, even, when perhaps thine own heart knew not the thoughts that moved it!
For half an hour the mute wrote uninterrupted, and then leaned back from his work. He replaced his writing materials back from whence he had taken them, and then went to the couch and laid down by the side of his companion. He had not lain long upon his bed ere a slight movement was perceptible in one of the cedar panels on the opposite side from the door, and in a moment more it slid noiselessly from its place, while from the aperture thus made, Abdah Nazor stepped into the room!
The mute made a nod of recognition, and pointed to the niche where stood the taper. The old man moved as one who was well acquainted with the place, as well as used to the business in which he was now engaged, and turning to the spot thus designated, he took the vellum which the slave had written, and then left the room as he had entered, sliding the panel carefully back after him.
In three hours from the time on which Abdah Nazor left the chamber of the mutes, he stood within his own cave upon the side of Mount Hor. At the further end of the outer cave burned a brilliant torch, and drawing a wooden stool near to its blaze, the old man ran over the characters which the king's mute had traced upon the parchment. Various and varying were the emotions which came and went upon the reader's face, and when at length he had finished the scroll, he turned to Noureddin, who had been silently watching his movements, and said:
"The time is nearer at hand than I had expected. Selina is safe within the king's palace, and for the present she is well treated. Al-Bassa has not yet been found, nor will he be until some other than Modad shall bid him come forth. The king is working hard to entrap us, and at the present moment he has guards on the watch to see that we do not leave the city—ha, ha. But for the Egyptians he has planned more surely. 
They
 are to grace the amphitheatre, and be food for hungry beasts!"
"No, no—the king will not do that!" Noureddin cried.
"Modad is capable of doing anything that baseness can suggest," the dervise replied. "But enough of the king for the present. I
 have a more weighty matter on hand. It now devolves upon me to give to thee a treasure which I have for thy use and keeping. It was given to me when you were yet an infant, and with me it was left to award it, or not, as I might judge best."
As the old man spoke he arose from his seat, lighted another torch, and having moved back a huge rock which guarded the narrow passage to a deeper cave beyond, he disappeared within it. Fifteen minutes must have passed ere Abdah Nazor returned, and to Noureddin they seemed almost like so many hours; but at length he came, and in his hands he bore a large casket of sandal wood bound with brazen bands and secured by a strong lock.
"Here, Noureddin," he said, "'tis yours—take it, and make the most of it."
The youth took the heavy casket, placed it upon the rock at his feet—then turned the key in its lock and threw back the lid. A moment he gazed upon the treasure thus revealed, and then placing his hand upon his brow, he murmured:
"Great God in whom I trust, do I see aright, or is it some phantasy that floats before mine eyes!"
CHAPTER XX.
The clouds tremble in their blackness, then break in sunder, and gradually they roll away before the beams of a full-dawned, joyous day.
THE sun rose above the towering, craggy walls of Petra, and as its morning beams went dancing over the city, gilding its domes and marble monuments, its obelisks and mausoleums, they found the people stirring anxiously through the streets, hastening along with impulsive strides, and seeming to take little note of what passed around them. The king was up, and full of preparation. All was bustle about tho royal palace, servants were hastening to and fro with portentous countenances, and couriers came and went with their messages from various parts of the city.
Towards the middle of the valley in which was nestled the city, stood the Petran amphitheatre. There it stood, and there it yet stands, a monument of man's toil and labor—hewn out from the solid rock—its arena, its rising rows of benches, its dens, and its columns, all fashioned by the chisel from out the tenacious granite! Its brazen doors were thrown open, and gradually the citizens began to gather within its walls. Twelve condemned eunuchs were to stand before the royal lion and tiger, and though humanity shrank palsied from the dreadful spectacle, yet curiosity carried the sway, and the people rushed to behold the scene. Dense and more dense grew the gathering crowd, till thousands had gained seats upon the granite benches, and at length a flourish of trumpets announced that the king approached. The people arose to their feet as Modad entered with his train, and a forced, unnatural shout went forth to greet him. It was not such a shout as he had before heard greet the royal presence, but keeping his thoughts within his own bosom, he seated himself within the tapestried enclosure which was set apart for him, and then called the superintendent to him.
"Is all in readiness?" asked the king.
"It is, sire."
"Then proclaim the occasion and its cause."
"Citizens of Petra," cried the superintendent, "his royal majesty has ordered the entertainment to proceed, but ere that be done he would have you know the cause. Twelve of his own Egyptian slaves are condemned to the arena, in punishment for having engaged in a conspiracy against himself and the city."
"They dared to save a poor girl's life!" cried some one in the distant crowd.
Modad sprang to his feet and gazed madly around, and his officers started towards the spot from whence the sound seemed to proceed, but nothing could be found of the daring offender, and they went back to their posts. That simple exclamation, however, found a thousand sympathizing hearts, and ere long the whispering murmurs threatened to break forth into open trouble. Modad saw it, and he knew its import
 port, and quickly springing again to his feet, he cried:
"Let the Egyptians come forth! Hasten with the sport, for already the people are anxious to behold it."
As the king spoke, a nervous excitement prevailed through the dense mass of humanity that crowded the amphitheatre, but when at length the ill-fated Egyptians were led forth, every heart was hushed to a painful suspense. More dead than alive the poor slaves crept into the arena, and with hot, scalding tears rolling down their dark cheeks, they looked imploringly around upon the thousands of fellow-creatures who sat there and gazed upon them. Each carried a short club of wood in his hand, but the paltry, miserable weapons hung listlessly by their sides, nor seemed they to care whether they used them or not, for well they knew that such resistance as they might offer would prolong the tortures their king had marked out for them!
Perhaps a minute had elapsed after the eunuchs entered, when a deep roar, like the hoarse rumbling of distant thunder, shook the solid rock. A shudder ran through the crowd, and instinctively the more tender-hearted turned their eyes away from the scene. Another roar, more fierce than the first, came belching forth, and as its reverberations rumbled among the distant mountain cliffs, the low, thrilling growl of the royal tiger cut the air! Molech turned, as he heard the sound, and gazed a moment upon his companions in misery. Then he dashed the tears from his eyes, and hurling the insignificant club from him, he folded his arms across his heaving breast, and calmly awaited his fate! The remaining Egyptians caught the noble impulse of their leader's example, and they, too, threw down their miserable weapons and banished from them all traces of the deep anguish that had but just moved them.
"What!" cried the king, in a rage, as he saw the unexpected movement of his victims, "will the dogs not fight! Let the beasts come forth! Let them come, I say. What, ho, there! Unloose the barrier that shuts back the tiger, and throw open the lion's den!"
The slaves stood unmoved, but no beasts came forth. The superintendent came into the arena in a state of intense agitation, and the astounded monarch was just upon the point of springing down to meet him, when he was startled by the appearance upon the stage of one whom he had little expected to see there, and whom he had occasion to dread. It was none other, than Abdah Nazor!
But at the next moment the eyes of the guilty monarch rested upon a sight that struck him powerless, and murmuring, in a half-crazed and half-abstracted manner, "
My brother!
" he fell back upon his seat.
Back from the arena came forth a man clad from head to heel in a glittering armor of polished steel wrought with gold and precious stones, and upon his brow he bore a golden helmet, above the vizor of which, like the blinding sun at noonday, flashed and gleamed the KING'S TALISMAN! Every eye caught the transcendent sparkling of that massive, matchless gem—they saw that well-known armor, which for long years had been hidden from the city, and they saw the noble form of him who bore these kingly arms, and in a moment more those who sat in front sent forth the shout:
"'Tis Merolboth, our good king! Merolboth! Merolboth!"
"No, no, citizens of Petra," cried Abdah Nazor, ere the shout had been taken up by those in the rear—"you mistake. He who wears the 
King's Talisman
, and who bears upon his loins the king's armor, has alone the right to wear them; but he is not Merolboth. Lend me your ears for a few moments, and you shall know all that for many long years has been locked up in the breasts of only two human beings."
"Down with the traitor!" cried Modad, as he recovered from the first shock of his terror. "Nabal, Ahab, Mizar, seize yonder miscreant, and carry him hence!"
Hardly had the madman spoken, when he who bore the sacred Talisman upon his brow, stepped forward and addressed the centurion:
"Nabal, take your men and guard yonder
 frenzied man who holds the place of the king, and if he move again, carry him away."
"
'Tis
 Merolboth!" uttered a dozen voices. "His every tone and act of noble command."
The centurion hesitated not an instant in performing the orders he had received from the last authority, and Modad soon found himself in the power of those he had been wont to command.
"Now," cried the old dervise in a loud tone, and before the people could catch up the last clue that had been given them by those who recognized the stranger's voice and manner, "you shall know all that I have to communicate, and I would have you silent and attentive, that you may understand me."
Every ear was bent attentively upon the old man, and every look that met his searching gaze assured him that the people hung anxiously upon his words, and without further hesitation, he continued:
"It is now somewhat over eighteen years since the queen of the departed Merolboth gave birth to a son. Many of you remember the event, for it cost the beloved queen her life. The king saw his lovely consort die, and when he found himself alone with his helpless infant, a strange fear took possession of his mind, nor had he the power to shake it off. At the hard-fought battle of Hedjer, he had received a dangerous wound, and he knew that it was slowly, but surely, eating away his life, and that a few years, at least, and perhaps a few months, might terminate his existence. He feared for the fate of his infant boy should it be left a helpless orphan in the hands of one whom he knew to be aspiring to a throne, and he began to study a plan for its safety. Merolboth knew that his brother Modad was looking anxiously upon the Petran throne—he knew that his aspiring brother aimed to be king of Idumea, and from his knowledge of that brother's character, he feared that the infant heir to the crown would be but a slight obstacle in his way—he felt confident that Modad's poison would find the life of his boy when he should become its guardian, and in his heart the good king resolved that his boy should be protected."
The people had now bent forward in a breathless interest, and Modad writhed in his agony like an expiring monster. The old man wiped the perspiration from his brow, and continued:
"I had been Merolboth's tutor, and to me he explained his fears and made known his determination. I remember his words as though he had spoken them but now. 'Abdah Nazor,' said he to me, and the tears ran down the good king's eyes as he spoke, 'I cannot live long, as you yourself know, and before I die I would provide for the safety of my infant boy. In the hands of my brother I dare not leave it, for it would stand between him and a throne. Therefore, Abdah Nazor, I give it henceforth to you, and to the world I will proclaim its death. Seek you out some one—some poor and honest man—who will adopt it as his own, and be you its counsellor, its tutor, and its guide. If the boy lives and grows, make him fit to be a king, and when he has reached the age of eighteen years, if he be fit for a king, then you shall proclaim his true birth—but if he prove unworthy of a crown, then let him die in his obscurity. I sincerely believe that the people will receive in kindness and in love the only child of their faithful Merolboth."
"Yes! yes!" burst spontaneously from a thousand hearts. "Give us our good king's son, and if necessary, our hearts' blood shall cement his throne!"
The old man raised his eyes to heaven, and then waving his hand for silence, he continued:
"I took the child, and with it I received a casket containing the King's Talisman, together with all the necessary documents for substantiating the boy's birth. The king also gave to me his royal armor, and bade me preserve the treasures with a jealous care for his son. To a woman called Ossifrage, one devout and pious, I entrusted the infant, and shortly afterwards it was given in adoption to an honest man, Ali Kinah, the poor corn-seller. The good king lived nearly five years after this event, but as he grew weaker and weaker every day, he thought it not safe to recall what he had done. He often saw his little son, and his heart was
 made light and joyous in death, by a knowledge of the noble disposition which even the prattling child had begun to exhibit. Time has been slowly creeping on, and the night of Idumea's state is passed. I have done my duty, and God knows that Merolboth's prince is all that a brave, intelligent, generous, and noble man can be. I have tried him, and I have found him worthy, and in God's name I have given to him what for eighteen long years was mine in trust—THE KING'S TALISMAN!"
As Abdah Nazor spoke, he turned and led forward the man who bore the royal insignia upon his brow.
"Here, citizens of Petra, and subjects of Idumea," he said, "is your king. The censors shall examine the documents of Merolboth, but to those noble features alone will I trust for his passport to your love."
As the old man spoke, the new king took the helmet from his head, and turned his handsome face, all glowing with love and gratitude, around upon the people. Within the lustrous depths of those darkly flashing eyes, and from every turning of those noble features, beamed the exact counterpart of the sainted Merolboth. All knew that their eyes rested upon the true son of a kingly sire, and in a moment more, while yet the gazing thousands were almost spellbound, the two censors entered the arena from without, and ere the people could remember that they had been imprisoned, Moran cried out:
"The first act of the new king has been to release your aged censors from Modad's dungeon. NOUREDDIN is our king, and long may he live and reign!"
The torch had been lighted—the spark had gone forth, and as bursts the roaring bolt of heaven's thunder over the trembling earth, so burst forth the prolonged shout of Idumea's enraptured throng:
"NOUREDDIN! NOUREDDIN! 
Long may he live and reign!
"
Like the descending avalanche, the people poured over the spacious arena and knelt at the feet of their monarch; but among them all there were none more bowed down with the heart's full weight of gratitude than were those twelve Egyptians, who saw in their new king, the blessed saviour of their lives.
"Come, Modad," said Nabal, as the people began to follow the youthful monarch from the amphitheatre, "the people are going, and we must follow. 'Tis an unpleasant duty, but it must be done."
As the centurion spoke, he placed his hand upon the arm of the fallen man, but Modad moved not at the summons. His eyes were fixed with a vacant, glassy stare upon the spot where had stood Noureddin, and where had flashed the King's Talisman. Nabal bent forward and gazed into the ex-monarch's face—he laid his hand upon the uncrowned brow, and 'twas cold and clammy! The centurion felt a cold shudder creeping through his frame—the people had all gone, and he and his soldiers were left alone with the dead! The tyrant had come to see men die, but he alone had been the victim, though God only knew the moment on which he had paid the penalty!
"Come, lady," said Ahab, as he entered the room where sat Selina and her attendant, "the king desires your presence."
"What is the monarch's will?" asked the poor girl, trembling with alarm.
"I know not—but come."
As Ahab spoke, he took the fair maiden's hand and led her away, while Miriam instinctively followed. Slowly and fearfully Selina approached the vast hall of audience, and as the purple curtains were drawn aside, she started at the glittering throng of armed knights and noble gentlemen. With a cold shudder her eyes sought the royal throne, but as her gaze rested for an instant there the ice-bolt was gone, and a wild, burning thrill sent the warm blood up from her bounding heart. He whom she loved sat upon the throne, and beside him stood her father and Ali Kinah, the corn-seller.
"Courage, courage," whispered the gentle Miriam. "Be not surprised at what you see.
 Remember what I told you, when you asked me upon the desert concerning our preserver—I knew then that none save the son could so resemble the king's portrait which hangs in your father's hall. Courage, courage, Selina."
Let the curtain drop, and rise again!
Al-Bassa had embraced his daughter, the youthful monarch had pressed her to his bosom, and then seated her upon his royal throne.
"Friends," said he, as he turned his happy gaze from his betrothed to his joyous subjects, "behold your queen—the daughter of Al-Bassa—the beautiful, the good, and the virtuous Selina!"
"The KING and his QUEEN! God bless them both!" swelled in the air from a host of thankful hearts. But the end was not yet, for ere the sound died away, a messenger entered from without, and informed the king that a stranger demanded admittance.
"Then let him come," Noureddin said.
In a moment more, the towering form of Marmiel, the Arab chief, stalked proudly into the hall, and at his back came an hundred stalwart followers.
"Noureddin," pronounced Marmiel, in a clear, strong voice, "I told thee if you ever had need of my arm it should be yours, and who more needs the strong arm of his people than their king. To a tyrant I will never bow, but to thee, just and good Noureddin and his fair consort, I offer my humble sword. Down, my followers, and salute your king!"
As the Arab chieftain spoke, he fell upon his knees, and his voice went forth in a heartfelt shout of loyal joy. The shout was caught up by the multitude who thronged the hall, and the marble walls of the vast palace trembled as they echoed back the joyous cry of a happy, happy people.
"Now, my son," said the good old dervise, as the hall was once more still, at the same time taking the young monarch by the hand, "my duty is done. I have obeyed the instructions of thy father. I have given to thee a crown, and to the people a king; but remember, Noureddin—and let the thought be ever your guiding star: that the true throne of the ruler is in the hearts of his subjects. As the monarch loves and honors his people, so shall he be loved and honored in return. Life is before you, and may you so live that, when you have passed away from earth, good and true men shall mourn for your loss, and bless your memory for the bright and pure examples you leave behind!"
THE END.
[FROM THE FLAG OF OUR UNION.]
THE CAPTAIN AND HIS MATE: OR, THE SOLITARY FRIEND.
BY SYLVANUS COBB, JR.
I THINK it is now about twelve years—it may be thirteen—since the Jacob Morgan, a ship of seven hundred tons burden, sailed from Brunswick, Geo., bound for the East Indies. She was a noble ship, but, if we may believe the assertion of one who sailed in her, she was built for misfortune. She was launched from her stocks at mid day, but yet the moon was seen in the heavens when she first gave her impress to the salt water. Seven years subsequent to the period at which our sketch opens she was driven upon one of the Martyr's Reefs, and her ill-fated timbers were strewn upon the sands of Florida.
At the time of which we write, the Jacob Morgan was commanded by Capt. Ben. Wallack, a powerful, broad-chested man, but as kind and considerate as he was fearless and strong. Seamen were scarce, and the ship's crew had been obtained with great difficulty, and under the circumstances men had been hired who would otherwise have been most peremptorily rejected. The ship had been six days out when the first mate, a Mr. Gwynn, from Providence, R. I., was suddenly taken sick, and on the next morning, his lifeless clay was consigned to the deep grave of the blue Atlantic.
This untimely event left Capt. Wallack in a critical situation. Nat. Faulkner, his second mate, was by no means qualified for the vacant office, nor would he have taken the responsibility had the captain desired it. There was but one man in the ship who possessed sufficient knowledge of seamanship for the mate's berth, and though Wallack found that to him he must give the office, yet he did it with many misgivings. This man's name was Tom Roland, haughty and overbearing in his disposition, seeming, by his general comport, to have been in the habit of commanding, rather than obeying, on ship-board, and who had already begun to exercise a sort of control over the crew. But the case was one of necessity, and Tom Roland was installed into the office of first mate, and quartered in the cabin.
For several weeks, things passed on extremely well. Roland proved to be a thorough navigator, a finished seaman, and a ready and efficient
 cient officer, and Capt. Wallack began to think that his misgivings were entirely groundless. Over the crew, Roland had a most thorough control, and even those men who had evinced towards the captain marks of insubordination, moved without a murmur at the slightest beck of the mate.
One morning, when Capt. Wallack and his second mate had had the morning watch, they both kept the deck until Roland had finished his breakfast, and when the latter took his watch, at a few minutes past eight o'clock, they went below. When they reached the cabin, Mr. Russell, the supercargo, was just rising from the table, and taking a book from the head of his berth, he sat down upon a stool at the foot of the ladder, and commenced reading. He passed a few observations upon the weather, as the captain and second mate took their seats at the table, and then went on with his reading. Some five minutes had passed, when Wallack and Faulkner were startled by a sudden exclamation of pain from the supercargo, and on turning, they saw that he had dropped his book, and sat with both hands pressed hard upon his stomach, while his features had assumed a livid hue, indicative of the most acute suffering. The captain sprang quickly from the table, and laying his hand upon the sufferer's shoulder, he exclaimed:
"What's the matter, Mr. Russell?"
"O, God! I don't know. Here it is! here! I burn!" uttered the supercargo, as he pressed his hands harder upon his stomach.
"What have you been eating? What have you drank?" asked Wallack, in a frenzy of anxiety.
"Nothing, nothing. O, O!" groaned the poor fellow.
Wallack cast a trembling glance at his second mate, and for a moment they both remained silent.
"It's strange," at length uttered Faulkner. "Poor Gwynn was taken in exactly the same way."
The captain made no reply, but his countenance wore a strange shade of doubt and suspicion, as he gazed upon the tortured features of the supercargo.
That night, the broad Atlantic rolled its ceaseless waves over another of the ship's company. Mr. Russell had breathed his last! Capt. Wallack and Nat. Faulkner had the last dogwatch. Roland had gone down into the cabin, while the foremast hands, with the exception of the man at the wheel, were all forward. The captain paced the quarter-deck in a troubled, thoughtful mood, ever and anon casting his eyes towards the cabin companion-way, where his first mate had disappeared a short time before, and then turning his gaze towards the forecastle, where the men were congregated. Faulkner was by the wheel, and several times, as the captain approached him in his walk, did he start to join him, but a fearful suspicion kept him back, and until the watch was changed, neither he nor Wallack spoke a word, save such as related to the management of the ship. At eight o'clock, Roland came on deck for the first watch. The ship was upon the starboard tack, close-hauled upon the wind, and just able to stand on her course.
As Captain Wallack gave up the deck, he requested the mate, if the wind should haul round to the eastward any, to call him. Roland replied kindly that he would, but beneath the half-curling smile that rested upon his features, the captain thought he could detect a lurking spirit of evil. He let not a shadow of his doubt manifest itself upon his countenance, but with a bland frankness he wished his mate a pleasant watch, and then went below.
"Faulkner," said the captain, as he turned a furtive glance at the head of the ladder, "let not a word escape you, unless it be of commonplace affairs, until we have turned into our berths; but keep your weather eye open, and follow my movements."
Faulkner did not start at this request, for the same thoughts seemed to have been passing in his own mind.
"Let's see," said the captain, in a tone loud enough to be heard on deck. "I must run over my reckoning before I turn in. Mr.
 Faulkner, just hand me that chart, if you please."
As Wallack spoke, he reached over into his berth and took out his pistols, which he proceeded carefully to load, taking care the while that his back was turned towards the companionway. Faulkner followed his example, and ere long the candles were extinguished, and the two men retired, but not, however, to sleep.
"Faulkner," whispered the captain, "we're in a snug fix, for I have every reason to believe that there is mutiny on board. Gwynn and Russell have both been poisoned!"
"So I believe," returned Faulkner, in the same low tone; "and if I'm not mistaken there 'll be poison in our coffee-cups to-morrow morning."
"Ha! have you seen anything!"
"Yes. I saw Roland give the cook a small paper to-night, and they held quite an earnest conversation about it. I knew from their manner that there was mischief in their minds."
"Then, in God's name, what shall we do?" uttered the captain. "Their plans must be all formed, and I suppose they have made arrangements for the disposition of those in the forecastle who do not join them. Would to Heaven I knew how many of them there are."
"You have a passage between decks to the forecastle bulkhead," suggested Faulkner.
"Yes."
"Perhaps you might gain some information by listening."
"No. If Roland leads the plot—and I know he does—he would not dare to carry on his conversation upon the subject there, for the rest would hear him."
"Hark!" whispered Faulkner, as a suppressed voice at the wheel caught his ear. He bent his head out from his bunk, and caught the following words, which he knew to be from the lips of Roland:
"They're both asleep before this, Hal. You look out for the deck a few minutes while I see the boys in the forecastle."
"He's going to the forecastle," whispered Faulkner. "Now's your chance to follow him."
"No—you had better go, Faulkner, for it may be that some one will come down to see me, and in that case our knowledge would be discovered. There's mutiny, and no mistake. You know where the pa-sage runs between the boxes; just abaft the mainmast it takes a short turn to starboard, and follows along chock down to the tanks. Slip out from your berth, and go over to where the poor supercargo used to bunk, and move that panel. It moves easier than mine does."
Faulkner lost no time in obeying the captain's directions. There were two secret communications to the hold of the ship through the cabin bulkhead, and through one of these the second mate soon made his way. Nearly half an hour elapsed ere he returned, and during that time, the captain's mind was tortured by various fearful emotions. Until the death of Russell, he had not held a suspicion of direct mutiny, and his former fears with regard to Roland had nearly been quieted, but now the suspicion had been sudden, and it was strong, even to the very certainty. A thousand little incidents came back to his mind, which, singly, had appeared as nothing, but which now helped to solve the mystery of Gwynn's death. Wallack had medical knowledge enough to know that his supercargo had been killed with 
white arsenic
, and he now knew that his first mate had come to his end in the same way, though the dose of the latter must have been much smaller than that which sent poor Russell to his untimely end, and its symptoms had not been so palpable.
While the captain lay thus racking his brains, Faulkner returned from his espionage, and as he crept stealthily past the foot of his bunk, Wallack fancied he could hear his heart as it beat in his bosom.
"What news?" asked the captain, almost fearing to put the question.
"We are lost—lost!" uttered Faulkner, as he clasped his hands in silent agony.
"Lost!" iterated the captain. "No, no, that cannot be. 
Some
 of them will surely help us."
"Ben Wallack," returned the mate, in a tone that made the captain's stout heart beat more quickly; "
you have but one solitary friend
 on board the ship."
"
All, all!
 Are they ALL against us?"
"All but poor Nat. Faulkner. I have heard the whole plot, every part and parcel of it. Roland is an old slave dealer, and all the men, with the exception of four, whom he has frightened or persuaded to join him, are from St. Domingo, from whence they came in company to pick up the first ship they could meet with that suited their purpose. We are to be murdered to-morrow, and then Roland intends to run on to the coast of Benguela, and take in a load of slaves for either Brazil or Cuba. When the bloody villain first began to talk to-night, he had some thoughts of killing you, and then trying to gain me into his service, but he soon rejected the idea, and 
to-morrow we both die!
"
"Don't give up yet," said the captain. "Some plan may be devised to thwart them in their villany."
No, no, Wallack—there are sixteen of them, and we know not how or where to meet them. If we drink not their poison, they will yet kill us. But there is one consolation—we will die together—honest men."
"By the power of great Heaven, we will 
not
 die!" uttered Wallack, in a tone so loud that it might have proved dangerous. "My own arm is fit for half-a-dozen of them. No, no, Faulkner, let me think. You say Roland thought of 
retaining
 you in his piratical service."
"Yes."
"Then I have it. I'll tell you on the watch to-night."
As the captain spoke, he heard a slight footfall at the companion-way, and fearing that he might be watched, he turned upon his back, laid his hand upon the butt of his pistol, and fell into a low, steady snoring, which he kept up till his watch was called at midnight.
The remainder of the night passed off without disturbance. Wallack and his 
solitary friend
 carried on such conversation as they could during their watch, and in the morning, they came upon deck half an hour before the cook had prepared their breakfast. The captain walked up and down the lee side of the quarter-deck several times in a sort of angry, troubled mood, muttering stifled curses to himself, until at length he stopped before his second mate, and shaking his finger menacingly in his face, he uttered:
"Mr. Faulkner, that makes the fourth time you have, by your lubberly carelessness, torn up the paper containing my day's work. Now, if you do it again, I will disrate you and put you before the mast."
"Do it as soon as you please," returned Faulkner, his face reddening with apparent anger. "You wont frighten me."
"Don't be insolent, sir."
"I am not insolent."
"You were."
"It's a lie!" uttered Faulkner, actually trembling at the sound of his own words addressed to his herculean commander.
Capt. Wallack took one step forward as the word 
lie
 dropped from his officer's lips, and on the next instant he dealt him a blow upon the breast that prostrated him upon the deck.
"Capt. Wallack," said Faulkner, as he arose from his fall, "you shall suffer for this. I will be revenged, as sure as there is a God in heaven!"
The captain made no reply, but turning quickly upon his heel, he went to his cabin. Twice did Roland start to follow him, but yet he remained on deck. There was a strange light in his eyes, as he caught the revengeful expression upon Faulkner's countenance, and then, as if a sudden thought had struck him, he went quickly to the caboose and gave some hurried directions to the cook. After that, he took two or three turns up and down the quarter deck, and then beckoning to Faulkner, who still stood sulkily leaning against the lee rail, he walked forward to the bitts. The second mate followed his silent request, and in a moment after he passed the caboose, the cook came out, and threw overboard the coffee he had prepared for breakfast!
When Faulkner came up to the bitts, Roland cast a furtive glance around him, and then looking fixedly into his companion's eyes, he said:
"Faulkner, have you the courage to follow up the revenge you have sworn against the captain?"
"Yes."
"But you would not dare to 
take his life
."
"I dare to take any man's life who 
strikes
 me."
Roland's eyes sparkled as he heard this, and he then asked:
"But who would take his place in command?"
"Who?" returned Faulkner, with a perfect appearance of honest intent. "Why, who is there but you that is qualified?"
"But if I were captain, would 
you
 follow me?"
"Yes, even to the hoisting of the black flag, so that I had revenge."
Roland grasped his companion by the hand, and after gazing a moment into his face, he went on, and detailed the whole plot he had formed for taking the ship, landing the cargo on the coast of Lower Guinea, and going into the slave trade. His recital was just the same that the second mate had heard while listening at the forecastle bulkhead, and as he concluded, he said:
"Now, Faulkner, will you join us?"
"Yes, readily; but remember, it shall be my hand that finds the life of Capt. Wallack."
"Then, so be it," returned Roland. "And now," he continued, "we must have the matter settled as soon as possible, for Wallack intends to touch at the Cape Verds, and we are not more than three days' sail from there at the furthest, so you must have him out of the way to-night. I want to keep away to-morrow morning and run down between St. Matthew's and Ascension."
"But, say, Roland, why have you not put Wallack out of the way before this? It seems to me, if I had been in your place, I should have made quick work of it."
"So I should," replied the villain, with a peculiar meaning smile; "but you see I have been picking them off carefully. Had I known how the land laid with 
you
, Wallack would not have been living now."
When the two men separated, it was understood that Faulkner should kill the captain during the first part of the next morning watch, and as soon as that was accomplished, they were to put the ship's head off to the southward and eastward.
Before night, Capt. Wallack learned the result of his own and Faulkner's stratagem of the morning, but the two had to be exceedingly careful, for Roland's eyes were open to all that passed about him, and they knew that if their deception was suspected, their death would be certain and immediate. But the most difficult part of the work was yet to be accomplished, for they had sixteen stout men to dispose of. Faulkner had learned that five of the principal mutineers—those upon whom Roland placed the greatest dependence—were in the captain's watch, while there were some six or seven who were mere hirelings, following whatever fortune turned up for them, most of whom were stationed in the watch with their leader. Wallack's main hope was in disposing of the five leading mutineers in his own watch by some stratagem, and then despatching Roland before the watch below could come to the rescue; but whatever was done must be accomplished before midnight, as all hands would be on the alert for action as soon as the morning watch was set.
At length the captain and second mate took the first watch. Nine o'clock passed, and so did ten. Wallack paced the quarter-deck in a steady, thoughtful mood, ever and anon casting his eyes about upon the crew, most of whom were forward. The moon threw its pale beams upon the herculean frame of the captain, and a close observer might have seen the iron muscles as they worked in his powerful limbs. His countenance betrayed the varying thoughts and intense anxiety that moved within him. Five times after the bell had told that ten o'clock had passed did he walk from the wheel to the mainmast and back. At the sixth turn, just as he
 reached the rack in which were coiled the main-topsail halyards, he stopped suddenly with a nervous quickness, while the flashing of his eyes and the instantaneous contraction and expansion of the muscles of the face showed that a sudden and powerful idea had shot into his mind. He quickly resumed his walk, however, and the same appearance of cool thought once more rested upon his features.
The wind was now blowing a good topgallant breeze from S.S.E, and the ship was closehauled upon the starboard tack, and stood E. half S., under single-reefed topsails and topgallant sails.
"Mr. Faulkner," said the captain, again stopping in his walk near the mainmast, at the same time motioning for his second mate to come to him.
"I have it! Watch my every motion, and fail not to catch every word I utter. At the first opportunity you get, as soon as the men are all up, secure the cabin and forecastle companion ways, and arm yourself!"
This Wallack spoke in a hurried whisper, and then raising his voice, he said:
"Mr. Faulkner, will you go below and tell my mate that I should like to see him a moment on deck." Then he added in a whisper: "Tell him I have business of the utmost importance."
Faulkner looked a moment into his commander's face, as if he doubted whether this order were given in earnest, but the confident, resolute countenance that met his gaze assured him, and he immediately went below to do his errand. In a few moments he returned, followed by the first mate, who had not stopped to dress himself, but came up in his simple 
robe de nuit
.
"Mr. Roland," said the captain, as his mate came on deck, at the same time stepping over under the lee of the spanker, "I should not have called you had I not the most urgent necessity. If you will just step this way out of the ear-shot of Faulkner, I will tell you."
Roland stepped up to the lee rail, and leaned his back against it, while the captain stood also leaning against the rail, at his mate's left hand.
"Roland," continued he, "I am afraid Mr. Faulkner is up to some evil design."
"Ah," uttered the villain, while a peculiar sparkle shot forth from his eyes. "Perhaps he has not forgotten the blow you gave him."
"Look out, sir! Look out, Roland, or you'll be overboard!"
As Wallack uttered the first syllable of this exclamation, he placed his hand upon Roland's mouth, and, with a crushing, irresistible force, he bent him back over the rail. At the same instant, he caught the mutineer by the leg, and ere the 
last
 syllable of his exclamation fell from his lips, Roland was plunged headlong into the sea. All hands on deck had heard the captain's apparent warning, but none had seen his deed.
"A man overboard!" shouted Wallack, as he sprang to the wheel and took the helm from him who held it. "Mr. Roland is overboard! Cut away the life buoy there, one of you! Main and main-topsail braces, both sides! Main clewgarnets and buntlines! Mr. Faulkner, rouse up all hands, quick! Let go the main tack and sheet, and clue up! Ease off the lee braces and round in to windward! Work lively, men, or we shall lose him! Haul out the spanker!— Now, spring to the stern davits, boys! Cut the lashings—don't stop to cast off anything!"
These orders had been given at intervals, as rapidly as they could be obeyed, and by the time all hands were up from below, the ship was hove-to, with the main-topsail to the mast. The boat was lowered from the davits and hauled under the quarter, and those who were the most anxious to save the mate, were the first to leap into it.
"Let every oar be manned!" shouted the captain, "and you'll save him yet. I can see him. He's caught the life-buoy."
The boat pulled eight oars, and, with a hand at the tiller, she had nine men in her when she put off, and, as Wallack had expected, these comprised the men he most feared. Faulkner saw the whole in an instant, and, unobserved by the rest of the crew, who were too intently watching the mate, whose white shirt could every now and then be seen, as he rose and fell upon the life-buoy, he sprang forward and secured
 cured the forecastle companion-way, so that the men could not readily obtain their arms. When the boat had got nearly to where the mate was rolling about in his salt bath, the captain gradually gave the ship weather helm until the main-topsail was filled abaft. Then, as if the affair was the result of accident, he exclaimed:
"Halloo, I've let her off! Mizzen braces, boys, and we'll wear round on the other tack."
The men mistrusted not, and in a minute the mizzen-topsail was squared.
"Belay that, and jump to the head braces. That will do,—belay."
As soon as the head braces had been belayed, part of the men came aft to the main, not even yet suspecting that anything but accident had to do with the movements of the ship. The wind was now nearly astern, and of course the ship was rapidly sailing away from the boats, which had just picked up Roland, and had turned to come back.
"Here, Howell," said the captain to one of the men who had stopped at the starboard mainbrace, "take the helm a moment. Lay aft here, all hands," he ordered, and he stepped back and beckoned Faulkner to his side.
Instinctively the men obeyed his order. "Shall I let her off, sir?" asked Howell.
"No!" thundered Capt. Wallack, as he drew a heavy pistol in each hand, while Faulkner did the same. "If you move the wheel a single spoke, or leave the helm, without my order, you are a dead man! Stop there!" he continued, turning to the five men who had now come aft. "The first man that moves an inch till I bid him, dies on the spot! Aha, my fine fellows, you are well caught! That boat astern never will return to this ship! 
I
 threw your scoundrel leader overboard, and then I sent nine more after him. 
They
 may find the same resting place that they gave to poor Gwynn and Russell! Ten of the sixteen individuals who thought to murder me have I disposed of by stratagem, but by heavens, I shall need no stratagem with the other six, for if one of you dare speak a mutinous word—ay, if you dare even look a mutinous look, that man is dead on the next instant! Walleigh, Burnham and Vaughn, step forward here."
As the captain spoke, the three men thus designated advanced from their companions, and trembling at every joint they awaited his will. A moment he looked at them as though he would have utterly annihilated them with his very gaze, and then he said:
"Tell me, my men, and mind that you tell me truly,—were you frightened into this bloody mutiny, or did you join it of your own free will?"
"O, Captain Wallack," exclaimed Walleigh, as he fell upon his knees and clasped his hands, while the other two followed his example, "we were drawn to it, sir. Gwynn and Russell had both gone when Roland threatened us if we didn't join him. As true as there is a God in heaven, we did it to save our own lives."
"And you, Howell," said the captain, as he turned to the man at the wheel.
"Walleigh knows, sir," answered Howell, not daring to let go of the wheel, but laying his right hand upon his heart, "that I refused at first, but there were twelve of them, sir, and we couldn't help it."
"Well, my men, I believe you," returned Captain Wallack, in a frank tone, "and if you prove faithful now, I will not only forgive you, but I will never speak of your fault to your harm."
"O, God bless you, sir," ejaculated they all in a breath, and the tears of gratitude rolled thick and fast down their weather-beaten cheeks.
"That will do,—I will trust you now," said the captain, who saw that they were sincere in their protestations. "Now bring me some seizing-stuff from the long-boat, Walleigh, and we will soon dispose of Mr. Roland's two remaining companions."
The two men were bound without trouble, and placed in the long-boat for safe-keeping. They begged, and they prayed, that they too, might be pardoned, but Wallack knew that fear of punishment alone actuated them, and he would not trust them.
The ship was soon got in good sailing trim, head put N.E. by E., and in four days she was anchored in Funchal Road, where the two mutineers were delivered up to justice, and where Captain Wallack obtained men enough to man his ship once more for his voyage.
When the Jacob Morgan returned to the United States, Capt. Wallack learned that her owners had given her up as lost. A homeward bound East Indiaman had picked up one of her boats, which was found bottom upwards in the water, twelve hundred miles to the northward and westward of the Cape Verds.
The villain Roland, and his companions in guilt, had indeed met the same grave to which they had consigned poor Gwynn and Russell! They had thought to make the blue bosom of the Atlantic bear them on in their ungodly enterprise, but its rolling waves were only destined to burst open the gates of eternity, and usher their souls into the presence of Him who had crushed them in their path of sin!
THE END.
